Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
DRUGS
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 689.
SECTION 2. The addition of flavoring to a drug intended for dispensation may not be
considered compounding if the flavoring:
(1) Is inert, nonallergenic and has no effect other than imparting a flavor  to the drug or
modifying the flavor of the drug; and
(2) Does not constitute more than five percent of the total volume of the drug.
NOTE:
 Section 3 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
HOSPITAL STAFFING
SECTION 4.  ORS 441.775 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 1
441.775. (1)(a) For  each hospital there shall be established a hospital professional and technical
staffing committee. A hospital professional and technical  staffing committee shall consist of an equal
number of hospital professional and technical  managers and professional and technical staff who
work at the hospital.
(b) If the professional and technical  staff who work at the hospital have an exclusive represen-
tative, the exclusive representative shall select the staff members of the hospital professional and
technical staffing committee.
(c) If none of the professional and technical staff who work at the hospital have  an exclusive
representative, the professional and technical  managers shall select the professional and technical
staff members of the hospital professional and technical staffing committee.
(2) A hospital professional and  technical staffing committee shall develop a written hospital-wide
professional and technical staffing plan in  accordance with subsection (5) of this section. In devel-
oping the staffing plan, the primary goal of the committee shall  be to ensure that the hospital is
staffed sufficiently to meet the health care needs of  the patients in the hospital. The committee shall
review and modify the staffing plan, as needed, in accordance with this section.
(3) A majority of the members of the hospital professional and technical staffing  committee
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.
(4) A hospital  professional and technical staffing committee must have two cochairs. One
cochair shall be a professional  or technical manager elected by the members of the committee who
are professional or technical managers. The other cochair shall  be a professional or technical staff
person elected by the members of the committee who are professional and technical staff.
(5)(a) A  hospital professional and technical staffing committee shall develop a professional and
technical staffing plan that is consistent with the approved nurse staffing  plan for the hospital and
that takes into account the hospital service staffing plan  for the hospital developed under ORS
441.776.
(b) The hospital  professional and technical staffing committee shall consider the following cri-
teria when developing the professional and technical staffing plan:
(A) The hospital’s census;
(B) Location of the patients;
(C) Patient types and patient acuity;
(D) National standards, if any;
(E) The size of the hospital and square footage of the hospital;
(F) Ensuring patient access to care; and
(G) Feedback received during committee meetings from staff.
(6)(a) A hospital professional and technical staffing committee  must adopt a professional and
technical staffing plan by a majority  vote of the members of the committee. If a quorum of members
present at a meeting comprises an unequal number of professional  and technical staff and profes-
sional and technical managers, only an equal number of staff and managers may vote. A staffing plan
adopted by the committee must include a summary of the committee’s consideration of  the criteria
in subsection (5) of this section and how the plan:
(A) Is consistent with the approved nurse staffing plan for the hospital; and
(B) Takes into account the hospital service staffing plan for the hospital  that was developed in
accordance with ORS 441.776.
(b) If the hospital professional and technical  staffing committee does not adopt a professional
and technical staffing plan or adopts only a part of the  staffing plan, either cochair may invoke the
commencement of a 60-day  period during which the committee shall continue to develop the staffing
plan. If, by the end of the 60-day period, the committee does not adopt a staffing plan  or adopts only
part of a  staffing plan, the committee shall submit the disputed plan or parts of the plan, as appli-
cable, including a summary of the committee’s consideration of the criteria in subsection (5) of this
section, to the  chief executive officer of the hospital. No later than 60 days after receiving the
submission from the committee, the chief executive officer or the chief executive officer’s designee
shall decide the disputed plan or parts of the plan, as applicable, considering the summary of  the
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 2
committee’s consideration of the criteria in subsection (5) of this  section, and adopt the staffing plan
or parts of the staffing plan that were not adopted by the committee. The chief  executive officer or
the chief executive officer’s designee shall provide to the committee:
(A) A written explanation of the staffing plan or the parts  of the staffing plan that were in
dispute;
(B) The final written proposals of the members of  the committee and the members’ rationales for
their proposals and the committee’s summary of the committee’s consideration of the  criteria in
subsection (5) of this section; and
(C) A summary of the consideration by the chief  executive officer or the chief executive officer’s
designee of the criteria in subsection (5) of this section.
(c) If the hospital professional and technical staffing committee is unable to reach an agreement
on the professional and technical staffing plan during the 60-day period invoked under  paragraph (b)
of this subsection, the members  of the committee may extend deliberations for one additional 60-day
period before the disputed plan or parts  of the plan must be submitted to the chief executive officer
or the chief executive officer’s designee in accordance with  paragraph (b) of this subsection. The
deliberations may be extended under this paragraph only by a  majority vote of the members of the
committee. If a quorum of members  present at a meeting comprises an unequal number of profes-
sional and technical staff and professional and technical managers, only  an equal number of staff
and managers may vote.
(d) A professional and technical staffing plan adopted by a  hospital professional and technical
staffing committee, a chief executive officer or the chief executive officer’s  designee must include
any staffing-related terms and  conditions that were previously adopted through any applicable col-
lective bargaining agreement, including any meal break and rest break requirements, unless a  term
or condition is in direct conflict with an applicable statute or administrative rule.
(7) A hospital professional and technical staffing committee must meet three times  each year
and at the call of either cochair, at a time and place specified by the cochairs.
(8)(a) Except as  provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a hospital professional and tech-
nical staffing committee meeting must be open to:
(A) The hospital’s professional and technical staff, who shall be offered  the opportunity to pro-
vide feedback to the committee during the committee’s meetings; and
(B) Other observers or presenters invited by either cochair.
(b) While the committee is deliberating or voting during a  meeting, either cochair may exclude
individuals described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(9) Minutes must  be taken at every hospital professional and technical staffing committee
meeting and the minutes must:
(a) Include all motions made and the outcome of all votes taken;
(b) Include a summary of all discussions; and
(c) Be made available in a timely manner to any of the hospital staff upon request.
(10) A  manager shall release from their duties staff and managers who serve on the hospital
professional and technical staffing committee  and compensate the staff and managers who serve on
the committee for time spent attending committee meetings.
(11) The hospital shall submit  the professional and technical staffing plan adopted under sub-
section (6) of this section to the Oregon Health Authority no  later than 30 days after adoption of
the staffing plan and shall submit any subsequent changes to the authority no later than  30 days
after the changes are adopted.
(12) Each hospital  unit, as defined by the chief executive officer or the chief executive officer’s
designee, may  deviate from the professional and technical staffing plan within a period of 12 con-
secutive hours, no more than  six times during a rolling 30-day period, without being in violation of
the staffing  plan. The unit manager must notify the hospital professional and technical staffing
committee cochairs no later  than 10 days after each deviation. Each subsequent deviation during the
30-day period constitutes a separate violation under ORS 441.792.
(13) This section does not apply to the Oregon State Hospital.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 3
SECTION 5.  ORS 441.776 is amended to read:
441.776. (1)(a) For each hospital there shall  be established a hospital service staffing committee.
A hospital service staffing committee shall consist of an equal number of service staff managers  and
service staff who work at the hospital.
(b) If the service staff who work at the hospital have an exclusive  representative, the exclusive
representative shall select the service staff members of the hospital service staffing committee.
(c) If none of the service staff who  work at the hospital have an exclusive representative, the
service staff managers shall select the service  staff members of the hospital service staffing com-
mittee.
(2) A hospital service staffing committee shall  develop a written hospital-wide hospital service
staffing plan  in accordance with subsection (5) of this section. The committee shall review and
modify the staffing plan as needed in accordance with this section.
(3) A majority of the members of the hospital  service staffing committee constitutes a quorum
for the transaction of business.
(4) A hospital service staffing committee must have two cochairs. One cochair  shall be a service
staff manager elected by the members of the committee who are service staff managers. The other
cochair shall be a service staff person elected by the  members of the committee who are service
staff.
(5) A hospital service staffing committee shall develop  a hospital service staffing plan that is
consistent with the approved nurse staffing plan for the  hospital and that takes into account the
professional and technical staffing plan  for the hospital developed under ORS 441.775. The commit-
tee shall consider the following criteria in developing the staffing plan:
(a) The hospital’s census;
(b) Location of the patients;
(c) Patient types and patient acuity;
(d) National standards, if any;
(e) The size of the hospital and square footage of the hospital;
(f) Ensuring patient access to care; and
(g) Feedback received during committee meetings from staff.
(6)(a) A hospital service staffing  committee must adopt a hospital service staffing plan by a
majority vote of the members of the committee. If  a quorum of members present at a meeting com-
prises an unequal number of service staff and service staff managers, only an equal number of  staff
and managers may vote. A staffing plan  adopted by the committee must include a summary of the
committee’s consideration of the criteria in subsection (5) of this section and how the plan:
(A) Is consistent with the approved nurse staffing plan for the hospital; and
(B) Takes into account the professional and technical staffing plan  for the hospital that was
developed in accordance with ORS 441.775.
(b) If the  hospital service staffing committee does not adopt a hospital service staffing plan or
adopts only a part of the staffing plan, either cochair may invoke  the commencement of a 60-day
period during  which the committee shall continue to develop the staffing plan. If, by the end of the
60-day period, the committee does not adopt a staffing  plan or adopts only part of a staffing plan,
the committee shall submit the disputed plan or parts of the plan, as applicable, including a sum-
mary of the committee’s consideration of the criteria in subsection  (5) of this section, to the chief
executive officer of the hospital. No later  than 60 days after receiving the submission from the
committee,  the  chief executive officer or the chief executive officer’s designee shall decide the dis-
puted plan or parts of the plan,  as applicable, considering the summary of the committee’s consid-
eration of the criteria in subsection (5) of this section, and adopt  the staffing plan or parts of the
staffing plan that were not adopted by the committee. The chief  executive officer or the chief
executive officer’s designee shall provide to the committee:
(A) A written explanation of the staffing plan  or the parts of the staffing plan that were in
dispute;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 4
(B) The final written proposals of the members of  the committee and the members’ rationales for
their proposals and  the committee’s summary of the committee’s consideration of the criteria in
subsection (5) of this section; and
(C) A summary of the consideration by the chief  executive officer or the chief executive officer’s
designee of the criteria in subsection (5) of this section.
(c) If the hospital  service staffing committee is unable to reach an agreement on the hospital
service staffing plan during the 60-day period invoked under  paragraph (b) of this subsection, the
members of  the committee may extend deliberations for one additional 60-day period before the dis-
puted plan or parts of the plan must be submitted to the chief  executive officer or the chief execu-
tive officer’s designee in accordance with paragraph  (b) of this subsection. The deliberations may
be extended under this paragraph  only by a majority vote of the members of the committee. If a
quorum of members present at a meeting comprises an unequal  number of hospital service staff and
hospital service managers, only an equal number of staff and managers may vote.
(d) A hospital service staffing plan adopted by a hospital service staffing committee,  a chief
executive officer or the chief  executive officer’s designee must include any staffing-related terms and
conditions that were previously adopted through any applicable collective bargaining  agreement,
including any meal break and rest break requirements, unless a term or  condition is in direct con-
flict with an applicable statute or administrative rule.
(7) A hospital service staffing committee must meet three times each year and at the call of ei-
ther cochair, at a time and place specified by the cochairs.
(8)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a hospital  service staffing com-
mittee meeting must be open to:
(A) The hospital’s service staff, who shall be offered the opportunity to provide feedback to  the
committee during the committee’s meetings; and
(B) Other observers or presenters invited by either cochair.
(b) While the committee is deliberating  or voting during a meeting, either cochair may exclude
individuals described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(9) Minutes must be taken at  every hospital service staffing committee meeting and the minutes
must:
(a) Include all motions made and the outcome of all votes taken;
(b) Include a summary of all discussions; and
(c) Be made available in a timely manner to any of the hospital staff upon request.
(10) A  manager shall release from their duties staff and managers who serve on the hospital
service staffing committee and compensate the staff and managers who serve on  the committee for
time spent attending committee meetings.
(11) The hospital shall submit the hospital service staffing plan  adopted under subsection (6) of
this section to the Oregon Health Authority no later than 30 days  after adoption of the staffing plan
and shall submit any  subsequent changes to the authority no later than 30 days after the changes
are adopted.
(12) Each hospital unit, as defined by the chief executive officer or the chief  executive officer’s
designee, may deviate from the hospital service staffing plan within a period of 12 consecutive hours,
no more than six times during a rolling 30-day period,  without being in violation of the staffing plan.
The unit manager must notify the hospital service staffing committee cochairs no later than 10 days
after each deviation. Each subsequent deviation during the 30-day period  constitutes a separate vi-
olation under ORS 441.792.
(13) This section does not apply to the Oregon State Hospital.
NOTE:
 Sections 6 and 7 were deleted by amendment.  Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS
SECTION 8.  ORS 743B.221 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 5
743B.221. (1) As used in this section, “primary care provider” means an individual , clinic  or
team of health care providers  licensed or certified in this state to provide outpatient, nonspecialty
medical services or the coordination of health care for the purpose of:
(a) Promoting or maintaining mental and physical health and wellness; and
(b) Diagnosis, treatment or management of acute or chronic conditions caused  by disease, injury
or illness.
(2) An insurer offering an individual or group policy or certificate of health insurance that  re-
imburses the cost of hospital, medical  or surgical expenses, other than coverage limited to expenses
from accidents or specific diseases and limited benefit coverage, must assign  a beneficiary under the
policy or certificate to a primary  care provider if the beneficiary or a parent of a minor beneficiary
has not selected a primary care provider by the 90th day of the plan year. If the insurer assigns the
beneficiary to a primary care provider, the insurer shall provide notice of the assignment to the
beneficiary or parent and to the primary care provider.
(3) A beneficiary may select a different primary care provider at any time.
(4) The Department of Consumer  and Business Services shall adopt rules prescribing a method-
ology for assignment and attribution of beneficiaries, to ensure accuracy and agreement  between
insurers and providers.  The rules must prioritize consumer choice, ensure collaboration between
insurers and  providers and be consistent with recommendations of the primary care payment reform
collaborative described in section 2, chapter 575, Oregon Laws 2015.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 743B.221, as amended by section 14, chapter 37, Oregon Laws 2022,  is
amended to read:
743B.221. (1)  As used in this section, “primary care provider” means an individual , clinic or
team of health care providers  licensed or certified in this state to provide outpatient, nonspecialty
medical services or the coordination of health care for the purpose of:
(a) Promoting or maintaining mental and physical health and wellness; and
(b) Diagnosis, treatment or management of acute or chronic conditions caused  by disease, injury
or illness.
(2) An  insurer offering an individual or group policy or certificate of health insurance that re-
imburses the cost of hospital, medical  or surgical expenses, other than coverage limited to expenses
from accidents or specific diseases and limited benefit coverage, must assign  a beneficiary under the
policy or certificate to a primary  care provider if the beneficiary or a parent of a minor beneficiary
has not selected a primary care provider by the 90th day of the plan year. If the insurer assigns the
beneficiary to a primary care provider, the insurer shall provide notice of the assignment to the
beneficiary or parent and to the primary care provider.
(3) A beneficiary may select a different primary care provider at any time.
(4) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall adopt  rules prescribing a method-
ology  for  assignment and attribution of beneficiaries, to ensure accuracy and agreement between
insurers and  providers. The rules must prioritize consumer choice and ensure collaboration between
insurers and providers.
PROFESSIONAL DISCLOSURE STATEMENT
SECTION 10.
 ORS 675.755 is amended to read:
675.755. (1) Except as provided in  subsection [ (6)] (4) of this section, prior to the performance
of professional counseling or marriage and family therapy, [ the] a licensee must furnish  the client
with a  copy of a professional disclosure statement. If the licensee fails to provide the statement, the
licensee [ shall] may not charge [ a] the client a fee for services.
(2) A professional disclosure statement  [shall] must include the following information regarding
the [ applicant or ] licensee:
(a) Name, business address and telephone number;
(b) Philosophy and approach to counseling or marriage and family therapy;
(c) Formal education and training;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 6
(d) Continuing education and supervision requirements; and
(e) Fee schedules.
(3) The statement must include the name, address and telephone number of  the Oregon Board
of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists.
[(4) An applicant shall submit a professional disclosure statement for board approval upon appli-
cation for a license. ]
[(5) Whenever an applicant or licensee makes a change in the professional disclosure  statement, the
new statement shall be presented to the board for approval. ]
[(6)] (4) The board may adopt by rule exemptions from the requirements of this section.
SECTION 11.
The amendments to ORS 675.755 by section 10 of this 2024 Act apply to
applications received by the Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Marriage
and Family Therapists on or after the effective date of this  2024 Act and to professional
disclosure statements changed on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
NOTE: Sections 12 and  13 were deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renum-
bered.
PROTECTED HEALTH INFORMATION
SECTION 14.  ORS 192.566 is amended to read:
192.566. A health care provider may use an  authorization that contains the following provisions
in accordance with ORS 192.558:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
AUTHORIZATION
TO USE AND DISCLOSE
PROTECTED HEALTH INFORMATION
I authorize: 
 (Name of person/entity disclosing information) to  use and
disclose  a  copy of the specific health information described below regarding:
 (Name of individual) consisting  of: (Describe information to be
used/disclosed)
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
to: 
 (Name and address of recipient or recipients)  for the purpose
of: (Describe each purpose of disclosure  or indicate that the disclosure is at the request of
the individual)
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
_______________________________________________________________________________________
If the information to be disclosed contains any of the types of records or  information listed
below, additional laws relating to the use and disclosure of the information may  apply. I
understand and agree that this information will be disclosed if I [ place my initials] mark in the
applicable space next to the type of information.
HIV/AIDS information
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 7
Mental health information
Genetic testing information
Drug/alcohol diagnosis, treatment, or
referral information.
I understand that the information used or disclosed pursuant to this  authorization may be subject
to redisclosure and no longer be  protected under federal law. However, I also understand that fed-
eral or state law may restrict  redisclosure of HIV/AIDS information, mental health information,
genetic testing information and drug/alcohol diagnosis, treatment or referral information.
PROVIDER INFORMATION
You do not need to sign  this authorization. Refusal to sign the authorization will not adversely af-
fect your  ability to receive health care services or reimbursement for services. The only circum-
stance when refusal to sign means you will not receive health care services  is if the health care
services are solely for  the purpose of providing health information to someone else and the author-
ization is necessary to make that disclosure.
You may revoke this authorization in writing at any time. If you revoke your authorization, the in-
formation described  above may no longer be used or disclosed for the purposes described in this
written authorization. The only exception is  when a covered entity has taken action in reliance on
the authorization or the authorization was obtained as a  condition of obtaining insurance coverage.
To revoke this authorization, please send a  written statement to
 (contact
person) at  (address of person/entity disclosing information) and state that you
are revoking this authorization.
SIGNATURE
I have read this authorization and I understand it. Unless revoked, this authorization expires
 (insert either applicable date or event).
By: 
(individual or personal representative)
Date: 
Description of personal representative’s authority:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS
SECTION 15.  ORS 3.450 is amended to read:
3.450. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Drug court program” means a program in which:
(A) Individuals who  are before the court obtain treatment for substance abuse issues and report
regularly to the court on the progress of their treatment; and
(B) A local drug  court team, consisting of the court, agency personnel and treatment and service
providers, monitors the individuals’ participation in treatment.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 8
(b) “Individual-provider relationship” includes a relationship between an individual and a phy-
sician, a [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner.
(2)(a) The governing body of a county or a treatment provider may establish fees that individuals
participating in a drug court program  may be required to pay for treatment and other services
provided as part of the drug court program.
(b) A court may order an individual participating  in a drug court program to pay fees to par-
ticipate in the program. Fees imposed under this subsection may not be paid to the court.
(3) Records that are maintained by the  circuit court specifically for the purpose of a drug court
program must be maintained separately from  other court records. Records maintained by a circuit
court specifically for the purpose of a drug court program are confidential and may not be  disclosed
except in accordance with regulations adopted under 42 U.S.C. 290dd-2, including  under the cir-
cumstances described in subsections (4) to (7) of this section.
(4) If  the individual who is the subject of the record gives written consent, a record described
in subsection (3) of this section may be disclosed to members of the local drug  court team in order
to develop treatment plans, monitor progress in treatment  and determine outcomes of participation
in the drug court program.
(5) A  record described in subsection (3) of this section may not be introduced into evidence in
any legal proceeding other than the drug court program unless:
(a) The individual who is the subject of the  record gives written consent for introduction of the
record;  or
(b) The court finds good cause for introduction. In determining whether good cause exists for
purposes of this paragraph, the court shall weigh the public interest and the need for disclosure
against the potential injury caused by the disclosure to:
(A) The individual who is the subject of the record;
(B) The individual-provider relationship; and
(C) The treatment services being provided to the individual who is the subject of the record.
(6) A court, the State Court Administrator, the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission  or the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission:
(a) May use records described in subsection (3) of  this section and other drug court program
information  to  track and develop statistics about the effectiveness, costs and other areas of public
interest concerning drug court programs.
(b) May release statistics developed under paragraph (a) of this subsection and  analyses based
on the statistics to the public.
(7) Statistics  and analyses released under subsection (6) of this section may not contain any in-
formation that identifies an individual participant in a drug court program.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 30.302 is amended to read:
30.302. (1) As used in this section, “retired provider” means any person:
(a) Who holds a degree of Doctor of Medicine, Doctor of Osteopathic Medicine or  Doctor of
Podiatric Medicine, or  who has met the minimum educational requirements for licensure to practice
naturopathic medicine or as a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  under  ORS 677.505 to
677.525 or a nurse practitioner under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
(b) Who has been licensed and is currently  retired in accordance with the provisions of ORS
chapter 677, 678 or 685;
(c) Who is registered with the  Oregon Medical Board as a retired emeritus physician or who
complies with the requirements of the Oregon Medical Board as a retired [ physician assistant ]
physician associate , the Oregon State Board of Nursing as  a retired nurse practitioner or the
Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine as a retired [ naturopath] naturopathic physician;
(d) Who registers with the local health  officer of the local public health authority, as defined in
ORS 431.003, in which the physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate , nurse practitioner
or [ naturopath] naturopathic physician practices; and
(e) Who  provides medical care as a volunteer without compensation solely through referrals
from the local health officer specified in paragraph (d) of this subsection.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 9
(2) Any retired provider who treats patients pursuant to this section shall be considered to be
an agent of a public body for the purposes of ORS 30.260 to 30.300.
SECTION 17.  ORS 30.800 is amended to read:
30.800. (1) As used in this section and ORS 30.805, “emergency medical assistance” means:
(a) Medical or dental  care not provided in a place where emergency medical or dental care is
regularly available, including but not limited to a hospital,  industrial first-aid station or the office
of a physician, naturopathic physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or  dentist, given
voluntarily and without the expectation of  compensation to an injured person who is in need of
immediate medical or dental care and under emergency circumstances that suggest  that the giving
of assistance is the only alternative to death or serious physical aftereffects; or
(b) Medical care provided voluntarily in good faith and without expectation  of compensation by
a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677, a [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed
under ORS 677.505 to 677.525, a nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390  or a
naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685 and  in the person’s professional capacity as
a provider of health  care for an athletic team at a public or private school or college athletic event
or as a volunteer provider of health care at other athletic events.
(2) No person may maintain an action for damages for injury, death  or loss that results from
acts or omissions of a person while rendering  emergency medical assistance unless it is alleged and
proved by the complaining party that  the person was grossly negligent in rendering the emergency
medical assistance.
(3) The giving of emergency medical assistance by a person does not, of itself, establish a pro-
fessional relationship between the person  giving the assistance and the person receiving the assist-
ance insofar as the relationship carries with it any duty to provide or arrange for further medical
care for the injured person after the giving of emergency medical assistance.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 30.802 is amended to read:
30.802. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Automated external defibrillator” means an  automated external defibrillator approved for
sale by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(b) “Public setting” means a location that is:
(A) Accessible to members of the general public, employees, visitors and guests, but that  is not
a private residence;
(B) A public school facility as defined in ORS 327.365;
(C) A health club as defined in ORS 431A.450; or
(D) A place of public assembly as defined in ORS 431A.455.
(2) A person may not bring a cause of action against another person for  damages for injury,
death or loss  that result from acts or omissions involving the use, attempted use or nonuse of an
automated external defibrillator when the other person:
(a) Used or attempted to use an automated external defibrillator;
(b) Was present when an automated external defibrillator was used or should have been used;
(c) Provided training in the use of an automated external defibrillator;
(d) Is a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS 677.505 to
677.525, nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to  678.390 or a naturopathic physician li-
censed under ORS chapter 685 and provided  services related to the placement or use of an auto-
mated external defibrillator; or
(e) Possesses or controls one  or more automated external defibrillators placed in a public set-
ting.
(3) The immunity provided by this section does not apply if:
(a) The person against whom the action is brought acted with gross  negligence or with reckless,
wanton or intentional misconduct; or
(b) The use, attempted use or nonuse  of an automated external defibrillator occurred at a lo-
cation where emergency medical care is regularly available.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 10
(4) Nothing in this section  affects the liability of a manufacturer, designer, developer, distributor
or supplier of an automated external defibrillator, or an accessory for  an automated external
defibrillator, under the provisions of ORS  30.900 to 30.920 or any other applicable state or federal
law.
SECTION 19.  ORS 31.260 is amended to read:
31.260. As used in ORS 31.260 to 31.278:
(1) “Adverse health care  incident” means an objective, definable and unanticipated consequence
of patient care that is usually preventable and results in  the death of or serious physical injury to
the patient.
(2) “Health care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(3) “Health care provider” means a person practicing within the  scope of the person’s license,
registration or certification to practice as:
(a) A psychologist under ORS 675.030 to 675.070, 675.085 and 675.090;
(b) An occupational therapist under ORS 675.230 to 675.300;
(c) A physician under ORS 677.100 to 677.228;
(d) An emergency medical services provider under ORS chapter 682;
(e) A podiatric physician and surgeon under ORS 677.820 to 677.840;
(f) A registered nurse under ORS 678.010 to 678.410;
(g) A dentist under ORS chapter 679;
(h) A dental hygienist under ORS 680.040 to 680.100;
(i) A denturist under ORS 680.515 to 680.535;
(j) An audiologist or speech-language pathologist under ORS 681.250 to 681.350;
(k) An optometrist under ORS 683.040 to 683.155 and 683.170 to 683.220;
(L) A chiropractor under ORS 684.040 to 684.105;
(m) A [ naturopath] naturopathic physician under ORS 685.060 to 685.110, 685.125 and 685.135;
(n) A massage therapist under ORS 687.011 to 687.250;
(o) A direct entry midwife under ORS 687.405 to 687.495;
(p) A physical therapist under ORS 688.040 to 688.145;
(q) A medical imaging licensee under ORS 688.445 to 688.525;
(r) A pharmacist under ORS 689.151 and 689.225 to 689.285;
(s) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate under ORS 677.505 to 677.525; or
(t) A professional counselor or marriage and family therapist under ORS 675.715 to 675.835.
(4) “Patient” means the patient or, if the patient is  a minor, is deceased or has been medically
confirmed by the patient’s treating  physician to be incapable of making decisions for purposes of
ORS 31.260 to 31.278, the patient’s representative as provided in ORS 31.274.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 31.740 is amended to read:
31.740. Punitive damages may not be awarded against a health practitioner if:
(1) The health practitioner is licensed, registered or certified as:
(a) A psychologist under ORS 675.030 to 675.070, 675.085 and 675.090;
(b) An occupational therapist under ORS 675.230 to 675.300;
(c) A regulated social worker under ORS 675.510 to 675.600;
(d) A physician under ORS 677.100 to 677.228 or 677.805 to 677.840;
(e) An emergency medical services provider under ORS chapter 682;
(f) A nurse under ORS 678.040 to 678.101;
(g) A nurse practitioner under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
(h) A dentist under ORS chapter 679;
(i) A dental hygienist under ORS 680.040 to 680.100;
(j) A denturist under ORS 680.515 to 680.535;
(k) An audiologist or speech-language pathologist under ORS 681.250 to 681.350;
(L) An optometrist under ORS 683.040 to 683.155 and 683.170 to 683.220;
(m) A chiropractor under ORS 684.040 to 684.105;
(n) A [ naturopath] naturopathic physician under ORS 685.060 to 685.110, 685.125 and 685.135;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 11
(o) A massage therapist under ORS 687.011 to 687.250;
(p) A physical therapist under ORS 688.040 to 688.145;
(q) A medical imaging licensee under ORS 688.445 to 688.525;
(r) A pharmacist under ORS 689.151 and 689.225 to 689.285;
(s) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate as provided by ORS 677.505 to 677.525; or
(t) A professional counselor or marriage  and family therapist under ORS 675.715 to 675.835; and
(2) The  health practitioner was engaged in conduct regulated by the license, registration or
certificate issued by the appropriate governing body and was acting within the scope of practice for
which the license, registration or certificate was issued and without malice.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 58.376 is amended to read:
58.376. (1) As used in this section, “licensee” means an individual who has a license  as a phy-
sician or a license as a [ physician assistant ] physician associate from the Oregon  Medical Board
or who has a license as a nurse practitioner from the Oregon State Board of Nursing.
(2) In a professional corporation  that is organized for the purpose of allowing physicians, [ phy-
sician assistants ] physician associates and nurse practitioners to  jointly render professional health
care services, licensees must:
(a) Hold a majority of each class of shares of the  professional corporation that is entitled to
vote; and
(b) Be a majority of the directors of the professional corporation.
(3) An individual whom the professional corporation employs, or an  individual who owns an in-
terest in the professional corporation, may not direct or control  the professional judgment of a
licensee who is practicing within the professional corporation and within the scope of practice per-
mitted under the licensee’s license.
(4) A licensee whom the professional corporation employs,  or a licensee who owns an interest
in the professional  corporation, may not direct or control the services of another licensee who is
practicing within the professional corporation unless the other licensee is also practicing within  the
scope of practice permitted under the licensee’s license.
(5) A professional corporation that is subject  to ORS 58.375 may elect to become subject to this
section by amending the professional corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws.
SECTION 21a.
If House Bill 4130  becomes law, section 21 of this 2024 Act (amending ORS
58.376) is repealed.
SECTION 22.  ORS 87.555 is amended to read:
87.555. (1) Except  as otherwise provided by law, whenever any person receives hospitalization
or medical treatment on account of any injury, and the person, or the  personal representative of the
person after the death  of the person, claims damages from the person causing the injury, then the
hospital or  any physician licensed under ORS chapter 677, [ physician assistant ] physician associate
licensed under ORS 677.505  to 677.525 or nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390
who treats the injured person in the hospital or who provides medical services shall  have a lien
upon any sum awarded the injured person or the  personal representative of the person by judgment
or award or obtained by a settlement or compromise to the extent of the  amount due the hospital
and the physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse  practitioner for the reasonable
value of such medical treatment rendered prior to the date of  judgment, award, settlement or com-
promise. However, no such lien shall be valid against anyone coming under  the Workers’ Compen-
sation Act.
(2) When  the injured person receiving hospitalization or medical care from a physician, [ physi-
cian assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner is the beneficiary of an insurance policy,
including a  policy that provides personal injury protection coverage or similar no-fault medical in-
surance but excluding a health insurance policy, that provides for  payment of such hospitalization
and medical care, both the hospital and physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse
practitioner shall have liens upon the amount payable  under the insurance policy. If a hospital or
physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse  practitioner has properly perfected a
lien pursuant  to ORS 87.565 (2), the insurer obligated to make payment shall pay the sum due under
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 12
the insurance policy directly to the  hospital and physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate
or nurse practitioner in  the amount due each for services rendered, and such payment shall consti-
tute a release of the insurer making the payment to the extent of the payment.
(3) When there are insufficient funds to satisfy in full the liens  of all hospitals, physicians,
[physician assistants ] physician associates  and nurse practitioners claiming a lien  created by this
section,  the  insurer making the payment shall prorate the available funds without regard to the se-
quence of the filing of the notice of  lien by the hospitals, physicians, [ physician assistants ] physician
associates or nurse practitioners and pay  the hospitals, physicians, [ physician assistants ] physician
associates or nurse practitioners in proportion to the amount due each for services rendered.
SECTION 23.  ORS 87.560 is amended to read:
87.560. (1) No lien under ORS 87.555 (1) shall be allowed:
(a) For hospitalization and treatment from a  physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate
or nurse practitioner rendered after a settlement has been effected  by or on behalf of the party
causing the injury;
(b) Against any sum for necessary attorney fees, costs  and expenses incurred by the injured
party in securing a settlement, compromise, award or judgment; or
(c) For an amount payable for medical  services under a policy that provides personal injury
protection coverage provided to an injured person prior to a hospital, physician, [physician
assistant] physician associate or nurse practitioner perfecting a lien under ORS 87.565 (2).
(2) This section does not preclude a hospital, a  physician licensed under ORS chapter 677,
[physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or nurse practi-
tioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390 from perfecting a lien under ORS 87.555.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 87.565 is amended to read:
87.565. (1) In order to perfect a lien under ORS 87.555 (1), a hospital, an owner or operator  of
a hospital, a physician, a [ physician assistant ] physician associate or a nurse practitioner shall:
(a) Not later  than 30 days after the discharge of the patient from the hospital, file a notice of
lien substantially in the form prescribed in ORS 87.570, containing a statement of  the amount
claimed, with the recording officer of the county wherein such hospital is located; and
(b) Prior to the date of judgment, award, settlement or compromise, serve a certified  copy of the
notice of lien by registered or certified mail upon:
(A) The  person alleged to be responsible for causing the injury and from whom damages are or
may be claimed or to the last-known address of the person; or
(B) The insurance carrier that has insured  the person alleged to be responsible, if such insur-
ance carrier is known.
(2) In order to perfect a lien under ORS 87.555 (2), a hospital, an owner or operator of a hospital,
a physician, a [ physician assistant ] physician associate or a nurse practitioner shall:
(a) Not later  than 30 days after the discharge of the patient from the hospital, file a notice of
lien substantially in the form prescribed in ORS 87.570, containing a statement of  the amount
claimed, with the recording officer of the county wherein such hospital is located; and
(b) Serve a certified copy of the  notice of lien by certified mail upon the insurance company that
is obligated to make payment for hospitalization and medical services.
SECTION 25.  ORS 87.575 is amended to read:
87.575. Each  recording officer shall maintain a lien docket in which, upon the filing of a notice
of lien,  the recording officer shall enter the name of the injured person, the approximate date of the
hospitalization services or medical treatment, the name and address  of the hospital filing the notice
and the amount claimed and the name and address of the physician,  [ physician assistant ] physician
associate or nurse practitioner filing the notice and  the amount claimed. The recording officer shall
make an index thereto in the names of the injured persons.
SECTION 26.  ORS 87.581 is amended to read:
87.581. (1) A person or  insurer shall be liable to a hospital and physician, [ physician assistant ]
physician associate or nurse practitioner for the  reasonable value of hospitalization services and
medical treatment rendered out of the moneys due under any payment,  award, judgment, settlement
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 13
or compromise, after paying the attorney  fees, costs and expenses incurred in connection therewith,
or the proportion of that amount as determined under ORS 87.555 (3), if the person or insurer:
(a) Has received a notice of lien that complies with ORS 87.565;
(b) Has not paid the hospital and physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse
practitioner the reasonable value of hospitalization services and medical treatment that the hospital
and physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner rendered; and
(c) Pays moneys to the injured person, the heirs or personal representative of the injured person,
the attorney for the injured person or for the heirs or personal representative of the injured  person,
or a person not claiming a valid  lien under ORS 87.555, as compensation for the injury suffered or
as payment for the costs of hospitalization services or medical  treatment incurred by the injured
person.
(2) An action  arising under subsection (1) of this section shall be commenced within 180 days
after the date of payment under subsection (1)(c) of this section.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 109.640 is amended to read:
109.640. (1) As used in this  section, “reproductive health care” has the meaning given that term
in ORS 435.190, except that “reproductive health care” does  not include the elective sterilization
of a minor under 15 years of age.
(2)(a) As used in  this subsection, “health care provider” means a physician, [ physician
assistant] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525, nurse practitioner  licensed
under ORS 678.375 to 678.390 or a pharmacist licensed under ORS chapter 689.
(b) A minor under  15 years of age may give consent, without the consent of a parent or guardian
of the  minor, to an abortion only if the abortion is provided by a health care provider who is acting
within the health care provider’s scope of practice and who reasonably believes, in  the health care
provider’s professional judgment, that:
(A) Involving the parent or guardian of the minor may result in the physical or emotional abuse
of the minor or the neglect of the minor; or
(B) Requiring the consent of a parent or guardian of the minor would not be in  the best interest
of the minor, for the reasons documented  by the health care provider after obtaining the concur-
rence of another health care provider who is associated with a separate medical  practice or facility.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (2) of  this section and notwithstanding subsection (4) of this
section, a minor of any age may give consent,  without the consent of a parent or guardian of the
minor, to receive reproductive health care information  and services from a health care provider who
is a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS 677.505 to  677.525,
nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390, pharmacist licensed  under ORS chapter
689 or naturopathic physician licensed  under ORS chapter 685, and who is acting within the
provider’s scope of practice.
(4) A minor 15 years of age or older may give consent, without the consent of a  parent or
guardian of the minor, to:
(a) Hospital  care, medical or surgical diagnosis or treatment by a physician licensed by the
Oregon Medical Board or a naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685, and dental or
surgical diagnosis or treatment by a dentist licensed by the Oregon Board of Dentistry.
(b) Diagnosis or treatment by a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  who is licensed under
ORS 677.505 to 677.525 and who is acting pursuant to a collaboration agreement as defined in ORS
677.495.
(c) Diagnosis and treatment by a nurse practitioner who is licensed by the Oregon State  Board
of Nursing under ORS 678.375 and who is acting within the  scope of practice for a nurse practi-
tioner.
(d) Except when the minor is obtaining contact lenses for  the first time, diagnosis and treatment
by an optometrist who is licensed by the Oregon Board of Optometry under ORS 683.010  to 683.340
and who is acting within the scope of practice for an optometrist.
(5) If a person, including a health care provider, has reasonable cause to  believe that a minor
the person comes into contact with under this section has suffered abuse, as defined in  ORS
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 14
419B.005, the person shall immediately comply  with the person’s mandatory child abuse reporting
duties under ORS 419B.010.
SECTION 28.  ORS 109.650 is amended to read:
109.650. A hospital or a physician,  [physician assistant ] physician associate, nurse practitioner,
naturopathic physician, dentist or  optometrist described in ORS 109.640 may advise a parent or legal
guardian of a  minor of the care, diagnosis or treatment of the minor or the need for any treatment
of the minor, without the consent of the minor, and is not liable  for advising the parent or legal
guardian without the consent of the minor.
SECTION 29.  ORS 109.675 is amended to read:
109.675. (1) A  minor 14 years of age or older may obtain, without parental knowledge or consent:
(a) Outpatient diagnosis or treatment  of a mental or emotional disorder or a chemical depend-
ency, excluding methadone maintenance, by a physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate
licensed by the Oregon Medical Board, a psychologist licensed by the Oregon Board of  Psychology,
a nurse practitioner registered by the Oregon State Board of Nursing, a clinical social worker li-
censed by the State Board of Licensed Social Workers, a professional counselor or  marriage and
family therapist licensed by  the Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists,
a naturopathic physician licensed by the Oregon Board of  Naturopathic Medicine or a community
mental health program established and operated pursuant to  ORS 430.620 when approved to do so
by the Oregon Health Authority pursuant to rule.
(b) Outpatient applied behavior analysis, as  defined in ORS 676.802, as a treatment of a mental
or emotional disorder or a chemical dependency, excluding methadone  maintenance, by a behavior
analyst or  assistant behavior analyst licensed under ORS 676.810 or a behavior analysis
interventionist registered by  the Health Licensing Office under ORS 676.815 if the treatment is
within the scope of  practice of the behavior analyst, assistant behavior analyst or behavior analysis
interventionist.
(2) However, the person providing treatment shall have the parents of the  minor involved before
the end of treatment unless the parents refuse or unless there are clear clinical indications to  the
contrary, which shall be documented in the treatment record. The provisions of this  subsection do
not apply to:
(a) A minor who has been sexually abused by a parent; or
(b) An emancipated minor, whether  emancipated under the provisions of ORS 109.510 and
109.520 or 419B.550 to 419B.558 or, for the purpose of this section only, emancipated by virtue  of
having lived apart from the parents or legal guardian  while being self-sustaining for a period of 90
days prior to obtaining treatment as provided by this section.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 109.680 is amended to read:
109.680. (1) As used in this section, “mental health care  provider” means a physician or [ physi-
cian assistant ] physician associate licensed by the Oregon  Medical Board, psychologist licensed by
the Oregon Board of Psychology, nurse practitioner registered  by the Oregon State Board of Nurs-
ing, clinical social worker licensed under ORS 675.530, professional counselor or marriage and fam-
ily therapist licensed by the Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and  Therapists,
naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter  685 or community mental health program es-
tablished and operated pursuant to ORS 430.620 when approved to do so by the Oregon Health  Au-
thority pursuant to rule.
(2)(a) A mental health care provider  that is providing services to a minor pursuant to ORS
109.675 may  disclose relevant health information about the minor without the minor’s consent as
provided in ORS 109.675 (2) and this subsection.
(b) If the minor’s condition has deteriorated or the risk of a  suicide attempt has become such
that inpatient treatment is necessary, or if the minor’s condition requires detoxification in a  resi-
dential or acute care facility, the minor’s mental health care provider may disclose the relevant in-
formation regarding the minor’s diagnosis  and treatment to the minor’s parent or legal guardian to
the extent  the mental health care provider determines the disclosure is clinically appropriate and
will serve the best interests of the minor’s treatment.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 15
(c) If the mental health care provider assesses the  minor to be at serious and imminent risk of
a suicide attempt but inpatient treatment is not necessary or practicable:
(A) The  mental health care provider shall disclose relevant information about the minor to and
engage in safety planning with the minor’s parent,  legal guardian or other individuals the provider
reasonably believes may be able to prevent or lessen the minor’s risk of a suicide attempt.
(B) The mental health  care provider may disclose relevant information regarding the minor’s
treatment and diagnosis that  the mental health care provider determines is necessary to further the
minor’s treatment to those organizations, including appropriate  schools and social service entities,
that the  mental health care provider reasonably believes will provide treatment support to the minor
to the extent the mental health care provider determines necessary.
(d) Except as provided in  ORS 109.675 (2) and paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, if a
mental health care provider has  provided the minor with the opportunity to object to the disclosure
and the minor has not expressed an objection, the mental health care  provider may disclose infor-
mation related to the minor’s treatment and diagnosis to individuals, including the minor’s  parent
or legal guardian, and organizations when the information directly relates to the individual’s  or
organization’s involvement in the minor’s treatment.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(c)(A) of this section, a mental health care provider is not re-
quired to disclose the minor’s treatment and diagnosis information to an individual if the mental
health care provider:
(a) Reasonably believes the individual has abused or neglected the minor or subjected the  minor
to domestic violence or may abuse or neglect the minor or subject the minor to domestic violence;
(b) Reasonably believes  disclosure of the minor’s information to the individual could endanger
the minor; or
(c) Determines that it is not in the minor’s best  interest to disclose the information to the in-
dividual.
(4) Nothing in this section is intended to limit a mental health care provider’s  authority to dis-
close information related to the minor with the minor’s consent.
(5) If a mental health care provider discloses a minor’s information as provided in subsection  (2)
of this section in good faith, the mental health care provider is immune from  civil liability for
making the disclosure without the consent of the minor.
SECTION 31.
 ORS 109.685 is amended to read:
109.685. A physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate , psychologist, nurse practitioner,
clinical social worker licensed under ORS 675.530, professional counselor or marriage and  family
therapist licensed  by the Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists,
naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685 or community mental health  program de-
scribed in ORS 109.675 who in good  faith provides diagnosis or treatment to a minor as authorized
by ORS 109.675 shall not be subject to  any civil liability for providing such diagnosis or treatment
without consent of the parent or legal guardian of the minor.
SECTION 32.  ORS 124.050 is amended to read:
124.050. As used in ORS 124.050 to 124.095:
(1) “Abuse” means one or more of the following:
(a) Any physical injury to an elderly person caused by  other than accidental means, or which
appears to be at variance with the explanation given of the injury.
(b) Neglect.
(c) Abandonment, including desertion or willful forsaking of an elderly  person or the withdrawal
or neglect of duties and obligations owed an elderly person by a caretaker or other person.
(d) Willful infliction of physical pain or injury upon an elderly person.
(e) An act that constitutes a crime under  ORS 163.375, 163.405, 163.411, 163.415, 163.425, 163.427,
163.465, 163.467 or 163.525.
(f) Verbal abuse.
(g) Financial exploitation.
(h) Sexual abuse.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 16
(i) Involuntary seclusion of an  elderly person for the convenience of a caregiver or to discipline
the person.
(j) A wrongful use of a physical or  chemical restraint of an elderly person, excluding an act of
restraint prescribed by a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 and  any treatment activities
that are consistent with an approved treatment plan or in connection with a court order.
(2) “Elderly person” means  any person 65 years of age or older who is not subject to the pro-
visions of ORS 441.640 to 441.665.
(3) “Facility” means:
(a) A long term care facility as that term is defined in ORS 442.015.
(b) A residential facility as that term is defined in ORS 443.400, including but not limited to an
assisted living facility.
(c) An adult foster home as that term is defined in ORS 443.705.
(4) “Financial exploitation” means:
(a) Wrongfully taking the assets, funds  or property belonging to or intended for the use of an
elderly person or a person with a disability.
(b) Alarming an elderly person or a person with a disability by  conveying a threat to wrongfully
take or appropriate money or property of the person if the person would  reasonably believe that the
threat conveyed would be carried out.
(c) Misappropriating, misusing or transferring without authorization any money  from any ac-
count held jointly or singly by an elderly person or a person with a disability.
(d) Failing to use the income or assets of  an elderly person or a person with a disability effec-
tively for the support and maintenance of the person.
(5) “Intimidation” means compelling or deterring conduct by threat.
(6) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) Any city or municipal police department.
(b) Any county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) Any district attorney.
(e) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(7) “Neglect” means  failure to provide basic care or services that are necessary to maintain the
health or safety of an elderly person.
(8) “Person with a disability” means a person described in:
(a) ORS 410.040 (7); or
(b) ORS 410.715.
(9) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS chapter 677,
naturopathic physician or chiropractor, including any intern or resident.
(b) Licensed  practical nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(c) Employee of the Department  of Human Services or community developmental disabilities
program.
(d) Employee of the Oregon Health Authority, local health department or community  mental
health program.
(e) Peace officer.
(f) Member of the clergy.
(g) Regulated social worker.
(h) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(i) Senior center employee.
(j) Information and referral or outreach worker.
(k) Licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 17
(L) Elected official of a branch of government of this state or a state agency, board, commission
or department of a branch of government of this  state or of a city, county or other political subdi-
vision in this state.
(m) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(n) Psychologist.
(o) Provider of adult foster care or an employee of the provider.
(p) Audiologist.
(q) Speech-language pathologist.
(r) Attorney.
(s) Dentist.
(t) Optometrist.
(u) Chiropractor.
(v) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(w) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(x) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 443.370.
(y) A person providing agency with choice services under ORS 427.181.
(10) “Services” includes but is not limited to the  provision of food, clothing, medicine, housing,
medical services, assistance with bathing or  personal hygiene or any other service essential to the
well-being of an elderly person.
(11)(a) “Sexual abuse” means:
(A) Sexual contact with an elderly person who does not consent  or is considered incapable of
consenting to a sexual act under ORS 163.315;
(B) Verbal or physical harassment of a sexual nature, including but not  limited to severe or
pervasive exposure to sexually explicit material or language;
(C) Sexual exploitation;
(D) Any sexual contact  between an employee of a facility or paid caregiver and an elderly per-
son served by the facility or caregiver; or
(E) Any sexual contact that is achieved through force, trickery, threat or coercion.
(b) “Sexual abuse” does not mean consensual sexual contact between an elderly person and:
(A) An employee of a facility who is also the spouse of the elderly person; or
(B) A paid caregiver.
(12) “Sexual contact” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163.305.
(13) “Verbal abuse” means  to threaten significant physical or emotional harm to an elderly
person or a person with a disability through the use of:
(a) Derogatory or inappropriate names, insults, verbal assaults, profanity or ridicule; or
(b) Harassment, coercion, threats,  intimidation, humiliation, mental cruelty or inappropriate
sexual comments.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 127.663 is amended to read:
127.663. As used in ORS 127.663 to 127.684:
(1) “Authorized user” means a person authorized by the Oregon Health Authority  to provide
information to or receive information from the POLST registry.
(2) “Life-sustaining treatment” means any medical  procedure, pharmaceutical, medical device or
medical intervention that maintains life by sustaining, restoring or supplanting  a vital function.
“Life-sustaining treatment” does not  include routine care necessary to sustain patient cleanliness
and comfort.
(3) “Naturopathic physician” has the meaning given the term in ORS 685.010.
(4) “Nurse practitioner” has the meaning given that term in ORS 678.010.
(5) “Physician” has the meaning given that term in ORS 677.010.
(6) “[ Physician assistant ]” “Physician associate”  has the meaning given that term in  ORS
677.495.
(7) “POLST” means a physician order for life-sustaining treatment signed by a physician,
naturopathic physician, nurse practitioner or [ physician assistant ] physician associate.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 18
(8) “POLST registry” means the registry established in ORS 127.666.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 127.700 is amended to read:
127.700. As used in ORS 127.700 to 127.737:
(1) “Attending physician” shall have the same meaning as provided in ORS 127.505.
(2) “Attorney-in-fact” means an adult validly appointed under ORS  127.540, 127.700 to 127.737
and 426.385 to make mental health treatment decisions for a principal under a declaration for mental
health treatment and also means an alternative attorney-in-fact.
(3) “Declaration” means a document  making a declaration of preferences or instructions re-
garding mental health treatment.
(4) “Health care facility” shall have the same meaning as provided in ORS 127.505.
(5) “Health care provider” shall have the same meaning as provided in ORS 127.505.
(6) “Incapable”  means that, in the opinion of the court in a protective proceeding under ORS
chapter 125, or the opinion of  two physicians, a person’s ability to receive and evaluate information
effectively or communicate  decisions is impaired to such an extent that the person currently lacks
the capacity to make mental health treatment decisions.
(7) “Mental  health treatment” means convulsive treatment, treatment of mental illness with
psychoactive medication, admission to and retention in a health care facility for  a period not to
exceed 17 days for care or treatment of mental illness, and outpatient services.
(8) “Outpatient services” means treatment for a mental or emotional  disorder that is obtained
by appointment and is provided by an outpatient service as defined in ORS 430.010.
(9) “Provider” means a mental health treatment provider, a [ physician assistant ] physician as-
sociate licensed under ORS  677.505 to 677.525 or a nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375
to 678.390.
(10) “Representative” means “attorney-in-fact” as defined in this section.
SECTION 35.
 ORS 135.139 is amended to read:
135.139. (1) When a person has been charged with a crime  in which it appears from the nature
of the charge that the transmission of body  fluids from one person to another may have been in-
volved, the district attorney, upon  the request of the victim or the parent or guardian of a minor
or incapacitated victim, shall seek the consent of the person charged to submit to a test for  HIV
and any other communicable disease. In the absence of such consent or failure  to submit to the test,
the district attorney shall petition the court for an order requiring  the person charged to submit to
a test for HIV and any other communicable disease.
(2)(a) At the time of an appearance before a circuit court  judge on a criminal charge, the judge
shall inform every person arrested and charged with a crime, in which it  appears from the nature
of the charge that the transmission of body  fluids from one person to another may have been in-
volved, of the availability of testing for HIV and other communicable diseases and shall  cause the
alleged victim of such  a crime, if any, or a parent or guardian of the victim, if any, to be notified
that testing  for HIV and other communicable diseases is available. The judge shall inform the person
arrested and charged and the victim, or parent or guardian of the  victim, of the availability of
counseling under the circumstances described in subsection (7) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 433.045, when the district attorney  files a petition
under subsection (1) of this  section, the court shall order the person charged to submit to testing
if the court determines there is probable cause to believe that:
(A) The person charged committed the crime; and
(B) The victim has received  a substantial exposure, as defined by rule of the Oregon Health
Authority.
(c) If the district attorney files a petition under  subsection (1) of this section at or before the
defendant’s arraignment on the indictment or information and the court orders the defendant to
submit to testing, the testing must be done within 48 hours of the defendant’s arraignment.
(d) The results of the test described  in this subsection must be provided to the victim of the
crime, or a parent or guardian of the victim, and to the defendant, as soon as practicable.
(e) Any necessary follow-up testing must be provided as medically appropriate.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 19
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 433.045, upon conviction of a person for any crime
in which the court determines from the facts that the transmission of body  fluids from one person
to another was involved and if the person has not been tested pursuant to subsection (2) of  this
section, the court  shall seek the consent of the convicted person to submit to a test for HIV and
other communicable diseases. In  the absence of such consent or failure to submit to the test, the
court shall order the convicted person to  submit to the test if the victim of the crime, or a parent
or guardian of the victim, requests the court to make such order.
(4) When a test is ordered under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the victim of  the crime or
a parent or guardian of the victim, shall designate an attending  physician, a [ physician assistant ]
physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or a  nurse practitioner licensed under
ORS 678.375 to 678.390 to receive such information on behalf of the victim.
(5) If an HIV test results in a negative reaction,  the court may order the person to submit to
another HIV test six months after the first test was administered.
(6) The result of any test ordered under  this section is not a public record and shall be available
only to:
(a) The victim.
(b) The parent or guardian of a minor or incapacitated victim.
(c) The attending physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner.
(d) The Oregon Health Authority.
(e) The person tested.
(7) If an HIV test ordered under this  section results in a positive reaction, the individual subject
to the test shall receive  post-test counseling as required by the Oregon Health Authority by rule.
The results of HIV tests ordered under  this section shall be reported to the authority. Counseling
and referral for appropriate health care, testing and support  services as directed by the Director
of the Oregon Health Authority shall be  provided to the victim or victims at the request of the
victim or victims, or the parent or guardian of a minor or incapacitated victim.
(8) The costs of testing and  counseling provided under subsections (2), (3) and (7) of this section
shall be paid through the compensation for crime victims program authorized  by ORS 147.005 to
147.367 from amounts appropriated for such purposes. Restitution  to the state for payment of the
costs of any counseling provided under this section and for payment of the costs of any test  ordered
under this  section shall be included by the court in any order requiring the convicted person to pay
restitution.
(9) When a court orders a convicted person to submit to a test under this section, the with-
drawal of blood may be  performed only by a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677, a [ physician
assistant] physician associate  licensed  under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or a nurse practitioner li-
censed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390, or by another licensed health care provider  acting within the
provider’s licensed scope of practice or acting under the supervision of a physician licensed  under
ORS chapter 677, a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525
or a nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390.
(10) No person authorized by  subsection (9) of this section to withdraw blood, no person assist-
ing in the performance of the test nor any medical care  facility where blood is withdrawn or tested
that has been ordered by  the court to withdraw or test blood shall be liable in any civil or criminal
action when the act is performed in a reasonable manner according to  generally accepted medical
practices.
(11) The results of tests  or reports, or information therein, obtained under this section shall be
confidential and shall not  be divulged to any person not authorized by this section to receive the
information. Any violation of this subsection is a Class C misdemeanor.
(12) As used in this section:
(a) “HIV test” means a test as defined in ORS 433.045.
(b) “Parent or guardian of the victim” means a custodial parent or legal  guardian of a victim
who is a minor or incapacitated person.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 20
(c) “Positive reaction” means a positive HIV test with  a positive confirmatory test result as
specified by the Oregon Health Authority.
(d) “Transmission of body fluids” means the transfer of  blood, semen, vaginal secretions or other
body fluids identified by rule of the authority,  from the perpetrator of a crime to the mucous mem-
branes or potentially broken skin of the victim.
(e) “Victim” means the person or persons to whom transmission  of body fluids from the
perpetrator of the crime occurred or was likely to have occurred in the course of the crime.
SECTION 36.  ORS 136.220 is amended to read:
136.220. A  challenge for implied bias shall be allowed for any of the following causes and for
no other:
(1) Consanguinity or affinity within the fourth  degree to the person alleged to be injured by the
offense charged in the accusatory instrument, to the complainant or to the defendant.
(2) Standing in the relation of guardian and  ward, attorney and client, physician and patient,
naturopathic physician and patient,  [ physician assistant ] physician associate  and patient, nurse
practitioner and patient, master and servant, debtor and creditor, principal and agent  or landlord
and tenant with the:
(a) Defendant;
(b) Person alleged to be injured by the offense charged in the accusatory instrument; or
(c) Complainant.
(3) Being a member of the family, a partner in business with  or in the employment of any person
referred to in  subsection (2)(a), (b) or (c) of this section or a surety in the action or otherwise for
the defendant.
(4) Having served  on the grand jury which found the indictment or on a jury of inquest which
inquired into the death of a person whose death is the subject of the indictment or information.
(5) Having been one of a jury formerly sworn in  the same action, and whose verdict was set
aside or which was discharged without a verdict after the cause was submitted to it.
(6) Having served as a juror in a civil action, suit or proceeding brought against  the defendant
for substantially the same act charged as an offense.
(7) Having served as a juror in a criminal action upon substantially the same  facts, transaction
or criminal episode.
SECTION 37.
 ORS 137.076 is amended to read:
137.076. (1) This section applies to any person convicted of:
(a) A felony;
(b) Sexual abuse in the third degree or public indecency;
(c) Conspiracy or attempt to commit rape in the  third degree, sodomy in the third degree, sexual
abuse in the second degree, burglary in the second degree or promoting prostitution; or
(d) Murder or aggravated murder.
(2) When a person is convicted of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The person shall, whether or not ordered to do so by the court  under paragraph (b) of this
subsection, provide a blood or buccal sample  at the request of the appropriate agency designated in
paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(b) The court shall include in the judgment of conviction an order stating  that a blood or buccal
sample is required to be obtained at the request of the appropriate agency and,  unless the convicted
person lacks the ability to pay, that the person shall reimburse the appropriate agency for  the cost
of obtaining and transmitting the blood or buccal  sample. If the judgment sentences the convicted
person to probation, the court shall order the convicted person to submit  to the obtaining of a blood
or buccal sample as a condition of the probation.
(c) The appropriate agency shall cause  a blood or buccal sample to be obtained and transmitted
to the Department of State Police. The agency shall cause the sample to be obtained  as soon as
practicable after conviction. The agency shall obtain  the convicted person’s thumbprint at the same
time the agency obtains  the blood or buccal sample. The agency shall include the thumbprint with
the identifying information that accompanies the sample. Whenever an agency is notified by  the
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 21
Department of State Police that a sample is not  adequate for analysis, the agency shall obtain and
transmit a blood sample. The appropriate agency shall be:
(A) The Department of Corrections, whenever the convicted person is committed  to the legal
and physical custody of the department.
(B) In all other cases, the law enforcement agency attending upon the court.
(3)(a) A blood sample may only be drawn in a medically acceptable manner  by a licensed phy-
sician, a person acting under the direction or control of a licensed physician, a [ physician
assistant] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525, a nurse licensed  under ORS
chapter 678 or a qualified medical technician.
(b) A buccal sample may be obtained by anyone authorized to do so by the appropriate agency.
The person obtaining the buccal sample shall follow the collection procedures established by the
Department of State Police.
(c) A person authorized by this subsection to obtain a blood or buccal sample shall not be held
civilly liable for obtaining a sample in accordance  with this subsection and subsection (2) of this
section, ORS 161.325 and 419C.473. The sample shall also be obtained and  transmitted in accordance
with any procedures that may be established  by the Department of State Police. However, no test
result or opinion based upon a test result shall  be rendered inadmissible as evidence solely because
of deviations from procedures adopted by  the Department of State Police that do not affect the re-
liability of the opinion or test result.
(4) No sample is required to be obtained if:
(a) The Department of State  Police notifies the court or the appropriate agency that it has
previously received an adequate blood or buccal sample obtained from the  convicted person in ac-
cordance with this section or ORS 161.325 or 419C.473; or
(b) The court  determines that obtaining a sample would create a substantial and unreasonable
risk to the health of the convicted person.
(5) The provisions of subsections (1) to (4)  of this section apply to any person who, on or after
September 29, 1991, is serving a  term of incarceration as a sentence or as a condition of probation
imposed for  conviction of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section, and any such person
shall submit to  the obtaining of a blood or buccal sample. Before releasing any such person from
incarceration, the supervisory authority shall cause  a blood or buccal sample and the person’s
thumbprint to be obtained and transmitted in accordance with subsections (1) to (4) of this section.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 137.473 is amended to read:
137.473. (1) The punishment of death shall  be inflicted by the intravenous administration of a
lethal quantity of an ultra-short-acting barbiturate in combination  with a chemical paralytic agent
and potassium chloride or other equally effective substances sufficient to cause  death. The judgment
shall be executed by the superintendent  of the Department of Corrections institution in which the
execution takes place, or by the designee of that superintendent. All executions  shall take place
within the enclosure of a Department of Corrections institution designated by the Director of  the
Department of Corrections. The superintendent of the institution shall be present at  the execution
and shall invite the presence of one or  more physicians, [ physician assistants ] physician associates
or nurse practitioners, the Attorney General, the sheriff  of the county in which the judgment was
rendered and representatives from the media. At the request of the  defendant, the superintendent
shall allow no more than two members  of the clergy designated by the defendant to be present at
the execution. At the discretion of  the superintendent, no more than five friends and relatives des-
ignated by  the defendant may be present at the execution. The superintendent shall allow the pres-
ence of any peace officers as the superintendent thinks expedient.
(2) The person who administers the lethal injection under subsection (1) of this section shall  not
thereby be considered to be engaged in the practice of medicine.
(3)(a) Any wholesale distributor drug outlet, as defined  in ORS 689.005, registered with the State
Board of Pharmacy under ORS 689.305 may provide the lethal substance or substances  described in
subsection (1) of  this section upon written order of the Director of the Department of Corrections,
accompanied by a certified copy of the judgment of the court imposing the punishment.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 22
(b) For  purposes of ORS 689.527 (7) the director shall be considered authorized to purchase the
lethal substance or substances described in subsection (1) of this section.
(c) The  lethal substance or substances described in subsection (1) of this section are not con-
trolled substances when purchased, possessed or used for purposes of this section.
(4) The superintendent may require that persons who are present at the execution under  sub-
section (1) of this section view the initial execution procedures, prior to the  point of the adminis-
tration of the  lethal injection, by means of a simultaneous closed-circuit television transmission
under the direction and control of the superintendent.
SECTION 39.  ORS 137.476 is amended to read:
137.476. (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a  licensed health care professional or a nonlicensed
medically trained person may assist the Department of  Corrections in an execution carried out un-
der ORS 137.473.
(2) Any assistance rendered in  an execution carried out under ORS 137.473 by a licensed health
care professional or a nonlicensed medically trained  person is not cause for disciplinary measures
or regulatory oversight by any board, commission or agency created by this state or  governed by
state law that oversees or regulates the practice of health care professionals including,  but not
limited to, the Oregon Medical Board, the Oregon State Board of  Nursing and the Oregon Health
Authority.
(3) The infliction of the punishment of death by the administration of the required lethal sub-
stances in the manner required by ORS 137.473 may not  be construed to be the practice of medicine.
(4) As used in  this section, “licensed health care professional” includes, but is not limited to, a
physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate , nurse practitioner or nurse licensed by the
Oregon Medical Board or the Oregon State Board of Nursing  or an emergency medical services
provider licensed by the Oregon Health Authority.
SECTION 40.  ORS 146.181 is amended to read:
146.181. (1) When a person is reported as missing to any city, county or state police agency, the
agency, within 12 hours thereafter, shall  enter into state and federal records maintained for that
purpose, a report of  the missing person in a format and according to procedures established by the
authorities responsible respectively for the state and federal records.
(2) The law enforcement agency to which the report is made:
(a) May request from the person making the report information or material likely  to be useful
in identifying the missing person or the human remains of the missing person, including,  but not
limited to:
(A) The name of the missing person and any alternative names the person uses;
(B) The date of birth of the missing person;
(C) A physical description of the missing person, including the height,  weight, gender, race, eye
color, current hair color and natural hair color of the missing person, any  identifying marks on the
missing person, any prosthetics used  by, or surgical implants in, the missing person and any physical
anomalies of the missing person;
(D) The blood type of the missing person;
(E) The driver license number of the missing person;
(F) The Social Security number of the missing person;
(G) A recent photograph of the missing person;
(H) A description of the clothing the missing person is believed to have been wearing at the time
the person disappeared;
(I) A description of items that the missing person is believed to have had with the person at the
time the person disappeared;
(J) Telephone numbers and electronic mail addresses of the missing person;
(K) The name and address of any school the missing person attends;
(L) The name and address of any employer of the missing person;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 23
(M) The name and address  of the physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate ,
naturopathic physician, nurse practitioner or dentist who provides health care services  to the
missing person;
(N) A description of any vehicle that the missing person  might have been driving or riding in
when the person disappeared;
(O) The  reasons why the person making the missing person report believes the person is missing;
(P) Any circumstances that indicate that the missing person may be at risk of injury or death;
(Q) Any circumstances that may indicate that the disappearance is not voluntary;
(R) Information  about a known or possible abductor or a person who was last seen with the
missing person; and
(S) The date of the last contact with the missing person.
(b) May request in writing from any dentist, denturist, physician, [ physician assistant ] physician
associate, naturopathic physician, nurse practitioner, optometrist or  other medical practitioner
possessing  it  such medical, dental or other physically descriptive information as is likely to be useful
in identifying the missing person or the human remains of the missing person.
(3) The law enforcement agency, upon  obtaining information pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, shall make a supplementary entry of  that information into the state and federal records
described in subsection (1) of this section. The supplementary report shall be in a  format and ac-
cording to procedures  established by the authorities responsible respectively for the state and fed-
eral records.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 146.750 is amended to read:
146.750. (1) Except as required in subsection (3) of this section, a  physician, including an intern
and resident, a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525, a
naturopathic  physician  licensed under ORS chapter 685 or a registered nurse licensed under ORS
chapter 678, who has  reasonable cause to suspect that a person brought to the physician, [ physician
assistant] physician associate , naturopathic physician or registered nurse or coming before the
physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate, naturopathic physician  or registered nurse for
examination, care or treatment has had injury inflicted upon the person  other than by accidental
means, shall report or cause reports to be made in accordance with the  provisions of subsection (2)
of this section.
(2) An oral report must be made immediately  by telephone or otherwise, and followed as soon
thereafter as possible by a report in writing, to an appropriate law enforcement agency.
(3) When an injury, or abuse as  defined in ORS 419B.005, occurs to an unmarried person who
is under 18 years of age, the provisions of ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050 apply.
SECTION 42.  ORS 147.403 is amended to read:
147.403. (1) Each hospital, emergency  medical service provider, intermediate care facility, skilled
nursing facility, long term  care facility and residential care facility in this state shall adopt policies
for the treatment or referral of acute sexual assault patients, if such policies are  not otherwise
provided for by statute or administrative rule.
(2)(a) Each hospital, emergency medical service provider, intermediate care facility, skilled
nursing facility, long term care  facility and residential care facility in this state that performs
forensic medical examinations of sexual assault patients shall:
(A) Adopt, in addition to the facility’s own guidelines, if any, the State of  Oregon Medical
Guideline for Sexual Assault Evaluation of Adolescent and Adult Patients  developed and published
by the Attorney General’s Sexual Assault Task Force.
(B) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, employ or contract with at least one
sexual assault forensic examiner who has completed didactic training sufficient to satisfy the  train-
ing requirement for certification by the Oregon SAE/SANE  Certification Commission established by
the Attorney General.
(b) Paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection does not  apply to a hospital that performs forensic med-
ical examinations only of sexual assault patients who are minors. A hospital described in this par-
agraph may use physicians,  [ physician assistants ] physician associates  licensed under ORS 677.505
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 24
to 677.525, naturopathic physicians licensed under ORS chapter  685 and nurses to conduct the ex-
aminations in consultation  with a social worker trained in assisting sexual assault victims who are
minors.
SECTION 43.  ORS 169.076 is amended to read:
169.076. Each local correctional facility shall:
(1) Provide sufficient staff to perform all  audio and visual functions involving security, control,
custody and supervision of all confined detainees  and prisoners, with personal inspection at least
once each hour. The supervision may include the use of electronic monitoring equipment when  ap-
proved by  the Department of Corrections and the governing body of the jurisdiction in which the
facility is located.
(2) Have a comprehensive written policy with respect to:
(a) Legal confinement authority.
(b) Denial of admission.
(c) Telephone calls.
(d) Admission and release medical procedures.
(e) Medication and prescriptions.
(f) Personal property accountability that complies with ORS 133.455.
(g) Vermin and communicable disease control.
(h) Release process to include authority, identification and return of personal property.
(i) Rules of the facility governing correspondence and visitations.
(3) Formulate and publish plans to meet emergencies involving escape, riots,  assaults, fires, re-
bellions and other types of emergencies, and regulations for the operation of the facility.
(4) Not administer any physical punishment to any prisoner at any time.
(5) Provide for emergency medical and dental health, having written policies providing for:
(a) Review of the facility’s medical and dental plans by a licensed physician, [ physician
assistant] physician associate, naturopathic physician or nurse practitioner.
(b) The security of medication and medical supplies.
(c) A  medical and dental record system to include request for medical and dental attention,
treatment prescribed, prescriptions, special diets and other services provided.
(d) First aid supplies and staff first aid training.
(6) Prohibit firearms from the security area of the facility except in times of emergency as de-
termined by the administrator of the facility.
(7) Ensure that confined detainees and prisoners:
(a) Will be fed daily  at least three meals served at regular times, with no more than 14 hours
between meals except when routinely absent from the facility for work or other purposes.
(b) Will be fed nutritionally adequate meals in accordance with  a plan reviewed by a registered
dietitian or the Oregon Health Authority.
(c) Be provided special diets as prescribed by the facility’s designated physician, [ physician as-
sistant] physician associate, naturopathic physician or nurse practitioner.
(d) Shall have food  procured, stored, prepared, distributed and served under sanitary conditions,
as defined by the authority under ORS 624.041.
(8) Ensure that the facility be clean, and provide each confined detainee or prisoner:
(a) Materials to maintain personal hygiene.
(b) Clean clothing twice weekly.
(c) Mattresses and blankets that are clean and fire-retardant.
(9) Require each prisoner to shower at least twice weekly.
(10) Forward, without examination or censorship, each prisoner’s  outgoing written communi-
cations to the Governor,  jail administrator, Attorney General, judge, Department of Corrections or
the attorney of the prisoner.
(11) Keep the facility safe and secure in accordance with the State of Oregon Structural  Spe-
cialty Code and Fire and Life Safety Code.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 25
(12) Have and  provide each prisoner with written rules for prisoner conduct and disciplinary
procedures. If a prisoner cannot read or is unable to  understand the written rules, the information
shall be conveyed to the prisoner orally.
(13) Not restrict the  free exercise of religion unless failure to impose the restriction will cause
a threat to facility or order.
(14) Safeguard and ensure that the prisoner’s legal rights to access to  legal materials are pro-
tected.
(15) In addition to the items  listed in subsection (8) of this section, make available tampons,
sanitary pads, postpartum pads and panty liners at no cost to all confined detainees and  prisoners
for use in connection with vaginal discharge. Facilities shall maintain a  sufficient supply, which
shall be stored, dispensed and disposed of in a sanitary manner. The supply  of products available
shall include at least the following:
(a) Regular absorbent and super absorbent tampons;
(b) Regular absorbent and super absorbent sanitary pads;
(c) Postpartum pads; and
(d) Regular absorbent panty liners.
SECTION 44.
 ORS 169.077 is amended to read:
169.077. Each lockup facility shall:
(1) Maintain 24-hour supervision when  persons are confined. The supervision may include the
use of electronic monitoring equipment when approved by the Department of  Corrections and the
governing body of the jurisdiction in which the facility is located.
(2) Make a personal inspection of each person confined at least once each hour.
(3) Prohibit firearms from the security area of the facility except in times of emergency as de-
termined by the administrator of the facility.
(4) Ensure that confined detainees  and prisoners will be fed daily at least three nutritionally
adequate meals served at regular times, with no more  than 14 hours between meals except when
routinely absent from the facility for work or other such purposes.
(5) Forward, without examination or censorship, each prisoner’s  outgoing written communi-
cations to the Governor, jail administrator, Attorney General, judge, Department  of Corrections or
the attorney of the prisoner.
(6) Provide rules of the facility governing correspondence and visitations.
(7) Keep  the facility safe and secure in accordance with the State of Oregon Structural Specialty
Code and Fire and Life Safety Code.
(8) Formulate and publish  plans to meet emergencies involving escape, riots, assaults, fires, re-
bellions and other types of emergencies, and policies and  regulations for the operation of the facil-
ity.
(9) Ensure that the facility be clean, provide mattresses and blankets that are clean  and fire-
retardant, and furnish materials to maintain personal hygiene.
(10) Provide for emergency medical and dental health, having written policies  providing for re-
view of the facility’s medical and dental plans by a  licensed physician, [ physician assistant ] physi-
cian associate, naturopathic physician or nurse practitioner.
(11) In addition to the items  listed in subsection (9) of this section, make available tampons,
sanitary pads, postpartum pads and panty liners at no cost to all confined detainees and  prisoners
for use in connection with vaginal discharge. Facilities shall maintain a  sufficient supply, which
shall be stored, dispensed and disposed of in a sanitary manner. The supply  of products available
shall include at least the following:
(a) Regular absorbent and super absorbent tampons;
(b) Regular absorbent and super absorbent sanitary pads;
(c) Postpartum pads; and
(d) Regular absorbent panty liners.
SECTION 45.
 ORS 169.750 is amended to read:
169.750. A juvenile detention facility may not:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 26
(1) Impose upon a detained juvenile for purposes  of discipline or punishment any infliction of
or threat of physical injury or pain, deliberate humiliation, physical  restraint, withholding of meals,
or isolation, or detention under conditions that violate the provisions of subsections (2) to  (8) of this
section or ORS 169.076 (7) to (11) or (13) to (15) or 169.740;
(2) Use any physical force, other means of physical control or isolation upon a  detained juvenile
except as reasonably necessary and justified to prevent escape from the facility, physical  injury to
another person, to protect a detained juvenile from physical self-injury or to prevent  destruction of
property, or to effectuate the confinement of the juvenile in  roomlock or isolation as provided for
in ORS 169.090, 169.730 to 169.800, 419A.050 and 419A.052, and for only so long  as it appears that
the danger exists. A use of force or other physical means of control may not employ:
(a) The  use of restraining devices for a purpose other than to prevent physical injury or escape,
or, in any case, for a period in excess of six hours. However, the  time during which a detained ju-
venile is being transported to another facility pursuant to court order shall not be  counted within
the six hours; or
(b) Isolation for a period in excess of six hours;
(3) Use roomlock except for the discipline and punishment of a  detained juvenile for violation
of a rule of conduct or behavior of the facility as provided for  in ORS 169.076 (12) or for conduct
that constitutes a crime under the laws of this state or that  would justify physical force, control or
isolation under subsection (2) of this section;
(4) Cause to be made an internal examination  of a detained juvenile’s anus or vagina, except
upon probable cause that contraband, as defined in ORS 162.135 (1), will be  found upon such exam-
ination and then only by a physician  licensed under ORS chapter 677, naturopathic physician li-
censed under ORS chapter 685, [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505
to 677.525 or nurse licensed under ORS chapter 678;
(5)(a) Administer to  any detained juvenile medication, except upon the informed consent of the
juvenile or in the case of an imminent  threat to the life of the juvenile or where the juvenile has
a contagious or communicable disease that poses an imminent threat to the  health of other persons
in the facility. However, prescription medication may not be  administered except upon a written
prescription or written order by a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677,  [ physician assistant ]
physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to  677.525, nurse practitioner licensed under ORS
678.375 to 678.390, naturopathic  physician licensed under ORS chapter 685 or dentist licensed under
ORS chapter 679,  and administered by a person authorized under ORS chapter 677, 678 or 679 to
administer medication. Facility  staff not otherwise authorized by law to administer medications may
administer noninjectable medications in accordance with rules adopted by the Oregon  State Board
of Nursing pursuant to ORS 678.150 (8);
(b) Nonmedical personnel shall receive training for administering medications, including recog-
nition of and response to  drug reactions and unanticipated side effects, from the responsible physi-
cian, [ physician assistant ] physician associate , naturopathic physician or nurse and the official
responsible  for  the facility. All personnel shall be responsible for administering the dosage
medications according to orders and for recording the  administrations of the dosage in a manner
and on a form approved  by the responsible physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate ,
naturopathic physician or nurse practitioner; and
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, medication may  not be administered unless a
physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525,
naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685 or nurse licensed  under ORS chapter 678 is
either physically on the premises or readily available by telephone and within 30 minutes travel time
of the patient;
(6) Administer to any detained  juvenile any medication or medical procedure for purposes of
experimentation;
(7) Discipline or punish any juvenile for conduct or behavior by roomlock,  for a period in excess
of 12 hours, or by denial of any privilege, regularly awarded other detained  adults or juveniles, for
more than one day, except after:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 27
(a) Advising the juvenile in writing of the alleged offensive conduct or behavior;
(b) Providing the juvenile the opportunity to a hearing before  a staff member who was not a
witness to the alleged offensive conduct or behavior;
(c) Providing the juvenile the  opportunity to produce witnesses and evidence and to cross-
examine witnesses;
(d) Providing  the detained juvenile the opportunity to testify, at the sole option of the juvenile;
and
(e) A finding  that the alleged conduct or behavior was proven by a preponderance of the evi-
dence and that it violated  a rule of conduct or behavior of the facility as provided for in ORS
169.076 (12) or constituted a crime under the laws of this state; and
(8) Detain juveniles with emotional disturbances, mental retardation or physical  disabilities on
the same charges and circumstances for which other  juveniles would have been released or provided
with another alternative.
SECTION 46.
 ORS 192.547 is amended to read:
192.547. (1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall  adopt rules for conducting research using
DNA samples,  genetic testing and genetic information. Rules establishing minimum research stand-
ards shall conform to the Federal Policy for the Protection of Human  Subjects, 45 C.F.R. 46, that is
current at the time the rules are adopted. The rules may be changed from time to time as may  be
necessary.
(b) The rules adopted by the Oregon Health Authority shall address  the operation and appoint-
ment of institutional  review boards. The rules shall conform to the compositional and operational
standards for such boards contained in the Federal  Policy for the Protection of Human Subjects that
is current at the time the rules are adopted. The rules must require that research conducted under
paragraph (a) of this subsection be conducted with the approval of the institutional review board.
(c) Persons proposing to conduct  anonymous research, coded research or genetic research that
is otherwise thought to be  exempt from review must obtain from an institutional review board prior
to conducting such research a determination that the proposed research is exempt from review.
(2) A person proposing to conduct research under subsection (1) of  this section, including
anonymous research or coded research, must disclose to the institutional review board the proposed
use of DNA samples, genetic testing or genetic information.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority  shall adopt rules requiring that all institutional review boards
operating under subsection (1)(b) of this section register with the department. The  Advisory Com-
mittee on Genetic  Privacy and Research shall use the registry to educate institutional review boards
about the purposes and  requirements of the genetic privacy statutes and administrative rules relat-
ing to genetic research.
(4) The Oregon Health Authority shall consult with the Advisory Committee on Genetic  Privacy
and Research before  adopting the rules required under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, in-
cluding rules identifying those parts of the Federal Policy  for the Protection of Human Subjects that
are applicable to this section.
(5) Genetic research in which the DNA sample or genetic information is coded shall satisfy  the
following  requirements:
(a)(A) The subject has granted informed consent for the specific research project;
(B) The subject has consented to genetic research generally; or
(C) The DNA sample or genetic  information is derived from a biological specimen or from clin-
ical individually identifiable  health information that was obtained or retained in compliance with
ORS 192.537 (2).
(b) The research  has been approved by an institutional review board after disclosure by the in-
vestigator to the board of risks associated with the coding.
(c) The code is:
(A) Not derived from individual identifiers;
(B) Kept securely and separately from the DNA samples and genetic information; and
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 28
(C) Not accessible to the  investigator unless specifically approved by the institutional review
board.
(d) Data is stored securely  in password protected electronic files or by other means with access
limited to necessary personnel.
(e) The data is  limited to elements required for analysis and meets the criteria in 45 C.F.R
164.514(e) for a limited data set.
(f) The investigator is a party to the data use agreement  as provided by 45 C.F.R. 164.514(e) for
limited data set recipients.
(6) Research conducted in accordance with this section is rebuttably presumed to  comply with
ORS 192.535 and 192.539.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 192.535, a person may use a  DNA sample or genetic information
obtained, with blanket informed consent, before June 25, 2001, for genetic research.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 192.535, a person may use a DNA sample or genetic information ob-
tained without specific  informed consent and derived from a biological specimen or clinical individ-
ually identifiable health information for anonymous research  or coded research if an institutional
review board operating under subsection (1)(b) of this section:
(A) Waives or alters the consent requirements pursuant to the Federal Policy for the Protection
of Human Subjects; and
(B) Waives  authorization pursuant to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountabil-
ity Act privacy regulations, 45 C.F.R. parts 160 and 164.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (5)(a) of this  section or paragraph (b) of this subsection, a
person must have specific informed consent from an individual  to use a DNA sample or genetic in-
formation of the individual obtained on or after June 25, 2001, for genetic research.
(8) Except as otherwise allowed by rule of the Oregon Health Authority,  if DNA samples or
genetic information obtained for either clinical or  research purposes is used in research, a person
may not recontact the individual or the physician,  [ physician assistant ] physician associate ,
naturopathic physician or nurse practitioner of the individual by using research information that  is
identifiable or coded.  The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt by rule criteria for recontacting an
individual or the physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate , naturopathic  physician or
nurse practitioner of an individual. In adopting the criteria, the department shall consider the  re-
commendations of national organizations such as those created by executive order by  the President
of the United States and the recommendations of the Advisory  Committee on Genetic Privacy and
Research.
(9) The requirements for consent to, or notification of, obtaining  a DNA sample or genetic in-
formation for genetic research are governed  by the provisions of ORS 192.531 to 192.549 and the
administrative rules that were in effect on the effective date of  the institutional review board’s most
recent approval of the study.
SECTION 47.  ORS 192.556 is amended to read:
192.556. As used in ORS 192.553 to 192.581:
(1) “Authorization” means  a document written in plain language that contains at least the fol-
lowing:
(a) A description of the information to be used  or disclosed that identifies the information in a
specific and meaningful way;
(b) The name  or other specific identification of the person or persons authorized to make the
requested use or disclosure;
(c) The name or other specific identification  of the person or persons to whom the covered en-
tity may make the requested use or disclosure;
(d) A description of each purpose of  the requested use or disclosure, including but not limited
to a statement that the use or disclosure is at the request of the individual;
(e) An expiration date or an expiration event that relates to the  individual or the purpose of the
use or disclosure;
(f) The signature of the individual or personal representative of the individual and the date;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 29
(g) A description of the authority of the personal representative, if applicable; and
(h) Statements adequate to place the individual on notice of the following:
(A) The individual’s right to revoke the authorization in writing;
(B) The exceptions to the right to revoke the authorization;
(C) The ability or inability to condition treatment, payment, enrollment or  eligibility for benefits
on whether the individual signs the authorization; and
(D) The potential for information disclosed pursuant to the authorization to be subject to
redisclosure by the recipient and no longer protected.
(2) “Covered entity” means:
(a) A state health plan;
(b) A health insurer;
(c) A health care provider  that transmits any health information in electronic form to carry out
financial or administrative activities in connection  with a transaction covered by ORS 192.553 to
192.581; or
(d) A health care clearinghouse.
(3) “Health care” means care, services or supplies related to the health of an individual.
(4) “Health care operations” includes but is not limited to:
(a) Quality assessment, accreditation, auditing and improvement activities;
(b) Case management and care coordination;
(c) Reviewing the competence, qualifications or performance of health  care providers or health
insurers;
(d) Underwriting activities;
(e) Arranging for legal services;
(f) Business planning;
(g) Customer services;
(h) Resolving internal grievances;
(i) Creating deidentified information; and
(j) Fundraising.
(5) “Health care provider” includes but is not limited to:
(a) A psychologist, occupational therapist, regulated social worker, professional counselor  or
marriage and family  therapist licensed or otherwise authorized to practice under ORS chapter 675
or an employee of the psychologist, occupational therapist, regulated  social worker, professional
counselor or marriage and family therapist;
(b) A physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS chapter  677,
an acupuncturist licensed  under ORS 677.759 or an employee of the physician, [ physician assistant ]
physician associate or acupuncturist;
(c) A nurse or nursing home administrator licensed  under ORS chapter 678 or an employee of
the nurse or nursing home administrator;
(d) A dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679 or an employee of the dentist;
(e) A dental hygienist or denturist licensed under ORS chapter 680 or an employee of  the dental
hygienist or denturist;
(f) A  speech-language pathologist or audiologist licensed under ORS chapter 681 or an employee
of the speech-language pathologist or audiologist;
(g) An emergency medical services provider licensed under ORS chapter 682;
(h) An optometrist licensed under ORS chapter 683 or an employee of the optometrist;
(i) A chiropractic physician licensed under ORS chapter 684 or an employee  of the chiropractic
physician;
(j) A naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter  685 or an employee of the naturopathic
physician;
(k) A massage therapist licensed under ORS 687.011 to 687.250 or an employee  of the massage
therapist;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 30
(L) A direct entry midwife licensed under ORS 687.405 to 687.495 or an employee  of the direct
entry midwife;
(m) A physical therapist licensed under ORS 688.010 to 688.201 or an employee of  the physical
therapist;
(n) A medical imaging licensee under ORS 688.405  to 688.605 or an employee of the medical
imaging licensee;
(o) A respiratory care  practitioner licensed under ORS 688.815 or an employee of the respiratory
care practitioner;
(p) A polysomnographic  technologist licensed under ORS 688.819 or an employee of the poly-
somnographic technologist;
(q) A pharmacist licensed under ORS chapter 689 or an employee of the pharmacist;
(r) A dietitian licensed under ORS 691.405 to 691.485 or an employee of the dietitian;
(s) A funeral service practitioner  licensed under ORS chapter 692 or an employee of the funeral
service  practitioner;
(t) A health care facility as defined in ORS 442.015;
(u) A home health agency as defined in ORS 443.014;
(v) A hospice program as defined in ORS 443.850;
(w) A clinical laboratory as defined in ORS 438.010;
(x) A pharmacy as defined in ORS 689.005; and
(y) Any other person or entity  that furnishes, bills for or is paid for health care in the normal
course of business.
(6) “Health information” means any oral or written information in any form or medium that:
(a) Is created or received by  a covered entity, a public health authority, an employer, a life
insurer, a school, a university or a health care provider that is not a covered entity; and
(b) Relates to:
(A) The past, present or future physical or mental health or condition of an individual;
(B) The provision of health care to an individual; or
(C) The past, present or future payment for the provision of health care to an individual.
(7) “Health insurer” means an insurer as defined in ORS 731.106 who offers:
(a) A health benefit plan as defined in ORS 743B.005;
(b) A short term health insurance policy, the  duration of which does not exceed three months
including renewals;
(c) A student health insurance policy;
(d) A Medicare supplemental policy; or
(e) A dental only policy.
(8) “Individually identifiable health information” means any  oral or written health information
in any form or medium that is:
(a) Created  or received by a covered entity, an employer or a health care provider that is not
a covered entity; and
(b) Identifiable to an individual,  including demographic information that identifies the individual,
or for which there is a reasonable basis to believe the information  can be used to identify an indi-
vidual, and that relates to:
(A) The past, present or future physical or mental health or condition of an individual;
(B) The provision of health care to an individual; or
(C) The past, present or future payment for the provision of health care to an individual.
(9) “Payment” includes but is not limited to:
(a) Efforts to obtain premiums or reimbursement;
(b) Determining eligibility or coverage;
(c) Billing activities;
(d) Claims management;
(e) Reviewing health care to determine medical necessity;
(f) Utilization review; and
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 31
(g) Disclosures to consumer reporting agencies.
(10) “Personal representative” includes but is not limited to:
(a) A person appointed as a guardian under ORS 125.305,  419B.372, 419C.481 or 419C.555 with
authority to make medical and health care decisions;
(b) A  person appointed as a health care representative under ORS 127.505 to 127.660 or a rep-
resentative under ORS 127.700 to 127.737 to make health care decisions or mental  health treatment
decisions;
(c) A person appointed as a personal representative under ORS chapter 113; and
(d) A person described in ORS 192.573.
(11)(a) “Protected health information”  means individually identifiable health information that is
maintained or transmitted in any form of electronic or other medium by a covered entity.
(b) “Protected health information”  does not mean individually identifiable health information in:
(A) Education records covered by  the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20
U.S.C. 1232g);
(B) Records described at 20 U.S.C. 1232g(a)(4)(B)(iv); or
(C) Employment records held by a covered entity in its role as employer.
(12) “State health plan” means:
(a) Medical assistance as defined in ORS 414.025;
(b) The Cover All People program; or
(c) Any medical assistance or premium assistance program operated by the Oregon  Health Au-
thority.
(13) “Treatment” includes but is not limited to:
(a) The provision, coordination or management of health care; and
(b) Consultations and referrals between health care providers.
SECTION 47a.
 ORS 315.616 is amended to read:
315.616. A resident or nonresident individual who is certified as eligible under ORS 442.561,
442.562, 442.563 or 442.564, and is licensed as a  physician under ORS chapter 677, licensed as a
[physician assistant ] physician associate under ORS [ chapter 677] 677.505 to 677.525 , licensed as a
nurse practitioner under  ORS [ chapter 678 ] 678.375 to 678.390 , licensed as a certified registered
nurse anesthetist [ under ORS chapter 678 ] as defined in ORS 678.010 , licensed as a  dentist under
ORS chapter 679 or licensed as an optometrist under ORS 683.010 to 683.340 is entitled to the  tax
credit described in ORS 315.613 even if not a member of the hospital medical staff  if the Office of
Rural Health certifies that the individual:
(1) Is engaged for at least 20 hours  per week, averaged over the month, during the tax year in
a rural practice; and
(2)(a) If a physician or a [ physician assistant ] physician associate , can cause a patient to be
admitted to the hospital;
(b) If a certified  registered nurse anesthetist, is employed by or has a contractual relationship
with one of the hospitals described in ORS 315.613 (1); or
(c) If an optometrist, has consulting privileges  with a hospital listed in ORS 315.613 (1). This
paragraph does not apply to  an optometrist who qualifies as a “frontier rural practitioner,” as de-
fined by the Office of Rural Health.
SECTION 48.  ORS 336.479 is amended to read:
336.479. (1) As used  in this section, “participation” means participation in sports practices and
actual interscholastic sports competition.
(2) Each school district shall require students  who participate in extracurricular sports in
grades 7 through 12 in the schools of the district to have a physical  examination prior to partic-
ipation. A person conducting the physical examination shall use a form  and protocol prescribed by
rule of the State Board of Education pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(3) A  school district shall require students who continue to participate in extracurricular sports
in grades 7 through 12 to have a physical examination once every two years.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 32
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this  section, a school district shall require a student who
is diagnosed with a significant illness or has had a major surgery  to have a physical examination
prior to further participation in extracurricular sports.
(5) Any physical examination required by this section shall be conducted by a:
(a) Physician possessing an unrestricted license to practice medicine;
(b) Licensed naturopathic physician;
(c) Licensed [ physician assistant ] physician associate;
(d) Licensed nurse practitioner; or
(e) Licensed chiropractic physician who has clinical training and experience  in detecting
cardiopulmonary diseases and defects.
(6) The State Board of Education shall by rule prescribe the  form and protocol to be used for
physical examinations required by this section.
SECTION 49.
 ORS 336.490 is amended to read:
336.490. (1) As used in this section, “health care professional” includes a chiropractic physician,
a naturopathic physician,  a psychologist, a physical therapist, an occupational therapist, a [ physician
assistant] physician associate or a nurse practitioner who is licensed or registered under the laws
of this state.
(2) A health care professional meets the  requirements of a qualified health care professional for
the purposes of  ORS 336.485 and 417.875 if the health care professional has a certificate as described
in subsection (3) of this section.
(3)(a) A health care professional  is eligible to receive a certificate for the purposes of ORS
336.485 and 417.875 if the health care professional successfully completes an online program that:
(A) Is established and maintained by Oregon Health and Science University;
(B) Establishes for health  care professionals a foundation of knowledge related to the assess-
ment, diagnosis and management of sports-related concussions; and
(C) Informs health care professionals of:
(i) The requirements imposed by ORS 336.485 and 417.875  and any other related legal require-
ments; and
(ii) Limitations of the training provided through the online program.
(b) For the online program, the university:
(A) Shall establish the program in consultation with health care professionals and  other
stakeholders who are appropriately qualified for consultations;
(B) Shall ensure  that the program is reviewed at least once every four years by health care
professionals and other stakeholders who are appropriately qualified to make the review;
(C) Shall include minimum  standards or clinical criteria that are evidence based and that in-
corporate best practices in  relation to the assessment, diagnosis and management of sports-related
concussions;  and
(D) May charge participants in the program a reasonable fee.
(4) Certificates issued by Oregon Health  and Science University under this section are valid for
a term of four years. A health care professional may continue to meet  the requirements of a qual-
ified health care  professional for the purposes of ORS 336.485 and 417.875 by renewing a certificate.
The university shall prescribe the requirements for renewal, including requirements for additional
training.
(5)(a) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, no civil  or criminal action, suit
or proceeding  may be commenced against Oregon Health and Science University, or any board
member, officer or employee of the university, as a result of the death or injury of a  member of a
school athletic team or nonschool athletic team if:
(A) The death or injury is related to a head  injury sustained during an athletic event or train-
ing; and
(B) The member received  a medical release from a health care professional who held a certif-
icate issued under this section.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 33
(b) The civil and criminal immunities imposed by  this subsection do not apply to an act or
omission that:
(A) Amounts to gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct; or
(B) Was performed by a board member, officer or employee  of the university if the board mem-
ber, officer or employee was providing  health care services as a health care professional when the
board member, officer or employee committed the act or omission.
SECTION 50.
 ORS 339.870 is amended to read:
339.870. (1)(a) A school administrator, teacher or other school employee designated by the school
administrator is not liable in a criminal action or for civil damages as a result of  the administration
of nonprescription medication, if the school administrator, teacher or other school employee in good
faith administers nonprescription medication to a student pursuant to  written permission and in-
structions of the student’s parents or guardian.
(b) A school administrator, teacher or other school employee may administer a short-acting
opioid antagonist to  a student who experienced or is experiencing an opioid overdose without writ-
ten permission and instructions of the student’s parents or guardian.
(2)(a) A school administrator, teacher or other school  employee designated by the school ad-
ministrator is not liable in a criminal action or for civil damages as a result of  the administration
of prescription medication, if the school administrator, teacher or  other school employee in compli-
ance with the instructions of a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate , nurse practi-
tioner, naturopathic physician or clinical  nurse specialist, in good faith administers prescription
medication to a  student pursuant to written permission and instructions of the student’s parents or
guardian.
(b) A person may not maintain an action for injury, death or loss that results from acts or
omissions of a school administrator, teacher or other school employee  during the administration of
a short-acting opioid antagonist as described  in subsection (1)(b) of this section unless it is alleged
and proved by the complaining party that the school administrator, teacher or other school  em-
ployee was grossly negligent in administering the short-acting opioid antagonist.
(c) Unless it is alleged and proved by the complaining party that the school district or  member
of the school district board was  grossly negligent in administering the short-acting opioid antag-
onist, a person may not maintain an action for damages for injury, death or loss that  results from
acts or omissions of a school district or members of the school district board during the adminis-
tration of a short-acting opioid antagonist:
(A) As described in subsection (1)(b) of this section; or
(B) By any  person who administers the short-acting opioid antagonist to a student or other in-
dividual who the person believes is experiencing an opioid overdose and the administration occurs
on school premises, including at a school, on school property under the jurisdiction of  the school
district or at any activity under the jurisdiction of the school district.
(3) The  civil and criminal immunities imposed by subsections (1) and (2)(a) of this section do not
apply to an act or omission amounting to gross negligence or willful and wanton misconduct.
SECTION 51.
 ORS 343.146 is amended to read:
343.146. (1) To  receive special education, children with disabilities shall be determined eligible
for special education services under a school district program approved under ORS 343.045 and as
provided under ORS 343.221.
(2) Before initially providing special education, the school district  shall ensure that a full and
individual evaluation  is conducted to determine the child’s eligibility for special education and the
child’s special educational needs.
(3) Eligibility for special education shall be determined pursuant to rules adopted by the State
Board of Education.
(4) Each school district shall conduct a reevaluation  of each child with a disability in accord-
ance with rules adopted by the State Board of Education.
(5) If a  medical examination is required as part of an initial evaluation or reevaluation, the ex-
amination must be given by:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 34
(a) A  physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 or by the appropriate authority in another state;
(b) A naturopathic physician licensed  under ORS chapter 685 or by the appropriate authority
in another state;
(c) A nurse practitioner licensed under  ORS 678.375 to 678.390 or by the appropriate authority
in another state; or
(d) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505  to 677.525 or by the
appropriate authority in another state.
(6) If a vision examination is required as part of an initial  evaluation or reevaluation, the ex-
amination must be given by:
(a) A  person licensed to practice optometry under ORS chapter 683 or by the appropriate au-
thority in another state; or
(b) A  physician who specializes in ophthalmology and who is licensed under ORS chapter 677
or by the appropriate authority in another state.
(7) If an audiological assessment is  required as part of an initial evaluation or reevaluation, the
assessment must be given by an audiologist licensed under ORS chapter 681 or by the appropriate
authority in another state.
(8) The information obtained in an examination or assessment performed under subsection (5),
(6) or  (7) of this section must be reported by the practitioner who performed the examination or
assessment to the school district in which the child is or will be enrolled.
SECTION 52.
 ORS 348.303 is amended to read:
348.303. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Designated service site” means a rural health clinic  as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395x(aa)(2), a
rural critical access  hospital as defined in ORS 442.470, a federally qualified health center as defined
in 42 U.S.C.  1396d(l)(2) or any geographic area, population group or facility that is located in Oregon
and has been designated by the Health Resources and Services Administration of the United  States
Department of Health and Human Services  as a health professional shortage area, a medically
underserved area or a medically underserved population.
(b) “Health care practitioner” means a:
(A) Physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(B) Dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679;
(C) Nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
(D) [ Physician assistant ] Physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525; or
(E) Certified registered nurse anesthetist licensed under ORS chapter 678.
(c) “Participant” means a person who has been selected by  the Oregon Health and Science
University to receive a scholarship under subsection (5) of this section.
(d) “Prospective health care practitioner” means a person who  has been accepted into, but has
not yet started, a health care program at the Oregon Health and  Science University that meets the
educational requirements for  licensure as a physician, dentist, nurse practitioner, [ physician assist-
ant] physician associate or certified registered nurse anesthetist.
(e) “Service agreement”  means the agreement executed by a prospective health care practitioner
under subsection (3) of this section.
(2) There is created the Scholars for a Healthy  Oregon Initiative, to be administered by the
Oregon Health and Science University pursuant to rules adopted by the university.
(3) A prospective health care practitioner who wishes to participate in  the initiative shall sub-
mit an application to the Oregon Health and Science University  in accordance with rules adopted
by the university. To be eligible to  be a participant in the initiative, a prospective health care
practitioner must:
(a) Have been accepted into,  but not yet started, the first year of the prospective health care
practitioner’s health care education at the Oregon Health and Science University;
(b) Be considered a resident of Oregon under the  university’s admission guidelines or qualify as
a student exempted from paying nonresident tuition under ORS 352.287;
(c) Execute a service agreement stating that:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 35
(A) Immediately upon  the prospective health care practitioner’s completion of the health care
education  degree,  residency or training, as established for each degree by the Oregon Health and
Science University by rule, the participant will practice as a health care  practitioner in a desig-
nated service site in this state approved by the university for one year longer than the number  of
years the participant spent in  the health care program for which the participant received a schol-
arship; and
(B) While practicing as a health care practitioner  in a designated service site, the participant
must see all patients, regardless of any patient’s ability to pay for services; and
(d) Meet other requirements established by the university by rule.
(4) The Oregon Health and Science University may select participants  from among the pro-
spective health care practitioners who submit applications as provided in subsection (3) of this  sec-
tion. The university shall give preference to prospective health care practitioners who are:
(a) Individuals admitted to the Oregon Health and Science University as a student  from rural
heritage, as defined by the university’s admission policy;
(b) First generation college students; or
(c) Individuals from a diverse or underrepresented community.
(5) The Oregon  Health and Science University shall provide a scholarship covering the entire
cost of tuition and fees for the participant’s health care education at the university.
(6) A participant receiving  a scholarship under subsection (5) of this section who fails to com-
plete the terms of  the service agreement shall repay the amount received plus an additional penalty
of 25 percent of the amount received to the Oregon Health and Science University. The total amount
to be paid to the university under this subsection shall be reduced for every full year that  the par-
ticipant complied with  the service agreement on a pro rata basis, as computed by the total number
of years agreed to in the service agreement.
(7) A participant receiving a scholarship under subsection (5) of this section who  fails to com-
plete the health care degree for which the  scholarship was awarded shall repay the amount received
to the Oregon Health and Science University.
(8) In the event that a participant is required  to repay the Oregon Health and Science Univer-
sity under subsection (6) or (7) of this section, the university may:
(a) Collect any amounts due;
(b) Have any amounts due be collected by  the Collections Unit in the Department of Revenue
under ORS 293.250; or
(c) Contract with a collections agency to collect any amounts due.
(9) Any moneys received or collected by the Oregon Health and Science University under  sub-
sections  (6) to (8) of this section shall be deposited into a separate fund held by the university for
the purpose of carrying out the  provisions of this section. The university may not use the moneys
in these funds for any other purpose.
(10) The  Oregon Health and Science University may accept funds from any public or private
source for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this section.
(11) Not  later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the Oregon Health and Science
University shall report to the Legislative Assembly on the status of the Scholars for  a Healthy
Oregon Initiative. The report shall include, for the previous biennium:
(a) The total number of active participants in the initiative; and
(b) A breakdown of active participants in the initiative by health care practitioner category.
SECTION 53.
 ORS 353.450 is amended to read:
353.450. (1)  It is the finding of the Legislative Assembly that there is need to provide programs
that will assist a rural community to recruit and retain physicians, [ physician assistants ] physician
associates and nurse practitioners. For that purpose:
(a) The Legislative Assembly supports the development at the Oregon  Health and Science Uni-
versity of an Area Health Education Center program as provided for under the United  States Public
Health Service Act, Section 781.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 36
(b) The university shall provide continuing education opportunities for persons licensed to
practice medicine under ORS chapter 677 who practice in rural areas of  this state in cooperation
with the  respective professional organizations, including the Oregon Medical Association and the
Oregon Society of Physician Assistants.
(c) The university shall seek funding through grants and other  means to implement and operate
a fellowship program for physicians, [ physician assistants ] physician associates and nurse practi-
tioners intending to practice in rural areas.
(2) With the moneys transferred to the Area Health Education Center  program by ORS 442.870,
the program shall:
(a) Establish educational opportunities for  emergency medical services providers in rural coun-
ties;
(b) Contract with educational facilities  qualified to conduct emergency medical training pro-
grams using a curriculum approved by  the Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Systems Pro-
gram; and
(c) Review requests for training funds  with input from the State Emergency Medical Service
Committee and other individuals with expertise in emergency medical services.
SECTION 54.  ORS 408.310 is amended to read:
408.310. (1) A physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505
to 677.525 or nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390 who has primary responsi-
bility for the treatment of a veteran who may have been exposed to causative agents while  serving
in the Armed Forces of the  United States or for the treatment of a veteran’s spouse, surviving
spouse or minor child who may be  exhibiting symptoms or conditions that may be attributable to the
veteran’s exposure to  causative agents shall, at the request and direction of the veteran, veteran’s
spouse or surviving  spouse or the parent or guardian of such minor child, submit a report to the
Oregon Health Authority. The report shall be made on a form  adopted by the authority and made
available to physicians, [ physician assistants ] physician associates , nurse practitioners and hospi-
tals in this state.
(2) If there is no physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  or nurse practitioner
having primary  responsibility for the treatment of a veteran, veteran’s spouse, surviving spouse or
minor child, then the senior  medical supervisor of the hospital or clinic treating the veteran,
veteran’s spouse, surviving spouse or minor child shall  submit the report described in this section
to the  authority at the request and direction of the veteran, veteran’s spouse or surviving spouse
or the parent or legal guardian of a veteran’s minor child.
(3) The form adopted by the authority under this section shall list the symptoms commonly at-
tributed to exposure to causative agents, and shall require the following information:
(a) Symptoms of the patient which may be related to exposure to causative agents.
(b) A diagnosis of the patient’s condition.
(c) Methods of treatment prescribed.
(d) Any other information required by the authority.
(4) The authority, after receiving a report  from a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician as-
sociate, nurse practitioner, hospital or clinic under this section, may require  the veteran, veteran’s
spouse, surviving spouse or minor child to provide such other  information as may be required by the
authority.
SECTION 55.
 ORS 408.315 is amended to read:
408.315. (1) ORS 408.310 applies  to all veterans, spouses, surviving spouses and minor children
of veterans treated by a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate , nurse practitioner,
hospital or clinic after January 1, 1982. Physicians, [ physician assistants ] physician associates ,
nurse practitioners, hospitals or clinics shall submit the reports and study required  under ORS
408.310 for  veterans, spouses, surviving spouses and minor children of veterans treated prior to that
date when requested and directed to do so by such individuals.
(2) ORS 408.300 to 408.340  apply to all physicians, [ physician assistants ] physician associates,
nurse practitioners, hospitals and clinics, whether public or private, within the State of Oregon.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 37
SECTION 56.  ORS 408.340 is amended to read:
408.340. (1) A physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate, nurse practitioner,  hospital
or clinic subject to ORS 408.300 to 408.340 shall not be subject to any criminal or civil liability for
providing information required under ORS 408.300 to 408.340.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prevent, however,  any action for negligence by a physician,
[physician assistant ] physician associate , nurse practitioner,  hospital or clinic in choosing or pro-
viding medical treatment.
SECTION 57.
 ORS 410.530 is amended to read:
410.530. (1) The Department of Human Services has the following authority which it may  dele-
gate to any program certified by the department to provide assessment services:
(a) To  provide information and education to the general public, hospitals, nursing facilities,
physicians, [ physician assistants ] physician associates, naturopathic physicians and nurses  regard-
ing availability of the assessment program.
(b) To accept referrals  from individuals, families, physicians, naturopathic physicians, human
service professionals, nursing home professionals, social service agencies or other organizations.
(c) To assess the long term care needs of referred persons.
(d) To identify available noninstitutional services to meet the needs of referred  persons, includ-
ing public and private case management services.
(e) To  prepare, explain and document recommendations for persons receiving assessment pro-
gram services as to the need for  skilled nursing care, for intermediate care as provided in a facility
or for other care which is available in the community.
(f) To inform referred persons of the extent to which home and community-based  services are
available, and of their right to choose among the appropriate alternatives that may be available,  in
consultation with an attending physician and a family member.
(g) To provide public education targeted at  older persons, caregivers and families regarding al-
ternative long term care services.
(h) To determine and publish minimum qualifications for  members of the admission assessment
team.
(2)(a) After consultation with the committee appointed under subsection (3) of this section, the
Department of Human  Services shall adopt by rule criteria and procedures for certifying and de-
certifying  public  or private admission assessment programs and contracting with certified programs.
The department shall establish a maximum fee that a certified  program may charge for assessment
services. The rules shall specify  that a certified program may not charge the person receiving as-
sessment services for  any portion of the fee associated with the services necessary to meet the
minimum federal criteria.
(b) In certifying a program, the department shall determine that the program includes:
(A) Adequately trained personnel;
(B) Information regarding  appropriate service and placement alternatives, including nursing fa-
cilities and community-based options;
(C) Provisions to the applicant of information about appropriate options; and
(D) Prohibition of an assessment being provided by any certified  program which has any finan-
cial interest in the facility to which placement is recommended.
(c) The program shall not require the recommendation of the admission team be binding and  the
applicant has the right to choose from any options that are available.
(3) The Director of Human Services shall appoint  an advisory committee to advise the depart-
ment in certifying  and decertifying programs that provide or fail to provide the service described
in this section. The director shall appoint representatives from trade associations in Oregon  for
hospitals and health systems, nursing  facilities and residential facilities and from an organization in
Oregon representing the interests of senior citizens.
SECTION 58.
 ORS 413.273 is amended to read:
413.273. (1) As used in this section and ORS 413.270 and 413.271:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 38
(a) “Appropriate” means  consistent with applicable legal, health and professional standards, a
patient’s clinical and other circumstances, and the patient’s known wishes and beliefs.
(b) “Health facility” includes:
(A) Hospitals and long term care facilities licensed under ORS 441.025; and
(B) Residential facilities licensed under ORS 443.415.
(c) “Medical care” means professional services for a patient that are provided, requested or
supervised by a physician, nurse practitioner or [ physician assistant ] physician associate.
(d)(A) “Palliative care” means  patient-centered and family-centered medical care that optimizes
a patient’s quality of life by anticipating, preventing  and treating the suffering caused by serious
illness and involves addressing the patient’s physical, social and spiritual needs and facilitating the
patient’s autonomy, access to information and choice.
(B) “Palliative care” includes, but is not limited to:
(i) Discussing a patient’s goals for treatment;
(ii) Discussing the treatment options that are appropriate for the patient; and
(iii) Comprehensive pain and symptom management.
(e) “Serious illness” means any illness, physical injury or condition that substantially impairs a
patient’s quality of life for more than a short period of time.
(2) A health facility shall:
(a) Establish a system for identifying patients or residents who could benefit from palliative
care;
(b) Provide information to patients, residents and their families about palliative care; and
(c) Coordinate with a patient’s or resident’s primary care provider, if  practicable, to facilitate
the access of patients and residents with serious illnesses to appropriate palliative care.
SECTION 59.
 ORS 413.574 is amended to read:
413.574. (1) The Pain Management Commission shall consist of 19 members as follows:
(a) Seventeen members shall be appointed by  the Director of the Oregon Health Authority. Prior
to making appointments, the director shall request and consider recommendations  from individuals
and public and  private agencies and organizations with experience or a demonstrated interest in
pain management issues, including but not limited to:
(A) Physicians licensed under ORS chapter 677 or organizations representing physicians;
(B) Nurses licensed under ORS chapter 678 or organizations representing nurses;
(C) Psychologists licensed under ORS 675.010 to 675.150 or organizations representing  psychol-
ogists;
(D) [ Physician assistants ] Physician associates  licensed under  ORS [ chapter 677 ] 677.505 to
677.525 or organizations representing [ physician assistants ] physician associates;
(E) Chiropractic physicians licensed under ORS chapter 684  or organizations representing
chiropractic physicians;
(F) Naturopaths licensed under ORS chapter 685 or organizations representing naturopaths;
(G) Clinical social  workers licensed under ORS 675.530 or organizations representing clinical
social workers;
(H) Acupuncturists licensed under ORS 677.759;
(I) Pharmacists licensed under ORS chapter 689;
(J) Palliative care professionals or organizations representing palliative care professionals;
(K) Mental health professionals or organizations representing mental health professionals;
(L) Health care consumers or organizations representing health care consumers;
(M) Hospitals and health plans or organizations representing hospitals and health plans;
(N) Patients or advocacy groups representing patients;
(O) Dentists licensed under ORS chapter 679;
(P) Occupational therapists licensed under ORS 675.210 to 675.340;
(Q) Physical therapists licensed under ORS 688.010 to 688.201; and
(R) Members of the public.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 39
(b) Two members  shall be members of a legislative committee with jurisdiction over human
services issues, one appointed by the President of the Senate and one appointed by the  Speaker of
the House of Representatives. Both members shall be nonvoting members of the commission.
(2) The term of office of each member is four years, but a member  serves at the pleasure of the
appointing authority. Before the expiration  of the term of a member, the appointing authority shall
appoint a successor  whose term begins on July 1 next following. A member is eligible for reap-
pointment. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an  appointment
to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(3) Members of the commission are not entitled to compensation or  reimbursement for expenses
and serve as volunteers on the commission.
SECTION 60.  ORS 413.590 is amended to read:
413.590. (1) The following practitioners must complete a pain management education program
described in ORS 413.572 (1)(c) or an equivalent pain management education program  as described
in ORS 675.110, 677.228, 678.101,  684.092, 685.102 or 689.285 at initial licensure and every 36 months
thereafter:
(a) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS [ chapter 677 ] 677.505 to
677.525;
(b) A nurse licensed under ORS chapter 678;
(c) A psychologist licensed under ORS 675.010 to 675.150;
(d) A chiropractic physician licensed under ORS chapter 684;
(e) A [ naturopath] naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685;
(f) An acupuncturist licensed under ORS 677.759;
(g) A pharmacist licensed under ORS chapter 689;
(h) A dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679;
(i) An occupational therapist licensed under ORS 675.210 to 675.340;
(j) A physical therapist licensed under ORS 688.010 to 688.201; and
(k) An optometrist licensed under ORS chapter 683.
(2) The Oregon Medical Board, in consultation with the Pain Management  Commission, shall
identify by rule physicians licensed under ORS  chapter 677 who, on an ongoing basis, treat patients
in chronic or terminal pain and  who must complete a pain management education program described
in ORS 413.572. The board may identify by  rule circumstances under which a requirement under this
section may be waived.
SECTION 61.
 ORS 414.550 is amended to read:
414.550. As used in ORS 414.550 to 414.565:
(1) “Cystic  fibrosis services” means a program for medical care, including the cost of prescribed
medications and equipment, respiratory therapy, physical  therapy, counseling services that pertain
directly to cystic fibrosis related health needs and outpatient services including physician, [ physician
assistant] physician associate , naturopathic physician or nurse practitioner fees, X-rays and neces-
sary clinical tests to insure proper ongoing monitoring and maintenance of the patient’s health.
(2) “Eligible individual” means a resident of the State of Oregon over 18 years of age.
SECTION 62.
 ORS 418.747 is amended to read:
418.747. (1) The district attorney in each county shall be responsible for  developing county child
abuse multidisciplinary teams to consist of but not be  limited to law enforcement personnel, De-
partment of Human Services child protective service workers,  school officials, local health depart-
ment personnel, county mental health department personnel who  have experience with children and
family mental health issues,  child abuse intervention center workers, if available, and juvenile de-
partment representatives, as well as others  specially trained in child abuse, child sexual abuse and
rape of children investigation.
(2) The teams shall develop a written protocol for immediate  investigation of and notification
procedures for child abuse cases, including  child sexual abuse, and for interviewing child abuse
victims. Each  team also shall develop written agreements signed by member agencies that are re-
presented on the team that specify:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 40
(a) The role of each agency;
(b) Procedures to be followed to assess risks to the child;
(c) Guidelines for timely communication between member agencies;
(d) Guidelines for completion of responsibilities by member agencies;
(e) That  upon clear disclosure that the alleged child abuse occurred in a child care facility as
defined in ORS 329A.250, immediate notification of parents or guardians of children attending the
child care facility is required regarding any abuse allegation and pending investigation; and
(f) Criteria and procedures to be followed  when removal of the child is necessary for the child’s
safety.
(3) Each team member and  the personnel conducting child abuse investigations and interviews
of child abuse victims shall be trained in risk assessment, the dynamics of child abuse,  child sexual
abuse and rape of children, and forensic interviewing.
(4) All investigations of child abuse and interviews of  child abuse victims shall be carried out
by appropriate personnel using the protocols and procedures called for in this section. If  trained
personnel are not available in a timely fashion and, in the judgment of a law  enforcement officer
or child protective services worker, there is reasonable cause to believe a delay in  investigation or
interview of the child abuse victim could place the child in jeopardy of physical harm, the  investi-
gation may proceed without full participation of all personnel. This authority applies only for  as
long as reasonable  danger to the child exists. A law enforcement officer or child protective services
worker shall make a reasonable effort to find and provide a trained investigator or interviewer.
(5) To ensure the protection and safe placement of a child, the Department  of Human Services
may request that  team members obtain criminal history information on any person who is part of
the household where the department may place or has placed a child  who is in the department’s
custody. All information obtained by the team members and the department in the exercise of their
duties is  confidential and may be disclosed only when necessary to ensure the safe placement of a
child.
(6) Each team shall classify, assess and review cases under investigation.
(7)(a) Each  team shall develop and implement procedures for evaluating and reporting compli-
ance of member agencies with the protocols and procedures required under this section.  Each team
shall submit to the administrator of the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary  Intervention Program copies
of the  protocols and procedures required under this section and the results of the evaluation as re-
quested.
(b) The administrator may:
(A) Consider  the evaluation results when making eligibility determinations under ORS 418.746
(3);
(B) If requested by the Advisory Council on Child Abuse Assessment, ask a  team to revise the
protocols and procedures being used by the team based on the evaluation results; or
(C) Ask a team to evaluate the team’s compliance with the protocols and procedures in  a par-
ticular case.
(c) The information and records  compiled under this subsection are exempt from ORS 192.311
to 192.478.
(8) Each team shall develop policies that provide for an independent review of investigation
procedures  of  sensitive cases after completion of court actions on particular cases. The policies shall
include independent citizen input. Parents of  child abuse victims shall be notified of the review
procedure.
(9) Each team shall designate at least one physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate
or nurse  practitioner who has been trained to conduct child abuse assessments, as defined in ORS
418.782, and who is, or who may  designate another physician, [ physician assistant ] physician asso-
ciate or nurse practitioner who is, regularly available to conduct the medical  assessment described
in ORS 419B.023.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 41
(10) If photographs are taken pursuant to ORS 419B.028, and if the  team meets to discuss the
case, the  photographs shall be made available to each member of the team at the first meeting re-
garding the child’s case following the taking of the photographs.
(11) No later than September 1, 2008, each team shall  submit to the Department of Justice a
written summary identifying the designated medical professional described in subsection (9) of  this
section. After that date, this information shall be included in each regular report to the Department
of Justice.
(12) If, after reasonable  effort, the team is not able to identify a designated medical professional
described in subsection (9) of this section, the team shall develop a written  plan outlining the nec-
essary steps, recruitment and training needed to make such  a medical professional available to the
children of the county. The team shall  also develop a written strategy to ensure that each child in
the county who is a suspected victim of child abuse will receive a  medical assessment in compliance
with ORS 419B.023. This strategy,  and the estimated fiscal impact of any necessary recruitment and
training, shall be submitted  to the Department of Justice no later than September 1, 2008. This in-
formation shall be included in each regular report to the Department  of Justice for each reporting
period in  which a team is not able to identify a designated medical professional described in sub-
section (9) of this section.
SECTION 63.
 ORS 418.782 is amended to read:
418.782. As used in ORS 418.746 to 418.796:
(1) “Child abuse” means “abuse” as defined by ORS 419B.005.
(2) “Child abuse assessment” means services provided by a children’s advocacy center for the
purpose of determining whether or not a  child has been abused and identifying the appropriate
treatment or referral for follow-up for the child. “Child  abuse assessment” may include one or more
of the following:
(a) A medical assessment;
(b) A forensic interview;
(c) Care coordination; or
(d) Family support.
(3) “Children’s advocacy center” means a  facility that meets the facility standards described in
ORS 418.788, to which a  child from the community may be referred to receive a thorough child
abuse assessment for the purpose of determining whether the child has been abused or neglected,
and that facilitates a coordinated, comprehensive  and multidisciplinary response to cases of child
abuse.
(4) “Forensic interview” means an interview that is conducted by an individual who has com-
pleted training described in ORS 418.788  for the purpose of preserving a child’s statements and that
is conducted in a manner that is legally sound, age appropriate, of a neutral, fact-finding  nature and
coordinated to avoid duplicative interviewing.
(5) “Medical assessment” means the taking of a child’s thorough medical history and a complete
physical examination of the child, for  the purpose of making a medical diagnosis, by or under the
direction of an individual trained  in the evaluation, diagnosis and treatment of child abuse who is
a licensed physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner.
(6) “Regional children’s advocacy center” means a facility operated  by a children’s advocacy
center that meets the facility standards described in ORS 418.788  and is selected by the Child Abuse
Multidisciplinary Intervention Program to provide training and complex case assistance.
(7) “Training and complex case assistance” includes one or more of the following:
(a) Consultation;
(b) Education;
(c) Referral;
(d) Technical assistance; and
(e) If authorized by the Department of Justice, other services as needed.
SECTION 64.
 ORS 419B.005 is amended to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 42
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any assault, as  defined in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a child that
has been caused by other than accidental  means, including any injury that appears to be at variance
with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any mental injury to a child, which shall include only cruel or unconscionable acts  or
statements made, or threatened to be made, to a child if the acts, statements or threats result  in
severe harm to the child’s psychological, cognitive, emotional or social well-being and functioning.
(C) Rape of a child, which includes but is not limited to  rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a minor, as  defined in ORS chapter 163, and any
other conduct that allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child to engage in
the performing for people to observe or the photographing, filming, tape recording or  other exhibi-
tion that, in whole or in part, depicts sexual conduct or contact, as defined  in ORS 167.002 or de-
scribed  in  ORS 163.665 and 163.670, sexual abuse involving a child or rape of a child, but not
including any conduct that is part  of any investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or that
is designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes; and
(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring  a child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act  as defined in ORS 163.266, to purchase sex with a minor as
described in ORS 163.413 or to engage in commercial sexual solicitation  as described in ORS
167.008.
(F) Negligent treatment or maltreatment  of a child, including but not limited to the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care  that is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm to  a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial risk of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises  where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful exposure  to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to the unlawful
manufacturing of a  cannabinoid extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child to a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
(K) The restraint or seclusion of a child in violation of ORS 339.285, 339.288, 339.291,  339.303
or 339.308.
(L) The infliction of corporal punishment on a child in violation of ORS 339.250 (9).
(b) “Abuse” does not  include reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is a child in care, as defined in ORS 418.257.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment  of the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the  receipt of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 43
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS  chapter 677 or
naturopathic physician, including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed  practical nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the Department  of Human Services, Oregon Health Authority, Department of
Early Learning and Care, Department of Education, Youth Development  Division, the Oregon Youth
Authority,  a  local health department, a community mental health program, a community develop-
mental disabilities program, a county juvenile department, a child-caring agency as that term is de-
fined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) Court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) Child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) Elected official of a branch of government  of this state or a state agency, board, commission
or department of a branch of government of this  state or of a city, county or other political subdi-
vision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) Operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) Operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or organization  facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents  pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056.
(bb) Employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services or activities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or  camp that is operated under the guidance, supervision or auspices of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 44
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined  in ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to  victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or
human trafficking.
(cc) Coach, assistant coach  or trainer of an amateur, semiprofessional or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of a  school district board, an education service district board or a public charter
school governing body.
(hh) Individual who is paid by a public body, in accordance with ORS 430.215, to provide a
service identified in an individualized service plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
(jj) Parole and probation officer, as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(kk) Behavior analyst or assistant  behavior analyst licensed under ORS 676.810 or behavior
analysis interventionist registered by the Health Licensing Office under ORS 676.815.
SECTION 65.
 ORS 419B.005, as amended by section 6, chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2023,  is
amended to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any assault, as  defined in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a child that
has been caused by other than accidental  means, including any injury that appears to be at variance
with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any  mental injury to a child, which shall include only cruel or unconscionable acts or
statements made,  or threatened to be made, to a child if the acts, statements or threats result in
severe harm to the child’s psychological, cognitive, emotional or social well-being and functioning.
(C) Rape of a child, which  includes but is not limited to rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a  minor, as defined in ORS chapter 163, and any
other conduct that allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child to engage in
the performing for  people to observe or the photographing, filming, tape recording or other exhibi-
tion that, in whole or in  part, depicts sexual conduct or contact, as defined in ORS 167.002 or de-
scribed in ORS 163.665 and 163.670, sexual abuse involving a child or rape of a child, but  not
including any conduct that is part  of any investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or that
is designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes; and
(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring  a child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act as defined in ORS 163.266, to  purchase sex with a minor as
described in ORS 163.413 or  to engage in commercial sexual solicitation as described in ORS
167.008.
(F) Negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child, including but not limited  to the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care that  is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm to a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial  risk of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting  a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful exposure to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to  the unlawful
manufacturing of a cannabinoid extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child to  a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 45
(K) The infliction of corporal punishment on a child in violation of ORS 339.250 (9).
(b) “Abuse” does not  include reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is a child in care, as defined in ORS 418.257.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment  of the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the  receipt of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS chapter 677 or
naturopathic physician, including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed  practical nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the Department of Human Services, Oregon  Health Authority, Department of
Early Learning and Care, Department of Education, Youth Development  Division, the Oregon Youth
Authority, a local health department, a community mental health program, a community  develop-
mental disabilities program, a county juvenile department, a child-caring agency as that term is de-
fined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) Court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) Child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) Elected official of a branch of government  of this state or a state agency, board, commission
or department of a branch of government of this state or  of a city, county or other political subdi-
vision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 46
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) Operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) Operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or  organization facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents  pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056.
(bb) Employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services or activities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or camp that is operated under the guidance, supervision or auspices  of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined  in ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to victims of domestic violence,  sexual assault, stalking or
human trafficking.
(cc) Coach, assistant coach or trainer of an amateur, semiprofessional  or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of a school district board, an education service district board or  a public charter
school governing body.
(hh) Individual who is paid by a public body, in accordance with ORS 430.215, to provide a
service identified in an individualized service plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
(jj) Parole and probation officer, as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(kk) Behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst licensed under  ORS 676.810 or behavior
analysis interventionist registered by the Health Licensing Office under ORS 676.815.
SECTION 66.
 ORS 419B.020 is amended to read:
419B.020. (1) If the  Department of Human Services or a law enforcement agency receives a re-
port of child abuse, the department or the agency shall immediately:
(a) Cause an investigation to be  made to determine the nature and cause of the abuse of the
child; and
(b) Make the following notifications:
(A) To the Department of Early Learning and Care  if the alleged child abuse occurred in a child
care facility as defined in ORS 329A.250; or
(B) To the Department of  Education if the alleged child abuse occurred in a school, was related
to a school-sponsored  activity or was conduct that may be subject to actions taken by the Depart-
ment of Education under ORS 339.370 to 339.400.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall ensure that  an investigation required by subsection
(1) of this section is completed if the report is not investigated by a law enforcement agency.
(3) If the alleged child abuse reported in  subsection (1) of this section occurred at a child care
facility or in  a school, was related to a school-sponsored activity or was conduct that may be subject
to actions taken by the Department of Education under ORS 339.370 to 339.400:
(a) The Department of Human Services and the law enforcement agency shall jointly  determine
the roles and responsibilities  of the Department of Human Services and the agency in their respec-
tive investigations; and
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 47
(b) The Department of Human Services and the agency  shall each report the outcomes of their
investigations:
(A) To the Department of Early Learning and Care  if the alleged child abuse occurred in a child
care facility as defined in ORS 329A.250; or
(B) To the Department of Education if the alleged child abuse:
(i) Occurred in a school;
(ii) Was related to a school-sponsored activity; or
(iii) Was conduct that may be subject to actions  taken by the Department of Education under
ORS 339.370 to 339.400.
(4) If the law enforcement agency conducting the investigation finds reasonable cause to  believe
that abuse has  occurred, the law enforcement agency shall notify the Department of Human Services
by making an oral report followed by a written report to the  centralized child abuse reporting sys-
tem described in ORS 418.190. The department shall provide protective  social services of its own
or of other available  social agencies if necessary to prevent further abuses to the child or to safe-
guard the child’s welfare.
(5) If a child is taken into protective custody by the Department of Human Services, the de-
partment shall promptly make reasonable efforts to ascertain the name and address  of the child’s
parents or guardian.
(6)(a) If a child is taken into protective custody by the Department  of Human Services or a law
enforcement official, the department  or law enforcement official shall, if possible, make reasonable
efforts  to  advise the parents or guardian immediately, regardless of the time of day, that the child
has been taken into custody, the reasons the  child has been taken into custody and general infor-
mation about the child’s placement, and the telephone number of the  local office of the department
and any after-hours telephone numbers.
(b) Notice may be given by any means reasonably  certain of notifying the parents or guardian,
including but not limited to written, telephonic or  in-person oral notification. If the initial notifica-
tion is not in writing, the information  required by paragraph (a) of this subsection also shall be
provided to the parents or guardian in writing as soon as possible.
(c) The department also shall make a reasonable effort to notify the  noncustodial parent of the
information required by paragraph (a) of this subsection in a timely manner.
(d) If a child is taken into custody while under the care and supervision of a person  or organ-
ization other than the parent, the department, if possible, shall  immediately notify the person or
organization that the child has been taken into protective custody.
(7) If a law enforcement officer or the Department of Human  Services, when taking a child into
protective custody, has  reasonable cause to believe that the child has been affected by sexual abuse
and rape of a child as defined in ORS 419B.005 (1)(a)(C) and that physical evidence  of the abuse
exists and is likely to disappear, the court  may authorize a physical examination for the purposes
of preserving evidence if the court finds that it is  in the best interest of the child to have such an
examination. Nothing in this section affects  the authority of the department to consent to physical
examinations of the child at other times.
(8) A minor child of 12 years of age or older may  refuse to consent to the examination described
in subsection (7) of this section. The  examination shall be conducted by or under the supervision
of a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677, a [ physician assistant] physician associate licensed
under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or a nurse practitioner  licensed under ORS chapter 678 and, whenever
practicable, trained in conducting such examinations.
(9) When the Department of Human Services completes an investigation  under this section, if
the person who made the report of child abuse provided contact information to the  department, the
department shall notify the person about whether  contact with the child was made, whether the
department determined that child abuse occurred and whether services will be provided. The de-
partment is not required to disclose information under this subsection if the  department determines
that disclosure is not permitted under ORS 419B.035.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 48
(10) When the Department  of Education receives a notification under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion or a report on the outcomes of an investigation under subsection  (3) of this section, the De-
partment of Education shall act under, and is subject to, ORS 339.389.
SECTION 67.  ORS 419B.023 is amended to read:
419B.023. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Designated medical professional” means the  person described in ORS 418.747 (9) or the
person’s designee.
(b) “Medical assessment” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.782.
(c) “Suspicious physical injury” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Burns or scalds;
(B) Extensive bruising or abrasions on any part of the body;
(C) Bruising, swelling or abrasions on the head, neck or face;
(D) Fractures of any bone in a child under the age of three;
(E) Multiple fractures in a child of any age;
(F) Dislocations, soft tissue swelling or moderate to severe cuts;
(G) Loss of the ability to walk or move normally according to the  child’s developmental ability;
(H) Unconsciousness or difficulty maintaining consciousness;
(I) Multiple injuries of different types;
(J) Injuries causing serious or  protracted disfigurement or loss or impairment of the function
of any bodily organ; or
(K) Any other injury that threatens the physical well-being of the child.
(2)(a) If a person conducting an investigation under ORS 419B.020 observes a  child who has
suffered suspicious physical injury and the person is certain or has a reasonable suspicion  that the
injury is  or may be the result of abuse, the person shall, in accordance with the protocols and pro-
cedures of the county child abuse multidisciplinary team described in ORS 418.747:
(A) Immediately photograph or  cause to have photographed the suspicious physical injuries in
accordance with ORS 419B.028; and
(B) Ensure that a designated  medical professional conducts a medical assessment within 48
hours, or sooner if dictated by the child’s medical needs.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 419B.150,  the person described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may
take the child into protective custody, without a court order, only for  the period of time necessary
to ensure compliance with the requirements of this subsection.
(3) The requirement of subsection (2) of this section shall apply:
(a) Each time suspicious physical injury is  observed by Department of Human Services or law
enforcement  personnel:
(A) During the investigation of a new allegation of abuse; or
(B) If the injury was not previously observed by a person conducting an investigation under ORS
419B.020; and
(b) Regardless of whether the child has previously been photographed or assessed during an in-
vestigation of an allegation of abuse.
(4)(a) Department or law enforcement personnel shall make  a reasonable effort to locate a des-
ignated medical professional. If after reasonable efforts a designated  medical professional is not
available to conduct a medical assessment within 48 hours, the  child shall be evaluated by an
available physician, a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS 677.505 to
677.525 or a nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390.
(b) If the child is evaluated by a health  care provider as defined in ORS 127.505 other than a
designated medical professional, the health care provider shall make photographs, clinical notes,
diagnostic and testing results and any other relevant  materials available to the designated medical
professional for consultation within 72 hours following evaluation of the child.
(c) The person conducting the medical assessment may consult with and obtain  records from the
child’s health care provider under ORS 419B.050.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 49
(5) Nothing in this section prevents a person  conducting a child abuse investigation from seek-
ing immediate medical  treatment from a hospital emergency room or other medical provider for a
child who is physically injured or otherwise in need of immediate medical care.
(6) If the child described in subsection (2) of this section is less than five years of age, the des-
ignated medical professional may, within 14 days,  refer the child for a screening for early inter-
vention services or early childhood special education, as those  terms are defined in ORS 343.035.
The referral may not indicate the child is subject to  a child abuse investigation unless written
consent is obtained from the child’s parent authorizing such disclosure. If the child is  already re-
ceiving those services, or is enrolled in the Head Start program, a person involved in the  delivery
of those services to the child shall be invited to participate in the county  child abuse multidiscipli-
nary team’s review of the case and shall be provided with paid time to do  so by the person’s em-
ployer.
(7) Nothing in this section limits the rights provided to minors  in ORS chapter 109 or the ability
of a minor to refuse to consent to the medical assessment described in this section.
SECTION 68.  ORS 419B.035 is amended to read:
419B.035. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS  192.001 to 192.170, 192.210 to 192.478 and
192.610 to 192.810 relating to confidentiality and accessibility for public inspection of public records
and public documents, reports  and records compiled under the provisions of ORS 419B.010 to
419B.050 are confidential and  may not be disclosed except as provided in this section. The Depart-
ment of Human Services shall make the records available to:
(a) Any law  enforcement agency or a child abuse registry in any other state for the purpose of
subsequent investigation of child abuse;
(b) Any physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under  ORS 677.505 to
677.525 or nurse  practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390, at the request of the physician,
[physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner, regarding any child brought to  the
physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  or nurse practitioner or coming  before the
physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner  for examination, care or
treatment;
(c) Attorneys  of record for the child or child’s parent or guardian in any juvenile court pro-
ceeding;
(d) Citizen review boards established by the  Judicial Department for the purpose of periodically
reviewing the status  of children, youths and adjudicated youths under the jurisdiction of the juvenile
court under ORS 419B.100 and 419C.005. Citizen review boards may make such  records available to
participants in case reviews;
(e) A court appointed special advocate in any juvenile court  proceeding in which it is alleged
that a child has been subjected to child abuse or neglect;
(f) The Department of Early Learning and Care for the purpose of carrying  out the functions
of the department, including the certification, registration or regulation of child  care facilities and
child care providers and the administration of enrollment in the Central Background Registry;
(g) The Office of Children’s Advocate;
(h) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission for investigations  conducted under ORS
339.390 or 342.176 involving any child or any student;
(i) Any person, upon request to the Department of Human Services,  if the reports or records
requested regard an incident in which a child, as the result of abuse, died or suffered serious phys-
ical injury as defined in ORS 161.015. Reports or records  disclosed under this paragraph must be
disclosed in accordance with ORS 192.311 to 192.478;
(j) The Department of Early Learning and Care for purposes  of applications described in ORS
329A.030 (11)(c)(G) to (J);
(k) With respect to a report of abuse occurring at  a school or in an educational setting that
involves a child with a disability, Disability Rights Oregon;
(L) The Department of Education for purposes of investigations conducted under ORS 339.391;
(m) An education provider for the purpose of making determinations under ORS 339.388; and
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 50
(n) A national nonprofit organization designated  by the Department of Human Services that
provides assistance with locating, recovering or providing services to children or  youth determined
by the department to be missing.
(2)(a) When disclosing reports and records pursuant to subsection (1)(i) of this section, the De-
partment of Human Services may exempt from disclosure the names, addresses and other identifying
information about other children, witnesses, victims or other persons  named in the report or record
if the department determines, in written findings,  that the safety or well-being of a person named in
the report or  record may be jeopardized by disclosure of the names, addresses or other identifying
information, and if that concern outweighs the public’s  interest in the disclosure of that information.
(b) If the Department of Human Services does not  have a report or record of abuse regarding
a child who,  as the result of abuse, died or suffered serious physical injury as defined in ORS
161.015, the department may disclose that information.
(3) The Department of Human Services may make reports and records compiled under  the pro-
visions of ORS 419B.010 to 419B.050 available to any person, administrative  hearings officer, court,
agency, organization or other entity when the department determines that such disclosure is neces-
sary to administer its child welfare services and is in the best interests of the affected  child, or that
such disclosure is necessary to  investigate, prevent or treat child abuse and neglect, to protect
children from abuse and neglect or for research when the  Director of Human Services gives prior
written approval. The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules setting  forth the procedures
by which it will make the  disclosures authorized under this subsection or subsection (1) or (2) of this
section. The name, address and other identifying information  about the person who made the report
may not be disclosed pursuant to this subsection and subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A law  enforcement agency may make reports and records compiled under the provisions of
ORS 419B.010 to 419B.050 available to other law enforcement agencies, district attorneys, city at-
torneys with criminal prosecutorial functions and the Attorney General when the law enforcement
agency determines that disclosure  is necessary for the investigation or enforcement of laws relating
to child abuse and  neglect or necessary to determine a claim for crime victim compensation under
ORS 147.005 to 147.367.
(5)(a) A law enforcement agency,  upon completing an investigation and closing the file in a
specific case relating to child abuse or neglect, shall make reports and records in the  case available
upon request to:
(A) Any law enforcement agency or community corrections agency  in this state, to the Depart-
ment of Corrections, to the Oregon Youth Authority or to the  State Board of Parole and Post-Prison
Supervision for the purpose of managing and supervising offenders in  custody or on probation,
parole, post-prison supervision or other form of conditional or supervised release; and
(B) The  Teacher Standards and Practices Commission for investigations conducted under ORS
339.390 and 342.176.
(b) A  law enforcement agency may make reports and records compiled under the provisions of
ORS 419B.010 to 419B.050 available to the Oregon Youth Authority, the Teacher  Standards and
Practices Commission for investigations conducted under ORS 339.390 and 342.176,  law enforcement,
community corrections, corrections or parole agencies in an open case when the law  enforcement
agency determines that the disclosure will not interfere with an ongoing investigation in the case.
(c) The name, address and other identifying  information about the person who made the report
may not be disclosed under this subsection or subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(6)(a) Any  record made available to a law enforcement agency or community corrections agency
in this  state, to the Department of Corrections, the Oregon Youth Authority, the State Board of
Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or the Teacher Standards and Practices  Commission or to a
physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner in this state, as authorized
by subsections (1) to (5) of this section,  shall be kept confidential by the agency, department, board,
commission, physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or  nurse practitioner. Any record
or report disclosed by the Department of Human Services to other persons or  entities pursuant to
subsections (1) and (3) of this section shall be kept confidential.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 51
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) A law enforcement agency, a community corrections agency, the Department of  Corrections,
the Oregon Youth Authority  and the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision may disclose
records made available to them under subsection (5) of this section  to each other, to law enforce-
ment, community corrections, corrections and parole agencies of other states and to authorized
treatment providers  for the purpose of managing and supervising offenders in custody or on pro-
bation, parole, post-prison supervision or other form of conditional or supervised release.
(B) The Department of Corrections and the Oregon  Youth Authority may disclose records made
available to them under subsection  (5) of this section regarding a person in the custody of the De-
partment of Corrections or the Oregon Youth Authority to  each other, to the court, to the district
attorney and to the person’s attorney for the purpose of the person’s hearing under  ORS 420A.200
to 420A.206.
(C) A person may disclose records made available  to the person under subsection (1)(i) of this
section if the records are disclosed for the purpose of advancing the public interest.
(7) Except as provided by ORS  339.389, an officer or employee of the Department of Human
Services or of a law enforcement  agency or any person or entity to whom disclosure is made pur-
suant to subsections (1) to (6) of this section may not release any information not authorized  by
subsections (1) to (6) of this section.
(8) A record of sexual orientation, gender identity or gender expression, as defined  in ORS
409.225, is exempt from disclosure under subsection (1) of this section unless:
(a) The department determines, in written findings, that failure to disclose the record is  rea-
sonably likely to jeopardize the child’s safety or well-being;
(b) The department determines, in written findings,  that disclosure of the record is necessary to
provide services to the child or the child’s family; or
(c) The child consents to the disclosure.
(9) As used in this section,  “law enforcement agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS
181A.010.
(10) A person who violates subsection (6)(a) or (7) of this section commits a Class A violation.
SECTION 69.
 ORS 419B.352 is amended to read:
419B.352. The court may direct that the child or ward be  examined or treated by a physician,
psychiatrist, psychologist, [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under  ORS 677.505 to
677.525, naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter  685 or nurse practitioner licensed under
ORS 678.375 to 678.390, or receive other special care or treatment in a hospital or other suitable
facility. If the court determines that mental health examination and treatment should be provided
by services delivered through the Department of Human Services, the department  shall determine
the appropriate placement or services in consultation  with the court and other affected agencies.
If an affected agency objects to the type of placement or services, the court shall determine the
appropriate  type  of placement or service. During the examination or treatment of the child or ward,
the department may, if appropriate, be appointed guardian of the child or ward.
SECTION 70.
 ORS 421.467 is amended to read:
421.467. (1) Subject to ORS 421.468, the  governing body of a county or city in this state may
transfer a local adult in custody to  the temporary custody of the Department of Corrections solely
for employment at a forest  work camp established under ORS 421.455 to 421.480. The county or city
transferring  the  local adult in custody shall pay the cost of transportation and other expenses inci-
dental to the conveyance to the forest work camp of the adult in  custody and the return of the local
adult in custody to the county or city, including the expenses of law enforcement officers accompa-
nying the local adult in  custody, and is responsible for costs of any medical treatment of the local
adult in custody while the local adult in custody is  employed at the forest work camp not compen-
sated under ORS 655.505 to 655.555.
(2) Before a local adult in custody is sent to a forest work camp, the governing body of the
county or city shall cause the local adult in custody  to be given such inoculations as are necessary
in the public interest, and must submit to the Department of Corrections a  certificate, signed by a
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 52
physician licensed under ORS chapter 677, [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under
ORS 677.505 to 677.525, naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685 or nurse practi-
tioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390  that the local adult in custody is physically and men-
tally able to perform the work described in ORS 421.470, and is free from communicable disease.
SECTION 71.  ORS 421.590 is amended to read:
421.590. (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) “Medical treatment program” means a treatment program  based on a successful medical
model that has been proven to reduce  recidivism and that is within the range of treatments gener-
ally recognized as acceptable within the medical community, including:
(A) Treatment by prescribed medication  when recommended by a qualified psychiatrist, physi-
cian, [ physician assistant ] physician associate, naturopathic physician or nurse practitioner; or
(B) Psychological treatment.
(b) “Program participant” means a person sentenced for a term of imprisonment based on  con-
viction of a sex crime or a felony attempt to commit a sex crime, or a person who is eligible  for
parole or post-prison supervision after a term  of imprisonment based on conviction of a sex crime
or a felony attempt to commit a sex crime, who agrees to participate in  a medical treatment pro-
gram after having been evaluated to be a suitable candidate and who has been provided  with ade-
quate information to give informed consent to participation.
(c) “Sex crime” means rape in any degree, sodomy in any  degree, unlawful sexual penetration
in any degree and sexual abuse in the first or second degree.
(2) The Department of Corrections shall establish a  medical treatment program for persons
convicted of a sex  crime or a felony attempt to commit a sex crime. Any person sentenced for a sex
crime or  a felony attempt to commit a sex crime may be evaluated to determine if available medical
or psychological treatment would be likely to reduce the  biological, emotional or psychological im-
pulses that were the probable cause of the person’s criminal conduct. If the  evaluation determines
that the  person is a suitable candidate, the department shall offer to allow the person to participate
in the medical treatment program. The person must agree to become a program participant.
(3) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision shall offer as a condition  of parole
or post-prison supervision to persons convicted of a sex  crime or a felony attempt to commit a sex
crime the opportunity to participate in a medical treatment program  established by the Department
of Corrections under this section. Any  person eligible for release for a sex crime or felony attempt
to commit a sex crime may be evaluated to determine if available medical or  psychological treat-
ment would be likely to reduce the biological, emotional or  psychological impulses that were the
probable cause of the person’s criminal  conduct. If the evaluation determines that the person is a
suitable candidate, the board shall offer to allow the person to  participate in the medical treatment
program. The person must agree to become a program participant.
(4) The Department of Corrections shall  adopt rules prescribing the procedures and guidelines
for implementing the medical treatment programs required under the provisions of this section.
SECTION 72.
 ORS 430.401 is amended to read:
430.401. (1)  A police officer, physician, naturopathic physician, [ physician assistant ] physician
associate, nurse practitioner, judge, treatment facility, treatment facility staff member or sobering
facility that is registered with the Oregon Health Authority  under ORS 430.262 based on a written
request for registration received by the authority before  January 1, 2016, or the staff of the sobering
facility, may not be held criminally or  civilly liable for actions pursuant to ORS 430.315, 430.335,
430.397 to 430.401 and 430.402 provided the actions are in good faith, on probable  cause and without
malice.
(2) A sobering facility registered with the authority under ORS 430.262  based on a written re-
quest for registration received by the authority on or after January 1, 2016, and the staff  of the
sobering facility, may not be held  criminally or civilly liable for actions pursuant to ORS 430.315,
430.335, 430.397 to 430.401 and 430.402 provided the actions are in good faith,  on probable cause and
without gross negligence.
SECTION 73.  ORS 430.735 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 53
430.735. As used in ORS 430.735 to 430.765:
(1) “Abuse” means one or more of the following:
(a) Abandonment,  including desertion or willful forsaking of an adult or the withdrawal or neg-
lect of duties and obligations owed an adult by a caregiver or other person.
(b) Any physical injury to an adult caused by other than accidental means, or  that appears to
be at variance with the explanation given of the injury.
(c) Willful infliction of physical pain or injury upon an adult.
(d) Sexual abuse.
(e) Neglect.
(f) Verbal abuse of an adult.
(g) Financial exploitation of an adult.
(h) Involuntary seclusion of an adult for the convenience of the caregiver or to  discipline the
adult.
(i) A wrongful use  of a physical or chemical restraint upon an adult, excluding an act of re-
straint prescribed by a physician licensed under ORS chapter  677, [ physician assistant ] physician
associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to  677.525, naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chap-
ter 685 or nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390 and any treatment activities that
are consistent with an approved treatment plan or in connection with a court order.
(j) An act that constitutes a crime under ORS 163.375, 163.405, 163.411, 163.415, 163.425,  163.427,
163.465 or 163.467.
(k) Any death of an adult caused by other than accidental or natural means.
(L) The  restraint or seclusion of an adult with a developmental disability in violation of ORS
339.288, 339.291 or 339.308.
(m) The infliction of corporal punishment on an adult with a developmental disability  in vio-
lation of ORS 339.250 (9).
(2) “Adult” means a person 18 years of age or older:
(a) With a developmental disability who  is currently receiving services from a community pro-
gram or facility or who was previously determined eligible for services as an  adult by a community
program or facility;
(b) With a severe and persistent mental illness  who is receiving mental health treatment from
a community program; or
(c) Who is receiving services for a substance use disorder  or a mental illness in a facility or a
state hospital.
(3) “Adult protective services” means the necessary actions taken to prevent abuse or  exploi-
tation of an adult, to prevent self-destructive acts and  to safeguard the adult’s person, property and
funds, including petitioning for a protective order as defined in ORS 125.005. Any actions  taken to
protect an adult shall be undertaken in a manner that is least intrusive  to the adult and provides
for the greatest degree of independence.
(4) “Caregiver” means an individual,  whether paid or unpaid, or a facility that has assumed re-
sponsibility for all or a portion of the care of an adult as a result of a contract or agreement.
(5) “Community program” includes:
(a) A  community mental health program or a community developmental disabilities program as
established in ORS 430.610 to 430.695; or
(b) A provider that is paid directly  or indirectly by the Oregon Health Authority to provide
mental health treatment in the community.
(6) “Facility” means a residential treatment home or facility, residential care facility, adult fos-
ter home, residential training home or facility or crisis respite facility.
(7) “Financial exploitation” means:
(a) Wrongfully taking the assets, funds  or property belonging to or intended for the use of an
adult.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 54
(b) Alarming an adult by conveying a threat to wrongfully take or appropriate money or  prop-
erty of the adult  if the adult would reasonably believe that the threat conveyed would be carried
out.
(c) Misappropriating, misusing or transferring without authorization any money  from any ac-
count held jointly or singly by an adult.
(d) Failing to use the  income or assets of an adult effectively for the support and maintenance
of the adult.
(8) “Intimidation” means compelling or deterring conduct by threat.
(9) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) Any city or municipal police department;
(b) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125;
(c) Any county sheriff’s office;
(d) The Oregon State Police; or
(e) Any district attorney.
(10) “Neglect” means:
(a) Failure to provide the care, supervision or services necessary to maintain the physical  and
mental health of an adult that may result in physical harm or significant emotional harm to  the
adult;
(b) Failure of a caregiver to make a reasonable effort to protect an adult from abuse; or
(c) Withholding of services necessary to maintain the health and well-being  of an adult that
leads to physical harm of the adult.
(11) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician licensed under ORS chapter  677, [physician assistant ] physician associate licensed
under ORS 677.505 to 677.525, naturopathic physician,  psychologist or chiropractor, including any
intern or resident;
(b) Licensed practical nurse, registered nurse, nurse’s aide, home health aide or  employee of an
in-home health service;
(c) Employee of the Department of Human Services  or Oregon Health Authority, local health
department, community mental health program or community developmental  disabilities program or
private agency contracting with a public body to provide any community mental health service;
(d) Peace officer;
(e) Member of the clergy;
(f) Regulated social worker;
(g) Physical, speech or occupational therapist;
(h) Information and referral, outreach or crisis worker;
(i) Attorney;
(j) Licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist;
(k) Any public official;
(L) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider;
(m) Elected official of a branch of government of this state or a  state agency, board, commission
or department of a branch of government of this state or  of a city, county or other political subdi-
vision in this state;
(n) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600;
(o) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600; or
(p) Individual paid by the Department of Human Services  to provide a service identified in an
individualized service plan of an adult with a developmental disability.
(12) “Services” includes but is not limited to the  provision of food, clothing, medicine, housing,
medical services, assistance with bathing or  personal hygiene or any other service essential to the
well-being of an adult.
(13)(a) “Sexual abuse” means:
(A) Sexual contact with a nonconsenting adult or with an adult considered incapable of con-
senting to a sexual act under ORS 163.315;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 55
(B) Sexual  harassment, sexual exploitation or inappropriate exposure to sexually explicit mate-
rial or language;
(C) Any sexual contact between an employee of a  facility or paid caregiver and an adult served
by the facility or caregiver;
(D) Any sexual contact between an adult and a relative of the adult other than a spouse;
(E) Any sexual contact that is achieved through force, trickery, threat or coercion; or
(F) Any sexual contact between  an individual receiving mental health or substance abuse
treatment and the individual providing the mental health or substance abuse treatment.
(b) “Sexual abuse” does not mean consensual sexual contact between an adult  and a paid
caregiver who is the spouse of the adult.
(14) “Sexual contact” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163.305.
(15) “Verbal abuse” means to threaten significant physical or emotional harm  to an adult
through the use of:
(a) Derogatory or inappropriate names, insults, verbal assaults, profanity or ridicule; or
(b) Harassment, coercion, threats, intimidation, humiliation, mental  cruelty or inappropriate
sexual comments.
SECTION 74.
 ORS 431.180 is amended to read:
431.180. (1) Nothing in ORS 431.001 to 431.550 and 431.990 or any  other public health law of this
state shall be construed as authorizing the Oregon Health Authority or its representatives, or  any
local public health authority or its representatives, to  interfere in any manner with an individual’s
right to select the physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate, naturopathic physician or
nurse practitioner of the individual’s choice or the individual’s choice of mode  of treatment, nor as
interfering with the practice  of a person whose religion treats or administers sick or suffering peo-
ple by purely spiritual means.
(2) This section does not  apply to the laws of this state imposing sanitary requirements or rules
adopted under the laws of this state imposing sanitary requirements.
SECTION 75.  ORS 431A.570 is amended to read:
431A.570. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Communicable disease” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.005.
(b) “Good  faith effort to obtain the voluntary consent of the source person” includes a good faith
effort to locate or contact the source person.
(c) “Significant exposure”  means direct contact with blood, bodily fluids or other potentially
infectious materials of a person, and the contact  is capable of transmitting a communicable disease.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,  an employee of the Department of Corrections,
a law enforcement officer as defined in ORS 414.805, a parole  and probation officer as defined in
ORS 181A.355, a corrections  officer as defined in ORS 181A.355, an emergency medical services
provider as defined in ORS 682.025, a licensed health care  provider as defined in ORS 433.060 or a
firefighter who, in the performance of the person’s official duties, comes into  contact with the blood,
bodily fluid or other potentially infectious material of  another person may petition the circuit court
for an order compelling the testing of  the source person for a communicable disease, provided that
the person making the petition has first made a good faith effort to obtain the  voluntary consent
of the source person to be tested for a communicable disease.
(3) A petition submitted under this section must:
(a) Set forth the facts and circumstances of the contact with  the source person and the reasons
the petitioner and a medically  trained person representing the petitioner, if available, believe the
contact with the source person constitutes significant exposure and that testing is appropriate;
(b) If a medically trained person is not available to represent the petitioner, include the  reason
for the unavailability;
(c) Include information sufficient to identify the source person and  the location of the source
person, if known; and
(d) Include a statement by the petitioner  attesting to having made a good faith effort to obtain
the voluntary consent of the source person to be tested for a communicable disease.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 56
(4) The circuit court shall hold an  ex parte hearing in person, by telephone or by other appro-
priate means no later than  three judicial days after receiving a petition under this section. Upon
a finding that the requirements  of subsection (3) of this section have been met and a showing that
the circumstances create probable cause to conclude that the petitioner’s  contact with the source
person constitutes significant exposure, the court shall order the testing of the  source person. The
court shall issue the order no  later than four judicial days after receiving a petition under this
section.
(5) If the circuit court orders a test under subsection (4) of this section:
(a) The order shall direct the source person to allow a test to be performed by  a licensed health
care provider, without delay, for a communicable disease that may be transmitted  by the type of
contact that occurred and may specify the date by which the test must  be completed. If the source
person is in custody or otherwise subject to the legal control of another person, the order may  be
directed to the agency with custody of, or the other person with legal control over,  the source
person. The order may direct  the agency or other person to provide the source person with a copy
of the order. The order may contain any directions necessary to ensure that the test is performed.
(b) The petitioner shall designate a  physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse
practitioner to receive the results of the test on behalf of the petitioner.
(c) The order must inform the source person,  or the agency with custody of or other person with
legal control over the source person, of:
(A) The physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner who  is to re-
ceive the results of the test on behalf of the petitioner; and
(B) How to obtain payment for costs under subsection (8) of this section.
(d) The order must be served on the source person, or the agency with  custody of or other
person with  legal control over the source person, in the manner directed by the court. The court
may provide for service of the order by any means appropriate to the circumstances of the source
person, including directing the petitioner or the sheriff to serve  the order. The costs associated with
serving the order must be paid as provided under subsection (8) of this section.
(e) The order is enforceable through the contempt powers of the court.
(6) The results of a test ordered under this section:
(a) Are confidential and not subject to public disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478; and
(b) May be made available only to the physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  or
nurse practitioner designated by the petitioner to receive  the results of the test, the Oregon Health
Authority and the source person.
(7) Blood, bodily fluids or other potentially infectious  materials taken from a source person for
the purpose of performing a test under this section:
(a) May not be used for a  civil or criminal investigation or as evidence in civil or criminal
proceeding; and
(b) May be retained only as long  as necessary to confirm the results of a test performed under
this section.
(8) A charge or filing fee may not be imposed  for the filing of a petition under this section. The
cost of any testing  ordered under this section shall be the responsibility of the employer of the
petitioner.
SECTION 76.
 ORS 432.005 is amended to read:
432.005. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Alkaline hydrolysis” or “hydrolysis” means the technical process for reducing human  re-
mains by placing the remains in a  dissolution chamber that uses heat, pressure, water and base
chemical agents, in a licensed hydrolysis  facility, to reduce human remains to bone fragments and
essential elements.
(2) “Amendment” means a change to an item that appears  on a certified copy of a vital record
after a certified copy has been issued.
(3) “Authorized representative”  means an agent designated in a written statement signed by the
registrant or other qualified applicant, the signing of which was witnessed.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 57
(4) “Certified copy” means the document, in either  paper or electronic format, issued by the
State Registrar of the Center for Health Statistics and  containing all or a part of the information
contained on the original vital record, and which, when issued by the  state registrar, has the full
force and effect of the original vital record.
(5) “Certified copy item” means any item of information that appears on a certified copy.
(6) “Certifier”  means a person required to attest to the accuracy of information submitted on a
report.
(7) “Correction” means a change to an  item that is not included in a certified copy of a vital
record, or a change  to an item that is included in a certified copy provided that no certified copy
has been issued.
(8) “Court of competent jurisdiction” means a court within  the United States with jurisdiction
over a person subject to regulation under this chapter.
(9) “Date of  registration” means the month, day and year a vital record is incorporated into the
official records of the Center for Health Statistics.
(10) “Dead body” means a human body or such parts of such human body from the condition  of
which it reasonably may be concluded that death occurred.
(11) “Electronic signature”  means an electronic sound, symbol or process attached to or log-
ically associated with a contract or other  record that is executed or adopted by a person with the
intent to attest to the accuracy of the facts in the record.
(12) “Government agency” means a unit of federal, state, local or tribal government.
(13) “Health research” means a systematic study to gain  information and understanding about
health, with the goal of finding ways to improve human health, that conforms to or is conducted in
accordance with generally  accepted scientific standards or principles and that is designed to develop
or contribute to general scientific knowledge.
(14) “Facts of live birth” means the name of the child, date of birth, place  of birth, sex and
parent’s name or parents’ names appearing on the record of live birth.
(15) “Fetal death” means  death prior to the complete expulsion or extraction from its mother
of a product of human conception, irrespective of the duration of pregnancy, that is not  an induced
termination of pregnancy. The death is indicated by  the fact that after such expulsion or extraction
the fetus does not breathe or show any other evidence of life such as beating of the heart,  pulsation
of the umbilical cord or definite movement of the voluntary muscles.
(16) “Final disposition” means the burial, interment, cremation, reduction, removal from the
state or other authorized disposition of a  dead body or fetus, except that when removal from the
state is conducted by the holder of a certificate of removal registration issued under ORS 692.270,
the final disposition may not be considered complete until the report of death is filed.
(17)(a) “Human remains” means a dead body.
(b) “Human  remains” does not include cremated or reduced human remains recovered after
cremation or reduction.
(18)(a) “Induced termination of pregnancy” means the  purposeful interruption of an intrauterine
pregnancy with the intention other than to produce a live-born infant and that does not result in  a
live birth.
(b) “Induced termination of pregnancy” does not include  management of prolonged retention of
products of conception following fetal death.
(19) “Institution” means any establishment, public or private, that  provides inpatient or outpa-
tient medical, surgical or diagnostic  care or treatment or nursing, custodial or domiciliary care, or
to which persons are committed by law.
(20) “Interment” means the disposition of human remains by entombment or burial.
(21) “Legal representative”  means a licensed attorney representing the registrant or other
qualified applicant.
(22) “Live birth” means the complete expulsion or  extraction from its mother of a product of
human conception, irrespective of the duration of  pregnancy, that, after such expulsion or ex-
traction, breathes or shows any other evidence of life such as beating of the  heart, pulsation of the
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 58
umbilical cord or definite movement of voluntary muscles, whether or not  the umbilical cord has
been cut or the placenta is attached.
(23) “Medical certifier” means a  physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse
practitioner licensed under the laws of this state or under the laws of Washington, Idaho or
California who has treated a decedent within the 12 months preceding death.
(24) “Natural organic reduction” means the contained, accelerated conversion  of human remains
to soil.
(25) “Person acting as a funeral service practitioner” means:
(a) A person other than a funeral service practitioner licensed under ORS 692.045, including  but
not limited to a relative,  friend or other interested party, who performs the duties of a funeral ser-
vice practitioner without payment; or
(b) A funeral service practitioner who submits  reports of death in another state if the funeral
service practitioner is employed by a funeral establishment licensed in  another state and registered
with the State Mortuary and Cemetery Board under ORS 692.270.
(26) “Person in charge of an institution”  means the officer or employee who is responsible for
administration of an institution.
(27) “Personally  identifiable information” means information that can be used to distinguish or
trace an individual’s identity or, when combined with other  personal or identifying information, is
linked or linkable to a specific individual.
(28) “Physician” means a  person authorized to practice medicine, chiropractic or naturopathic
medicine under the  laws of this state or under the laws of Washington, Idaho or California, a [ phy-
sician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or a nurse practitioner
licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390.
(29) “Record” means a report that has been registered by the state registrar.
(30) “Record of foreign live  birth” means a document registered by the state registrar for a
person born  in a foreign country who may or may not be a citizen of the United States and who
was adopted under the laws of this state.
(31) “Reduction”  means an authorized process for reducing human remains. Authorized proc-
esses for reducing  human remains include alkaline hydrolysis, natural organic reduction and any
other alternative process authorized by the State Mortuary and Cemetery Board.
(32) “Registration” means the process by which vital records and reports  are accepted and in-
corporated into the official records of the Center for Health Statistics.
(33) “Report” means a document, whether in paper or electronic format, containing information
related to a vital  event submitted by a person required to submit the information to the state
registrar for the purpose of registering a vital event.
(34) “State” includes a state or territory of the United States, the District of Columbia  and New
York City.
(35) “System of vital statistics” means:
(a) The collection, registration, preservation, amendment, certification and verification  of, and
the maintenance of the security and integrity of, vital records;
(b) The collection of reports required by this chapter; and
(c) Activities related to the activities described  in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, in-
cluding the tabulation, analysis, dissemination and publication of vital statistics and training in  the
use of health data.
(36) “Verification” means confirmation of the information on  a vital record based on the facts
contained in a report.
(37) “Vital record” means a report of a live birth, death, fetal death, marriage, declaration of
domestic partnership, dissolution of marriage or domestic partnership and related data  that have
been accepted for registration and incorporated  into the official records of the Center for Health
Statistics.
(38) “Vital statistics” means the aggregated data derived from  records and reports of live birth,
death, fetal death, induced termination of pregnancy, marriage, declaration of  domestic partnership,
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 59
dissolution of marriage, dissolution of domestic partnership  and supporting documentation and re-
lated reports.
SECTION 77.  ORS 433.010 is amended to read:
433.010. (1) No person shall willfully cause the  spread of any communicable disease within this
state.
(2) Whenever the laws of this state require  a person to secure a health certificate, such certif-
icate shall be acquired from a physician licensed by the  Oregon Medical Board or the Oregon Board
of Naturopathic Medicine, a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS  677.505
to 677.525 or a nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375  to 678.390 in accordance with rules
adopted by the Oregon Health Authority.
SECTION 78.  ORS 433.017 is amended to read:
433.017. (1) A licensed physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed  under ORS
677.505 to 677.525, naturopathic physician licensed  under ORS chapter 685 or nurse practitioner li-
censed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390 attending a pregnant  woman in this state for conditions re-
lating to her pregnancy during  the period of gestation or at the time of delivery shall, as required
by rule of the Oregon  Health Authority, take or cause to be taken a sample of blood of every woman
so attended at the time of the first  professional visit or within 10 days thereafter. The blood speci-
men obtained  under this subsection must be submitted to a licensed laboratory for tests related to
any infectious condition which may  affect a pregnant woman or fetus, as the authority shall by rule
require, including but not limited to an HIV test as defined in ORS 433.045.
(2) Every  other person permitted by law to attend a pregnant woman in this state, but not per-
mitted by law to  take blood samples, shall, as required by rule of the authority, cause a sample of
blood  of  such pregnant woman to be taken by a licensed physician, [ physician assistant ] physician
associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to  677.525, naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chap-
ter 685 or nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390 and have such  sample submitted
to a licensed laboratory for the tests described under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) In all cases  under subsections (1) and (2) of this section the physician, [ physician assistant ]
physician associate, naturopathic physician or nurse practitioner shall request consent  of the pa-
tient to take a blood sample. A sample may not be taken without the patient’s consent.
SECTION 79.  ORS 433.110 is amended to read:
433.110. Every  physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate, naturopathic physician or
nurse attending a person affected with any communicable disease shall  use all precautionary meas-
ures to prevent the spread of the disease as the Oregon Health Authority may prescribe by rule.
SECTION 80.  ORS 433.260 is amended to read:
433.260. (1) Whenever any administrator  has reason to suspect that any child or employee has
or has been exposed to any restrictable disease and is required by the rules of the Oregon Health
Authority to be excluded from a school or children’s facility, the  administrator shall send such
person home and, if the disease is one that must be reported to the authority, report the  occurrence
to the local health department by the most direct means available.
(2) Any person excluded under subsection (1)  of this section may not be permitted to be in the
school  or  facility until the person presents a certificate from a physician, [ physician assistant ] phy-
sician associate  licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525, nurse practitioner licensed  under ORS
678.375 to 678.390, local health  department nurse or school nurse stating that the person does not
have or is not a carrier of any restrictable disease.
SECTION 81.
 ORS 433.443 is amended to read:
433.443. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Covered entity” means:
(A) The Children’s Health Insurance Program;
(B) A health insurer  that is an insurer as defined in ORS 731.106 and that issues health insur-
ance as defined in ORS 731.162;
(C) The state medical assistance program; and
(D) A health care provider.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 60
(b) “Health care provider” includes but is not limited to:
(A) A psychologist, occupational therapist,  regulated social worker, professional counselor or
marriage and family therapist licensed or otherwise authorized to practice under ORS  chapter 675
or an employee of  the psychologist, occupational therapist, regulated social worker, professional
counselor or marriage and family therapist;
(B) A physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS chapter 677,
an acupuncturist licensed under ORS 677.759 or an employee of the physician,  [ physician assistant ]
physician associate or acupuncturist;
(C) A nurse or nursing home administrator licensed under ORS chapter 678 or an employee  of
the nurse or nursing home administrator;
(D) A dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679 or an employee of the dentist;
(E) A dental hygienist or denturist licensed under ORS  chapter 680 or an employee of the dental
hygienist or denturist;
(F) A speech-language pathologist or  audiologist licensed under ORS chapter 681 or an employee
of the speech-language pathologist or audiologist;
(G) An emergency medical services provider licensed under ORS chapter 682;
(H) An optometrist licensed under ORS chapter 683 or an employee of the optometrist;
(I) A chiropractic physician licensed under ORS chapter 684 or  an employee of the chiropractic
physician;
(J) A naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685 or an employee of the naturopathic
physician;
(K) A massage therapist licensed under ORS 687.011 to 687.250 or an  employee of the massage
therapist;
(L) A direct entry  midwife licensed under ORS 687.405 to 687.495 or an employee of the direct
entry midwife;
(M) A physical therapist licensed under ORS 688.010 to  688.201 or an employee of the physical
therapist;
(N) A medical imaging licensee under ORS 688.405 to 688.605 or an employee of the  medical
imaging licensee;
(O) A respiratory care practitioner licensed under ORS 688.815 or  an employee of the respir-
atory care practitioner;
(P) A  polysomnographic technologist licensed under ORS 688.819 or an employee of the poly-
somnographic technologist;
(Q) A pharmacist licensed under ORS chapter 689 or an employee of the pharmacist;
(R) A dietitian licensed under ORS 691.405 to 691.485 or an employee of the dietitian;
(S) A funeral service practitioner licensed under ORS chapter 692 or an employee of the funeral
service  practitioner;
(T) A health care facility as defined in ORS 442.015;
(U) A home health agency as defined in ORS 443.014;
(V) A hospice program as defined in ORS 443.850;
(W) A clinical laboratory as defined in ORS 438.010;
(X) A pharmacy as defined in ORS 689.005; and
(Y) Any other person or entity that  furnishes, bills for or is paid for health care in the normal
course of business.
(c) “Individual” means a natural person.
(d) “Individually identifiable health information” means any  oral or written health information
in any form or medium that is:
(A) Created or received by a covered entity, an employer  or a health care provider that is not
a covered entity; and
(B) Identifiable to an individual, including demographic information that identifies the individ-
ual, or for which  there is a reasonable basis to believe the information can be used to identify an
individual, and that relates to:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 61
(i) The past, present or future physical or mental health or condition of an individual;
(ii) The provision of health care to an individual; or
(iii) The past, present or future payment for the provision of health care to an individual.
(e) “Legal representative” means attorney  at law, person holding a general power of attorney,
guardian, conservator  or any person appointed by a court to manage the personal or financial affairs
of a person, or agency legally responsible for the welfare or support of a person.
(2)(a) During a public health emergency declared under ORS 433.441, the Public  Health Director
may, as necessary to appropriately respond to the public health emergency:
(A) Adopt reporting requirements for and provide notice of those requirements to health  care
providers, institutions and facilities for  the purpose of obtaining information directly related to the
public health emergency;
(B) After consultation with appropriate medical  experts, create and require the use of diagnostic
and treatment protocols to respond to  the public health emergency and provide notice of those
protocols to health care providers, institutions and facilities;
(C) Order, or authorize local public  health administrators to order, public health measures ap-
propriate to the public health threat presented;
(D) Authorize  pharmacists licensed under ORS chapter 689 to administer vaccines to persons
who are three years of age or older;
(E) Upon approval of the Governor, take other actions necessary to address  the public health
emergency and provide notice of those  actions to health care providers, institutions and facilities,
including public health actions authorized by ORS 431A.015;
(F) Take any enforcement action authorized by ORS 431A.010, including the imposition  of civil
penalties of up to $500 per  day against individuals, institutions or facilities that knowingly fail to
comply with requirements resulting from  actions taken in accordance with the powers granted to
the Public Health Director under subparagraphs (A), (B) and (E) of this paragraph; and
(G) The authority granted to the Public Health Director under this section:
(i) Supersedes any authority granted to a  local public health authority if the local public health
authority acts in a manner inconsistent with  guidelines established or rules adopted by the director
under this section; and
(ii) Does not supersede the general authority granted to a local public health authority or  a
local public health administrator except as authorized by law or necessary to  respond to a public
health emergency.
(b) The authority of the  Public Health Director to take administrative action, and the effec-
tiveness of any action taken, under paragraph (a)(A), (B) and (D)  to (G) of this subsection terminates
upon the expiration of the declared state of public  health emergency, unless the actions are con-
tinued under other applicable law.
(3) Civil penalties under subsection (2) of  this section shall be imposed in the manner provided
in ORS 183.745.  The Public Health Director must establish that the individual, institution or facility
subject  to  the civil penalty had actual notice of the action taken that is the basis for the penalty.
The maximum aggregate total for penalties that may be imposed against an individual, institution
or facility under subsection (2)  of this section is $500 for each day of violation, regardless of the
number of violations of subsection (2) of this section that occurred on each day of violation.
(4)(a) During a declared state of public health emergency, the Public Health  Director and local
public health administrators shall be given immediate access to individually identifiable  health in-
formation necessary to:
(A) Determine the causes of an illness related to the public health emergency;
(B) Identify persons at risk;
(C) Identify patterns of transmission;
(D) Provide treatment; and
(E) Take steps to control the disease.
(b) Individually identifiable health information accessed as provided by paragraph (a) of  this
subsection may not be used for conducting  nonemergency epidemiologic research or to identify
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 62
persons at risk for post-traumatic mental health problems, or for any other purpose except the  pur-
poses listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) Individually identifiable health  information obtained by the Public Health Director or local
public health administrators under this subsection  may not be disclosed without written authori-
zation of the identified individual except:
(A) Directly to the  individual who is the subject of the information or to the legal representative
of that individual;
(B) To state, local or federal agencies authorized to receive such information by state  or federal
law;
(C) To identify or to determine the cause or manner of death of a deceased individual; or
(D) Directly to a health care provider for the evaluation or  treatment of a condition that is the
subject of a declaration of a state of public health emergency issued under ORS 433.441.
(d) Upon expiration of the state  of public health emergency, the Public Health Director or local
public health  administrators may not use or disclose any individually identifiable health information
that has been obtained under this section. If a state of emergency that  is related to the state of
public health emergency has been declared under ORS 401.165, the Public Health Director and  local
public health administrators may continue  to use any individually identifiable information obtained
as provided under this section until termination of the state of emergency.
(5) All civil penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into the State Treasury  and
credited to the General Fund and are available for general governmental expenses.
(6) The Public Health Director may request assistance in  enforcing orders issued pursuant to
this section from  state or local law enforcement authorities. If so requested by the Public Health
Director, state and local law enforcement authorities, to the  extent resources are available, shall
assist in enforcing orders issued pursuant to this section.
(7) If the Oregon Health Authority  adopts temporary rules to implement the provisions of this
section, the rules adopted are not subject to the provisions of ORS 183.335 (6)(a). The authority may
amend temporary rules adopted pursuant to this subsection as often as necessary to respond to the
public health emergency.
SECTION 82.
 ORS 433.800 is amended to read:
433.800. As used in ORS 433.800 to 433.830, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Adrenal crisis” means a sudden, severe worsening of  symptoms associated with adrenal in-
sufficiency, such as severe pain in the lower back, abdomen or  legs, vomiting, diarrhea, dehydration,
low blood pressure or loss of consciousness.
(2) “Adrenal insufficiency” means a hormonal disorder that occurs when  the adrenal glands do
not produce enough adrenal hormones.
(3) “Allergen” means  a substance, usually a protein, that evokes a particular adverse response
in a sensitive individual.
(4) “Allergic response” means a medical condition  caused by exposure to an allergen, with
physical symptoms that range from localized  itching to severe anaphylactic shock and that may be
life threatening.
(5) “Hypoglycemia” means a condition  in which a person experiences low blood sugar, producing
symptoms such as drowsiness, loss  of muscle control so that chewing or swallowing is impaired, ir-
rational behavior in which food intake is resisted, convulsions, fainting or coma.
(6) “Nurse practitioner” means a nurse practitioner licensed under ORS chapter 678.
(7) “Other treatment” means oral administration of  food containing glucose or other forms of
carbohydrate, such as jelly or candy.
(8) “Other treatment has failed” means a  hypoglycemic student’s symptoms have worsened after
the administration of a food containing glucose or other form  of carbohydrate or a hypoglycemic
student has become incoherent, unconscious or unresponsive.
(9) “Physician” means a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677.
(10) [ “Physician assistant” ] “Physician  associate”  means a [ physician assistant ] physician as-
sociate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 63
SECTION 83.  ORS 433.815 is amended to read:
433.815. (1)  Educational training on the treatment of allergic responses, as required by ORS
433.800 to 433.830, shall be conducted by  a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or
nurse practitioner. The training may be  conducted by any other health care professional licensed
under ORS chapter 678 as assigned by a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  or
nurse practitioner, or by an emergency medical services provider meeting the requirements  estab-
lished by the  Oregon Health Authority by rule. The curricula shall include, at a minimum, the fol-
lowing  subjects:
(a) Recognition of the symptoms of  systemic allergic responses to insect stings and other
allergens;
(b) Familiarity with common factors that are likely to elicit systemic allergic responses;
(c) Proper administration of an intramuscular or subcutaneous injection of epinephrine for se-
vere allergic responses to insect stings and other specific allergens; and
(d) Necessary follow-up treatment.
(2) Educational training on the treatment of hypoglycemia,  as required by ORS 433.800 to
433.830, shall be conducted by a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate , nurse practi-
tioner or any other health care professional licensed  under ORS chapter 678. The curricula shall
include, at a minimum, the following subjects:
(a) Recognition of the symptoms of hypoglycemia;
(b) Familiarity with common factors that may induce hypoglycemia;
(c) Proper administration of a subcutaneous injection of glucagon for severe hypoglycemia when
other treatment has failed or cannot be initiated; and
(d) Necessary follow-up treatment.
(3) Educational training on the treatment of adrenal  insufficiency, as required by ORS 433.800
to 433.830, shall be conducted by a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate , nurse
practitioner or any other health care professional licensed under  ORS chapter 678. The curricula
shall include, at a minimum, the following subjects:
(a) General information about adrenal insufficiency and the dangers associated with adrenal in-
sufficiency;
(b) Recognition of the symptoms of a person who is experiencing an adrenal crisis;
(c) The types of medications that are available for treating adrenal insufficiency; and
(d) Proper administration of medications that treat adrenal insufficiency.
SECTION 84.
 ORS 435.205 is amended to read:
435.205. (1) The Oregon Health Authority and  every local health department shall offer family
planning and birth control services within the limits of  available funds. Both agencies jointly may
offer the services described in this subsection. The Director of the Oregon Health Authority or a
designee shall initiate and conduct discussions of family planning  with each person who might have
an interest in and benefit from the services. The  authority shall furnish consultation and assistance
to local health departments.
(2) Family planning and birth control services may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Interviews with trained personnel;
(b) Distribution of literature;
(c) Referral to  a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677, [ physician assistant ] physician as-
sociate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525, naturopathic  physician licensed under ORS chapter
685 or nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375  to 678.390 for consultation, examination,
medical treatment and prescription; and
(d) To the extent so prescribed, the distribution of rhythm charts, the initial  supply of a drug
or other medical preparation, contraceptive devices and similar products.
(3) Any literature, charts or other family planning and birth  control information offered under
this section in counties in  which a significant segment of the population does not speak English
must be made available in the appropriate language for that segment of the population.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 64
(4) In carrying out its duties under this section, and with the consent of  the local public health
authority as defined in ORS 431.003, the  local health department may adopt a fee schedule for ser-
vices provided by the local health department. The fees shall be  reasonably calculated not to exceed
costs of services provided and may be adjusted on a sliding scale reflecting ability to pay.
(5) The local health department  shall collect fees according to the schedule adopted under sub-
section (4) of this section. Moneys from fees collected may be used to meet the expenses  of pro-
viding the services authorized by this section.
SECTION 85.  ORS 435.305 is amended to read:
435.305. (1)  A person may be sterilized by appropriate means upon request and upon the advice
of a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677, naturopathic physician licensed under  ORS chapter
685 or [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525.
(2) A health care provider described in  this section, or a hospital, may not be held liable for
performing a sterilization without obtaining the consent of the spouse of the person sterilized.
(3) Free clinics to sterilize males  under subsections (1) and (4)(d) of this section may be con-
ducted as a part of the program provided for in ORS 435.205.
(4)(a) A nurse practitioner licensed by the Oregon State Board of Nursing under ORS 678.375
and acting within the scope of practice authorized by the board may provide medical advice to  any
person about a sterilization procedure.
(b) A nurse practitioner may acknowledge and sign a consent to sterilization  procedure form if,
no fewer than  30 days before the procedure, the form is provided to and signed by the person on
whom the procedure will be performed.
(c) A nurse practitioner may not acknowledge or sign a consent to sterilization procedure form
if the form is provided to or signed by the person on whom the  procedure will be performed fewer
than 30 days before the procedure.
(d) A nurse practitioner may  not perform a sterilization procedure on any person, except that
a nurse practitioner may perform a vasectomy.
SECTION 86.  ORS 436.225 is amended to read:
436.225. (1) In obtaining  informed consent for sterilization a physician, [ physician assistant ]
physician associate or nurse practitioner must offer to answer any questions the individual to be
sterilized may have concerning the proposed procedure,  and must provide orally all of the following
information or advice to the individual to be sterilized:
(a) Advice that the individual is free to withhold or withdraw consent  to the procedure at any
time before the sterilization without affecting the right to future care or treatment;
(b) A description of available alternative methods of family planning and birth control;
(c) Advice that the sterilization procedure is considered to be irreversible;
(d) A thorough explanation of the specific sterilization procedure to be performed;
(e) A full description of the discomforts and risks  that may accompany or follow the performing
of the procedure, including an explanation of the type and possible effects  of any anesthetic to be
used; and
(f) A full description of the  benefits or advantages that may be expected as a result of the
sterilization.
(2) A  natural parent, or a legal guardian or conservator of a minor child or protected person
appointed under ORS chapter 125, may not give substitute consent for sterilization.
(3) Whenever any physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner has
reason to believe  an individual 15 years of age or older is unable to give informed consent, no
sterilization shall be performed until it is determined  by a circuit court that the individual involved
is able to and has given informed consent.  Whenever the court determines, under the provisions of
this chapter, that a person lacks the ability to give informed consent, the court shall permit
sterilization only if the  person is 18 years of age or older and only upon showing that such opera-
tion, treatment or procedure is in the best interest of the individual.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 435.210, informed consent may not be obtained while the individual  to
be sterilized is:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 65
(a) In labor or childbirth;
(b) Seeking to obtain or obtaining an abortion; or
(c) Under the influence  of alcohol or other substances that affect the individual’s state of
awareness.
SECTION 87.
 ORS 436.235 is amended to read:
436.235. A petition  for a determination of a person’s ability to give informed consent to a
sterilization procedure may be filed by the  person seeking sterilization, the attending physician,
[physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner of the person seeking  sterilization,
or by an interested person concerned with the  respondent’s health and well-being. Such a petition
shall be filed in the circuit court in the county in which the respondent resides or has domicile.
SECTION 88.  ORS 436.295 is amended to read:
436.295. (1) If the court does not determine by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent
lacks the ability to give informed consent for sterilization:
(a) If the court determines that the respondent has the ability to give informed consent  to
sterilization, the court shall issue an order so stating and  permitting the sterilization to be per-
formed. Prior to the performance of the sterilization, the physician,  [ physician assistant ] physician
associate or nurse practitioner  and hospital involved shall obtain the written informed consent of
the person for sterilization.
(b) If the  respondent refuses to consent to sterilization, the court shall issue an order so stating
and forbidding sterilization of  the respondent, unless the respondent later makes a different choice
and only after a rehearing under this section.
(2) If  the court determines by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent lacks the
ability to give informed consent for sterilization, the court shall retain  its jurisdiction and continue
the hearing to determine whether sterilization is in the best interests of the respondent.
SECTION 89.  ORS 438.010 is amended to read:
438.010. As used in ORS 438.010 to 438.510, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Authority” means the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) “Clinical laboratory” or “laboratory” means a facility where the microbiological,  serological,
chemical, hematological, immunohematological, immunological, toxicological,  cytogenetical,
exfoliative cytological, histological, pathological or  other examinations are performed on materials
derived from the human body, for the purpose  of diagnosis, prevention of disease or treatment of
patients by physicians, dentists  and other persons who are authorized by license to diagnose or treat
humans.
(3) “Clinical laboratory specialty” or “laboratory specialty”  means the examination of materials
derived from the human body for the purpose of diagnosis and treatment of  patients or assessment
of health, employing one of the following sciences: Serology, microbiology, chemistry, hematology,
immunohematology, immunology, toxicology, cytogenetics, exfoliative cytology, histology or
pathology.
(4) “Clinician” means a nurse practitioner licensed by the Oregon State Board of Nursing, or  a
[physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed by the Oregon Medical Board.
(5) “Custody  chain” means the handling of specimens in a way that supports legal testimony to
prove  that  the sample integrity and identification of the sample have not been violated, as well as
the documentation describing those procedures from specimen collection to the final report.
(6) “Dentist” means a person licensed to practice dentistry by the Oregon Board of Dentistry.
(7) “Director  of clinical laboratory” or “director” means the person who plans, organizes, directs
and participates in  any or all of the technical operations of a clinical laboratory, including but not
limited to reviewing laboratory  procedures and their results, training and supervising laboratory
personnel, and evaluating the technical competency of such personnel.
(8) “Health screen testing” means tests performed for the purpose of  identifying health risks,
providing health information and referring the person being tested to medical care.
(9) “High complexity laboratory” means a  facility that performs testing classified as highly
complex in the specialties of microbiology, chemistry, hematology,  diagnostic immunology,
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 66
immunohematology, clinical cytogenetics, cytology,  histopathology, oral pathology, pathology,
radiobioassay and histocompatibility and that may also perform  moderate complexity tests and
waived tests.
(10) “High complexity  test” means a procedure performed on materials derived from the human
body that meet the  criteria for this category of testing in the specialties of microbiology, chemistry,
hematology, immunohematology, diagnostic immunology,  clinical cytogenetics, cytology,
histopathology, oral pathology, pathology, radiobioassay and histocompatibility as  established by the
authority.
(11) “Laboratory evaluation system” means a system of  testing clinical laboratory methods,
procedures and proficiency by periodic performance and reporting on  test specimens submitted for
examination.
(12) “Moderate complexity laboratory” means a  facility that performs testing classified as mod-
erately complex in the  specialties of microbiology, hematology, chemistry, immunohematology or
diagnostic immunology and may also perform any waived test.
(13) “Moderate complexity test” means a procedure  performed on materials derived from the
human body that meet  the criteria for this category of testing in the specialties of microbiology,
hematology, chemistry, immunohematology or diagnostic immunology as established  by the author-
ity.
(14) “Operator of a substances of abuse on-site screening facility” or “operator”  means the
person who plans, organizes, directs and participates in any or  all of the technical and administra-
tive operations of a substances of abuse on-site screening facility.
(15) “Owner of a clinical laboratory” means the person who owns the clinical laboratory, or  a
county or municipality operating a clinical laboratory or the owner  of any institution operating a
clinical  laboratory.
(16) “Physician” means a person licensed to practice medicine by the Oregon Medical Board.
(17) “Physician performed microscopy procedure” means a test  personally performed by a phy-
sician or  other clinician during a patient’s visit on a specimen obtained during the examination of
the patient.
(18) “Physician  performed microscopy procedures” means a limited group of tests that are per-
formed only by a physician or clinician.
(19) “Specimen” means materials derived from a human being or body.
(20) “Substances of abuse” means ethanol, cannabis and controlled substances.
(21) “Substances of  abuse on-site screening facility” or “on-site facility” means a location where
on-site tests are performed on specimens for the  purpose of screening for the detection of substances
of abuse.
(22) “Substances of abuse on-site screening test” or “on-site test” means a substances  of abuse
test that is easily portable and  can meet the requirements of the federal Food and Drug Adminis-
tration for commercial distribution or an alcohol  screening test that meets the requirements of the
conforming products list found  in the United States Department of Transportation National Highway
Traffic Safety Administration Docket No. 94-004 and meets  the standards of the United States De-
partment of Transportation Alcohol Testing Procedure, 49 C.F.R. part 40, in effect on  October 23,
1999.
(23) “Waived test” means a procedure performed on materials derived from  the human body that
meet the criteria for this category of testing as established by the authority.
SECTION 90.
 ORS 441.064 is amended to read:
441.064. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Nurse practitioner” has the meaning given that term in ORS 678.010;
(b) “Physician” has the meaning given that term in ORS 677.010; and
(c) [ “Physician assistant” ] “Physician associate”  has the meaning given that term in  ORS
677.495.
(2) The rules of any hospital in  this state may grant privileges to nurse practitioners and [ phy-
sician assistants ] physician associates  for purposes of patient care.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 67
(3) Rules must be in writing and may include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Limitations on the scope of privileges;
(b) Monitoring and supervision of  nurse practitioners and collaboration with [ physician assist-
ants] physician associates in the hospital by physicians who are members of the medical staff;
(c) A requirement that a nurse practitioner or [ physician assistant ] physician associate co-admit
patients with a physician who is a member of the medical staff; and
(d) Qualifications of nurse practitioners  and [ physician assistants ] physician associates  to be
eligible  for  privileges including but not limited to requirements of prior clinical and hospital expe-
rience.
(4) The rules may:
(a) Regulate the credentialing and conduct of nurse  practitioners and [ physician assistants ]
physician associates while using the facilities of the hospital;
(b) Prescribe the procedures for suspension or  termination of a nurse practitioner’s or [ physician
assistant’s] physician associate’s privileges; and
(c) Allow the hospital to refuse privileges to  a nurse practitioner or [ physician assistant ] phy-
sician associate , but only  on the same basis that the hospital refuses privileges to other medical
providers.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection  (3) of this section, rules adopted by a hospital that grant privi-
leges to licensed registered  nurses who are licensed by the Oregon State Board of Nursing as nurse
practitioners specializing in nurse midwifery must:
(a) Include admitting privileges;
(b) Be consistent with the privileges of the other medical staff; and
(c) Permit the nurse practitioner specializing in nurse midwifery to exercise the  voting rights
of the other members of the medical staff.
(6) Rules described in this section are subject to hospital and medical staff bylaws  and rules
governing credentialing and staff privileges.
SECTION 91.
 ORS 441.098 is amended to read:
441.098. (1) As used in this section and ORS 441.099 and 441.991:
(a) “Facility” means a hospital, outpatient clinic owned  by a hospital, ambulatory surgical cen-
ter, freestanding birthing center or facility that receives  Medicare reimbursement as an independent
diagnostic testing facility.
(b) “Financial interest” means a five percent or greater direct or indirect ownership interest.
(c)(A) “Health practitioner” means a physician, naturopathic physician  licensed under ORS
chapter 685, dentist,  direct entry midwife, licensed [ physician assistant ] physician associate  or
medical imaging  licensee under ORS 688.405 to 688.605 or a nurse practitioner or nurse practitioner
specializing in nurse midwifery licensed under ORS chapter 678.
(B) “Health practitioner” does not include a  provider in a health maintenance organization as
defined in ORS 750.005.
(d) “Physician” has the meaning given that term in ORS 677.010.
(2) A health practitioner’s  decision to refer a patient to a facility for a diagnostic test or health
care treatment or service  shall be based on the patient’s clinical needs and personal health choices.
(3) If a health practitioner refers a patient for a diagnostic test or health  care treatment or
service at a facility in which the health practitioner or an immediate family member of the health
practitioner has a financial interest, the health practitioner or the practitioner’s designee shall  in-
form the patient orally and in writing of that interest at the time of the referral.
(4)(a) If a health practitioner refers a patient to a  facility for a diagnostic test or health care
treatment or service, the health practitioner or the practitioner’s designee shall inform the  patient,
in the form and manner prescribed by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, that:
(A) The patient may receive the test, treatment or service at  a different facility of the patient’s
choice;  and
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 68
(B) If the patient chooses a different facility, the patient should contact  the patient’s insurer
regarding the extent  of coverage or the limitations on coverage for the test, treatment or service
at the facility chosen by the patient.
(b) Rules concerning the form and manner for informing a patient as required by  this subsection
shall:
(A) Be designed to ensure that the information is conveyed in a timely and meaningful  manner;
(B) Be administratively simple; and
(C) Accommodate a provider’s adoption and use of electronic health record systems.
(5) A health practitioner may not deny, limit or withdraw a referral  to a facility solely for the
reason that the patient chooses to obtain the test, treatment or service from a different facility.
(6) The authority may not impose additional restrictions or limitations on any referral  described
in this section that  are in addition to the requirements specified in subsections (3) and (4) of this
section.
(7) In obtaining informed consent  for a diagnostic test or health care treatment or service that
will take place at a facility, a health  practitioner shall disclose the manner in which care will be
provided  in  the event that complications occur that require health services beyond what the facility
has the capability to provide.
(8) Subsections (3)  to (5) of this section do not apply to a referral for a diagnostic test or health
care treatment or service:
(a) For  a patient who is receiving inpatient hospital services or services in an emergency de-
partment if the referral is for a diagnostic test or health care treatment or service  to be performed
while the patient is in the hospital or emergency department;
(b) Made to a particular facility after the initial referral of the patient to that facility; or
(c) Made by the facility or provider to whom a patient was referred.
SECTION 92.
 ORS 442.490 is amended to read:
442.490. (1) In carrying out its responsibilities, the Office of Rural Health shall be advised  by
the Rural Health Coordinating Council. All members of the Rural Health Coordinating  Council shall
have knowledge, interest, expertise or experience in rural areas and health care delivery.  The
membership of the Rural Health Coordinating Council shall consist of:
(a) One primary care physician who is appointed by the office from a list of physicians recom-
mended by the Oregon Medical Association and one primary care physician appointed by the office
from a list of physicians recommended by the Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons of Oregon;
(b) One nurse practitioner  who is appointed by the office from a list of nurse practitioners re-
commended by the Oregon Nurses Association;
(c) One pharmacist who is appointed by the State Board of Pharmacy;
(d) Five consumers who are appointed by the Governor as follows:
(A) One consumer representative from each of three rural health  service areas as defined by the
office; and
(B) Two consumer representatives at large from communities of less than 3,500 people;
(e) One representative appointed by the office from a list of individuals recommended by  the
Conference of Local Health Officials;
(f) One volunteer emergency medical services provider from a  community of less than 3,500
people appointed by office from a list of providers recommended by the Oregon EMS Association;
(g) One representative appointed by the office from a list of individuals recommended by the
Oregon Association for Home Care;
(h) One representative from the Oregon Health  and Science University, appointed by the presi-
dent of the Oregon Health and Science University;
(i) One representative from the Oregon Association of Hospitals and Health Systems,  appointed
by the office from a list of individuals recommended by the Oregon Association of Hospitals  and
Health Systems;
(j) One dentist appointed by the office from  a list of dentists recommended by the Oregon Dental
Association;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 69
(k) One optometrist appointed by the office from a  list of optometrists recommended by the
Oregon Optometric Physicians Association;
(L) One [ physician assistant ] physician associate who is appointed by the office from a list of
[physician assistants ] physician associates  recommended by the Oregon Society of  Physician As-
sistants; and
(m) One naturopathic physician appointed by the office  from a list of physicians recommended
by the Oregon Association of Naturopathic Physicians.
(2) The Rural Health Coordinating Council shall elect a chairperson and vice chairperson.
(3) A member of the council is  entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS
292.495.
(4) The chairperson may  appoint nonvoting, advisory members of the Rural Health Coordinating
Council. However, advisory members without  voting rights are not entitled to compensation or re-
imbursement as provided in ORS 292.495.
(5) Members shall serve for two-year terms.
(6) The Rural Health Coordinating Council shall report its findings to the Office of Rural Health.
SECTION 93.
 ORS 443.065 is amended to read:
443.065. A home health agency licensed in this state shall:
(1) Be primarily engaged in providing skilled nursing services and at least one  other service
delineated in ORS 443.075 (1)(b) and (c);
(2) Have policies established by professional personnel associated with the  agency or organiza-
tion, including one or more physicians  or naturopathic physicians and one or more registered
nurses, at least two of whom are neither owners nor  employees of the agency, and two consumers,
to govern the services that it provides;
(3) Require supervision of  services that it provides under subsection (1) of this section by a
physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate, nurse practitioner, naturopathic  physician or
registered nurse, preferably a public health nurse;
(4) Ensure that in-home care services, as defined in ORS 443.305, that it provides  in addition to
skilled nursing services are provided by individuals who meet the  training requirements established
by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 443.011, if applicable;
(5) Maintain clinical and financial records on all patients; and
(6) Have an overall plan and budget in effect.
SECTION 94.
 ORS 443.075 is amended to read:
443.075. (1) A home health agency must have an order for  treatment, plan of treatment or plan
of care from a physician, naturopathic physician licensed under  ORS chapter 685, [ physician assist-
ant] physician associate licensed under ORS  677.505 to 677.525 or nurse practitioner licensed under
ORS 678.375 to 678.390 for the following services and supplies:
(a) Home nursing care provided by or under the supervision of a registered nurse;
(b) Physical, occupational or speech therapy, medical social services or other  therapeutic ser-
vices;
(c) Home health aide services; and
(d) Medical supplies, other than drugs and biologicals, and the use of medical appliances.
(2) A home health agency shall have each plan  of treatment or plan of care reviewed by the
physician, naturopathic physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  or nurse practitioner
periodically, in accordance with rules adopted by the Oregon Health Authority.
SECTION 95.
 ORS 443.850 is amended to read:
443.850. As used in ORS 443.850 to 443.869:
(1) “Hospice program”  means a coordinated program of home and inpatient care, available 24
hours a day, that utilizes an interdisciplinary  team of personnel trained to provide palliative and
supportive services to a patient-family unit experiencing a life threatening disease with  a limited
prognosis. A hospice program is an institution for purposes of ORS 146.100.
(2) “Hospice services” means items and services provided to a patient-family unit by a hospice
program or by other individuals or community agencies  under a consulting or contractual arrange-
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 70
ment with a hospice program. Hospice services include acute, respite, home care  and bereavement
services provided to meet the physical, psychosocial, spiritual  and other special needs of a patient-
family unit during the final stages of illness, dying and the bereavement period.
(3) “Interdisciplinary team” means a  group of individuals working together in a coordinated
manner to provide hospice care. An interdisciplinary team includes, but  is not limited to, the
patient-family unit, the patient’s attending physician or  clinician and one or more of the following
hospice program personnel:
(a) Physician.
(b) [ Physician assistant ] Physician associate.
(c) Nurse practitioner.
(d) Nurse.
(e) Nurse’s aide.
(f) Occupational therapist.
(g) Physical therapist.
(h) Trained lay volunteer.
(i) Clergy or spiritual counselor.
(j) Credentialed mental health  professional such as psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric nurse
or social worker.
(k) Naturopathic physician.
(4) “Patient-family  unit” includes an individual who has a life threatening disease with a limited
prognosis and all others sharing housing, common  ancestry or a common personal commitment with
the individual.
(5) “Person” includes individuals, organizations and groups of organizations.
SECTION 96.
 ORS 453.307 is amended to read:
453.307. As used in ORS 453.307 to 453.414:
(1) “Community right to know regulatory program” or “local  program” means any law, rule,
ordinance, regulation or charter amendment established, enforced  or enacted by a local government
that requires an employer to  collect or report information relating to the use, storage, release,
possession or composition of hazardous substances and toxic substances if  a primary intent of the
law, rule, ordinance, regulation or charter amendment is the public distribution of the information.
(2) “Emergency service personnel”  includes those entities providing emergency services as de-
fined in ORS 401.025.
(3) “Employer” means:
(a) Any person operating a facility that is included  in one or more of the 21 standard industrial
classification categories in Appendix B  of the Natural Resources Defense Council v. Train Consent
Decree of June 8, 1976 (8 E.R.C. 2120); or
(b) Any person operating a facility designated by the State Fire Marshal.
(4) “Fire district” means any  agency having responsibility for providing fire protection services.
(5) “Hazardous substance” means:
(a) Any substance designated as hazardous by the Director of the Department of  Consumer and
Business Services or by the State Fire Marshal;
(b) Any substance for which a material safety data sheet is required by the Director of the De-
partment of Consumer  and Business Services under ORS 654.035 and which appears on the list of
Threshold Limit Values for Chemical  Substances and Physical Agents in the Work Environment by
the American Conference of Governmental Industrial Hygienists; or
(c) Radioactive waste and material as defined in ORS 469.300 and radioactive substance as de-
fined in ORS 453.005.
(6) “Health professional” means  a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677, naturopathic phy-
sician licensed under ORS  chapter 685, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under
ORS 677.505 to 677.525, registered nurse, industrial hygienist,  toxicologist, epidemiologist or emer-
gency medical services provider.
(7) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 181A.010.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 71
(8) “Local government”  means a city, town, county, regional authority or other political subdi-
vision of this state.
(9) “Person” includes individuals, corporations, associations, firms, partnerships,  joint stock
companies, public and municipal corporations, political subdivisions, the  state and any agency
thereof, and the federal government and any agency thereof.
(10) “Trade secret” has the meaning given that term in ORS 192.345 (2).
SECTION 97.
 ORS 463.015 is amended to read:
463.015. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Amateur athletic organization” means an entity organized and operated exclusively to foster
state, national and international amateur unarmed combat sports competition.
(2) “Entertainment wrestling” means a  noncompetitive performance in which the participants
deliver blows or apply holds with  no intent to punish or immobilize an opponent. Entertainment
wrestling is distinguished  from unarmed combat sports by the fact that the outcome of the per-
formance is predetermined.
(3) “Event” means an unarmed combat sports or  entertainment wrestling match, bout, contest,
exhibition or performance.
(4) “Exhibition” means a demonstration of unarmed  combat sports skills, the results of which
are not counted toward the official record of the competitors.
(5) “Gross receipts” means the consideration, including money, credits,  rights or other items of
value, received from the sale of tickets or  other admissions indicia or rights, without any deduction
from the total value of the consideration.
(6) “Judge” means a person licensed by the Superintendent of State  Police who is at cageside
or ringside during an unarmed combat sports event and who has the responsibility of scoring  the
bout of the competitors in the event.
(7) “Manager” means a person licensed by the superintendent who does any of the following:
(a) By contract or  agreement undertakes to represent the interests of a professional unarmed
combat sports competitor in  procuring or arranging the conduct of an unarmed combat sports event
in which the professional unarmed combat sports competitor is a participant.
(b) Receives or is entitled to receive more than  10 percent of the contracted portion of the gross
purse of a professional unarmed combat sports competitor for services related to the unarmed  com-
bat sports competitor’s participation in an unarmed combat sports event.
(c) Is an officer, director or stockholder  of a corporation that receives or is entitled to receive
more than  10 percent of the contracted portion of the gross purse of a professional unarmed combat
sports competitor for  services relating to the unarmed combat sports competitor’s participation in
an unarmed combat sports event.
(d) Directs or controls  the professional activities of a professional unarmed combat sports com-
petitor.
(e) Attends to the  professional unarmed combat sports competitor at cageside or ringside or
purports to be the manager of a professional unarmed combat sports competitor.
(8) “Matchmaker” means a  person licensed by the superintendent who is employed by or asso-
ciated with a promoter in the capacity of booking and arranging unarmed combat sports events  be-
tween unarmed  combat sports competitors and for whose activities in this regard the promoter is
legally responsible.
(9) “Medical personnel” means a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 or a  [ physician as-
sistant] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525.
(10) “Official” means  an individual authorized by the superintendent or an authorized represen-
tative of the  superintendent to perform duties as assigned by the superintendent or an authorized
representative  of  the superintendent. “Official” includes, but is not limited to, a referee, judge,
timekeeper or inspector.
(11) “Person” includes an individual, association, organization, partnership or corporation.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 72
(12) “Professional  unarmed combat sports competitor” means an individual licensed by the su-
perintendent who competes for or has competed  for a money prize, purse or compensation in an
unarmed combat sports event.
(13) “Promoter” means a person licensed by  the superintendent who arranges, gives, holds or
conducts an entertainment wrestling or unarmed combat sports event in this state and who is legally
responsible for the lawful conduct of the event.
(14) “Striking” means a physical attack in which an individual uses a  part of the individual’s
body with the intent to inflict damage on an opponent.
(15) “Submission” means an act by an individual who yields to the individual’s opponent  and
that results in the individual’s immediate defeat.
(16) “Unarmed combat sports”  means a form of competition where the intent is to win by
striking, knockout, technical knockout or  submission. “Unarmed combat sports” does not include tae
kwon do, karate, kenpo karate, judo, sumo, jujitsu, Brazilian jujitsu, submission  wrestling, kung fu,
submission grappling  or other martial art where the intent is for the competitor to win by points
only and where that martial art is exhibited independently.
(17) “Unarmed combat sports competitor” means an individual licensed  by the superintendent
who competes in an unarmed combat sports event.
SECTION 98.
 ORS 475.005 is amended to read:
475.005. As used in ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to  475.980, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Abuse” means the repetitive excessive use of a  drug short of dependence, without legal or
medical supervision, which may have a detrimental effect on the individual or society.
(2) “Administer” means the direct application of a controlled substance, whether by  injection,
inhalation, ingestion or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or an authorized agent thereof; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.
(3) “Administration” means the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States Depart-
ment of Justice, or its successor agency.
(4) “Agent” means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of  a man-
ufacturer, distributor or dispenser. It does not include a  common or contract carrier, public
warehouseman or employee of the carrier or warehouseman.
(5) “Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.
(6) “Controlled substance”:
(a) Means a drug or its immediate precursor classified in Schedules  I through V under the fed-
eral Controlled Substances Act,  21 U.S.C. 811 to 812, as modified under ORS 475.035. The use of the
term “precursor” in  this paragraph does not control and is not controlled by the use of the term
“precursor” in ORS 475.752 to 475.980.
(b) Does not include:
(A) The plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(B) Any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae, whether growing or not;
(C) Resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(D) The seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(E) Any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,  mixture or preparation of a plant, part of a
plant, resin or seed described in this paragraph; or
(F) Psilocybin or psilocin, but only if and to the extent that a  person manufactures, delivers, or
possesses psilocybin, psilocin, or psilocybin products in accordance with the provisions  of ORS
475A.210 to 475A.722 and rules adopted under ORS 475A.210 to 475A.722.
(7) “Counterfeit substance” means a controlled substance or its container  or labeling, which,
without authorization,  bears the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, number
or device, or any likeness thereof,  of a manufacturer, distributor or dispenser other than the person
who in fact manufactured, delivered or dispensed the substance.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 73
(8) “Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual,  constructive or attempted transfer, other than by
administering or dispensing, from one  person to another of a controlled substance, whether or not
there is an agency relationship.
(9) “Device” means instruments, apparatus or contrivances, including their components, parts
or accessories, intended:
(a) For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in humans  or
animals; or
(b) To affect the structure of any function of the body of humans or animals.
(10) “Dispense” means to deliver a controlled substance to  an ultimate user or research subject
by or  pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, and includes the prescribing, administering,
packaging, labeling or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery.
(11) “Dispenser” means a practitioner who dispenses.
(12) “Distributor” means a person who delivers.
(13) “Drug” means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States  Pharmacopoeia, official
Homeopathic  Pharmacopoeia  of the United States or official National Formulary, or any supplement
to any of them;
(b) Substances intended  for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of
disease in humans or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect the  structure or any function of the body of
humans or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of  any article specified in paragraph (a), (b) or
(c) of this subsection; however, the term does not include devices or their  components, parts or ac-
cessories.
(14) “Electronically transmitted” or “electronic transmission”  means a communication sent or
received through technological apparatuses, including computer  terminals or other equipment or
mechanisms linked by telephone or microwave relays, or any similar apparatus having electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
(15) “Manufacture” means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion
or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction  from substances
of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination  of ex-
traction  and  chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or la-
beling or relabeling of its container, except that this term does not include the preparation or
compounding of a controlled substance:
(a) By a practitioner as an  incident to administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in
the course of professional practice; or
(b) By a practitioner, or by an authorized agent under the  practitioner’s supervision, for the
purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(16) “Person” includes a government subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust or  any
other legal entity.
(17) “Practitioner” means physician, dentist, veterinarian, scientific investigator,  licensed nurse
practitioner, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  or other person licensed, registered or oth-
erwise permitted by law to dispense, conduct research with  respect to or to administer a controlled
substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state but  does not include a
pharmacist or a pharmacy.
(18) “Prescription” means a written, oral or electronically transmitted direction, given  by a
practitioner for the preparation and use of  a drug. When the context requires, “prescription” also
means the drug prepared under such written, oral or  electronically transmitted direction. Any label
affixed to a drug prepared under  written, oral or electronically transmitted direction shall promi-
nently display a warning that the removal thereof is prohibited by law.
(19) “Production” includes  the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing or harvesting of a
controlled substance.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 74
(20) “Research” means an activity conducted by  the person registered with the federal Drug
Enforcement Administration pursuant to a protocol approved by  the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(21) “Ultimate user” means a person who lawfully possesses a  controlled substance for the use
of the person or for the use of a member of the household of the  person or for administering to an
animal owned by the person or by a member of the household of the person.
(22) “Usable quantity” means:
(a) An amount of a controlled  substance that is sufficient to physically weigh independent of its
packaging and that does not fall below the uncertainty of the measuring scale; or
(b) An amount of a controlled substance that has  not been deemed unweighable, as determined
by a Department of State Police forensic laboratory, due to the circumstances of the  controlled
substance.
(23) “Within 1,000 feet” means a straight line  measurement in a radius extending for 1,000 feet
or less in every direction from a specified location or from any point on  the boundary line of a
specified unit of property.
SECTION 99.
 ORS 475.528 is amended to read:
475.528. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 475.525 (3), it is unlawful to provide single-use drug test strips
or drug testing tools to a minor who is under 15 years of age unless the strips or tools are provided
to the minor as part of the minor’s substance use disorder  treatment provided by a mental health
care provider and the strips or tools are provided by the mental health care provider.
(2) As used in this section, “mental health care provider” means a:
(a) Physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(b) [ Physician assistant ] Physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525;
(c) Psychologist licensed under ORS 675.010 to 675.150;
(d) Nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
(e) Clinical social worker licensed under ORS 675.530;
(f) Licensed professional counselor licensed under ORS 675.715;
(g) Licensed marriage and family therapist licensed under ORS 675.715;
(h) Naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685;
(i) Chiropractic physician licensed under ORS chapter 684;
(j) Community mental health program established  and operated pursuant to ORS 430.620 when
approved to do so by the Oregon Health Authority pursuant to rule; or
(k) Organizational provider, as defined in ORS 430.637, that holds a certificate of approval.
SECTION 100.
 ORS 475.744 is amended to read:
475.744. (1) A person may not sell or give a:
(a) Hypodermic device to a minor unless  the minor demonstrates a lawful need for the
hypodermic device by authorization of  a physician, naturopathic physician licensed under ORS
chapter 685, [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525,  nurse
practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390,  parent or legal guardian or by other means ac-
ceptable to the seller or donor.
(b)(A) Pipe to a minor unless the minor demonstrates a  lawful need for the pipe by authorization
of a physician, naturopathic  physician licensed under ORS chapter 685, [ physician assistant ] physi-
cian associate  licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or nurse practitioner licensed under ORS
678.375 to 678.390, or the minor’s parent or legal guardian; and
(B) The minor obtains the consent of the minor’s parent or legal guardian to possess the pipe.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Hypodermic device” means a hypodermic needle or syringe or medication  packaged in a
hypodermic  syringe  or any instrument adapted for the subcutaneous injection of a controlled sub-
stance as defined in ORS 475.005.
(b) “Pipe” means:
(A) Metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic or ceramic pipes with or without screens;
(B) Water pipes;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 75
(C) Carburetion tubes and devices;
(D) Chamber pipes;
(E) Carburetor pipes;
(F) Electric pipes;
(G) Air-driven pipes; and
(H) Ice pipes or chillers.
SECTION 101.
 ORS 475.950 is amended to read:
475.950. (1) A person commits the offense of failure to report a precursor  substances transaction
if the person does any of the following:
(a) Sells, transfers  or otherwise furnishes any precursor substance described in ORS 475.940
(3)(a) to (hh)  and (oo) and does not, at least three days before delivery of the substance, submit to
the Department of  State Police a report that meets the reporting requirements established by rule
under ORS 475.945.
(b) Receives any  precursor substance described in ORS 475.940 (3)(a) to (hh) and (oo) and does
not, within 10 days after receipt of the substance,  submit to the department a report that meets the
reporting requirements established by rule under ORS 475.945.
(2) This section does not apply to any of the following:
(a) Any pharmacist or other authorized person who sells or furnishes a precursor substance
upon the prescription of a physician licensed under ORS chapter  677, [physician assistant ] physician
associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525,  nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to
678.390, naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685, dentist or veterinarian.
(b) Any practitioner, as defined  in ORS 475.005, who administers or furnishes a precursor sub-
stance to patients upon prescription.
(c) Any person licensed by the State Board of Pharmacy  who sells, transfers or otherwise fur-
nishes a precursor substance  to a licensed pharmacy, physician licensed under ORS chapter 677,
[physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS  677.505 to 677.525, nurse practitioner
licensed  under  ORS 678.375 to 678.390, naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685,
dentist or veterinarian for distribution to patients upon prescription.
(d) Any person who is authorized by rule under ORS 475.945 to report in an  alternate manner
if the person complies with the alternate reporting requirements.
(e) Any patient of a practitioner, as defined in ORS 475.005, who obtains a precursor substance
from a licensed pharmacist, physician  licensed under ORS chapter 677, [ physician assistant ] physi-
cian associate  licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525, nurse  practitioner licensed under ORS
678.375 to 678.390, naturopathic physician  licensed under ORS chapter 685, dentist or veterinarian
pursuant to a prescription.
(f) Any person who sells or transfers  ephedrine, pseudoephedrine or phenylpropanolamine in
compliance with ORS 475.230 or 475.973.
(g) Any practitioner,  as defined in ORS 475.005, who dispenses a precursor substance to a person
with whom the practitioner has a professional relationship.
(h) Any person who obtains a precursor  substance from a practitioner, as defined in ORS
475.005, with whom the person has a professional relationship.
(i) Any person who sells or transfers an isomer of a precursor substance,  unless it is an optical
isomer.
(3) Penalties related to providing false information on a report required under this section are
provided under ORS 475.965.
(4) The Department of  State Police and any law enforcement agency may inspect and remove
copies of the sales records of any retail or wholesale distributor of methyl sulfonyl methane  or a
precursor substance during  the normal business hours of the retail or wholesale distributor or may
require the retail or wholesale distributor to provide copies of the records.
(5) Failure to report a precursor substances transaction is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 102.
 ORS 475.975 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 76
475.975. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)  of this section, a person commits the
crime of unlawful possession of iodine in its elemental form if  the person knowingly possesses iodine
in its elemental form.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A physician, [ physician assistant] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525,
nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390,  naturopathic physician licensed under
ORS chapter 685, pharmacist, retail distributor, wholesaler, manufacturer, warehouseman or  com-
mon carrier  or an agent of any of these persons who possesses iodine in its elemental form in the
regular course of lawful business activities;
(b) A person who possesses iodine in its elemental form in conjunction  with experiments con-
ducted in a chemistry or chemistry related laboratory maintained by a:
(A) Regularly established public or private secondary school;
(B) Public or private institution of higher  education that is accredited by a regional or national
accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education; or
(C) Manufacturing, government agency or research facility in the course  of lawful business ac-
tivities;
(c) A licensed veterinarian;
(d) A person working in a general hospital  who possesses iodine in its elemental form in the
regular course of employment at the hospital; or
(e) A person who possesses iodine in its  elemental form as a prescription drug pursuant to a
prescription issued by a licensed  veterinarian, physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate
licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525, naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685  or
nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, a person who sells  or other-
wise transfers iodine in its elemental form to another person shall make a record of each  sale or
transfer. The record must be made on a form provided by the Department of State Police,  completed
pursuant to instructions provided by the department and retained  by the person for at least three
years or sent to the  department if directed to do so by the department. Failure to make and retain
or send a record required under this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) A licensed veterinarian is not required  to make a record of a sale or transfer of iodine in
its elemental form  under subsection (3) of this section if the veterinarian makes a record of the sale
or transfer under other applicable laws or rules regarding the prescribing  and dispensing of regu-
lated or controlled substances by veterinarians.
(5) A person commits the crime of unlawful distribution of iodine in  its elemental form if the
person knowingly sells or otherwise transfers iodine in  its elemental form to a person not listed in
subsection (2) of this section.
(6) Unlawful possession of iodine in its elemental form is a Class A misdemeanor.
(7) Unlawful distribution of iodine in its elemental form is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 103.
 ORS 475.976 is amended to read:
475.976. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)  of this section, a person commits the
crime of unlawful possession of an iodine matrix if the person knowingly possesses  an iodine matrix.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A person who possesses an iodine matrix  as a prescription drug, pursuant to a prescription
issued by a licensed veterinarian, physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under
ORS 677.505 to 677.525, naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685 or nurse  practi-
tioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
(b) A person who is actively engaged in the practice of animal husbandry  of livestock as defined
in ORS 609.125;
(c) A person who  possesses an iodine matrix in conjunction with experiments conducted in a
chemistry or chemistry related laboratory maintained by a:
(A) Regularly established public or private secondary school;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 77
(B) Public or private institution of higher  education that is accredited by a regional or national
accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education; or
(C) Manufacturing, government agency or research facility in the course  of lawful business ac-
tivities;
(d) A veterinarian, physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS
677.505 to 677.525, nurse practitioner licensed  under ORS 678.375 to 678.390, naturopathic physician
licensed under ORS  chapter 685, pharmacist, retail distributor, wholesaler, manufacturer,
warehouseman or common carrier or an agent of any of these persons who possesses an iodine  ma-
trix in the regular course of lawful business activities; or
(e) A person working in a general hospital who possesses an iodine matrix in  the regular course
of employment at the hospital.
(3) Except as  otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, a person who sells or other-
wise transfers an iodine matrix to another person shall make a record  of each sale or transfer. The
record must be made on a form provided by the Department of State  Police, completed pursuant to
instructions provided by the department and retained by the person for at least three  years or sent
to the department if directed to do so by the  department. Failure to make and retain or send a re-
cord required under this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) A licensed veterinarian is not required to make a record of a sale  or transfer of an iodine
matrix under subsection (3)  of this section if the veterinarian makes a record of the sale or transfer
under other applicable  laws or rules regarding the prescribing and dispensing of regulated or con-
trolled substances by veterinarians.
(5) A person commits the crime of unlawful distribution of an iodine  matrix if the person
knowingly sells or otherwise transfers an iodine matrix to a person not listed  in subsection (2) of
this section.
(6) Unlawful possession of an iodine matrix is a Class A misdemeanor.
(7) Unlawful distribution of an iodine matrix is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 104.
 ORS 475.978 is amended to read:
475.978. (1) A person  who sells or otherwise transfers more than the amount permitted by ad-
ministrative rule adopted by the Department of State Police  of methyl sulfonyl methane to a person
other than a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS 677.505 to
677.525, nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390, naturopathic physician licensed
under ORS chapter 685, pharmacist,  veterinarian, retail distributor, wholesaler, manufacturer,
warehouseman or common carrier or an agent of any of these persons  shall make a record of each
such sale or transfer. The record must be made on a form  provided by the department, completed
pursuant to instructions provided by the department and retained  by the person for at least three
years. Failure to make and retain a record required under this subsection is a Class A violation.
(2) The department shall adopt a rule establishing the minimum amount  of methyl sulfonyl
methane the sale or transfer of which requires a report under subsection (1) of this section. In es-
tablishing the minimum amount,  the department shall determine an amount that is reasonably de-
signed not to infringe upon legitimate uses of methyl sulfonyl methane  but that discourages the use
of methyl sulfonyl methane in the illicit production and distribution of methamphetamine.
(3) This section applies to the sale or transfer of bulk methyl  sulfonyl methane in its powder
form only, and does not apply to the sale or  transfer of products containing methyl sulfonyl methane
in other forms including, but not limited to, liquids, tablets,  capsules not containing methyl sulfonyl
methane in pure powder form, ointments, creams, cosmetics, foods and beverages.
SECTION 105.
 ORS 475C.777 is amended to read:
475C.777. As used in ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919:
(1) “Attending provider” means one of the  following health care providers who has primary re-
sponsibility for the care and treatment of a person diagnosed with a debilitating medical condition:
(a) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(b) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525;
(c) A nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 78
(d) A clinical nurse specialist licensed under ORS 678.370 and 678.372;
(e) A certified registered nurse anesthetist as defined in ORS 678.010; or
(f) A naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685.
(2) “Cannabinoid” means any  of the chemical compounds that are the active constituents of
marijuana.
(3) “Cannabinoid concentrate” means a substance obtained  by separating cannabinoids from
marijuana by:
(a) A mechanical extraction process;
(b) A chemical extraction process using a nonhydrocarbon-based solvent, such as  vegetable
glycerin, vegetable oils, animal fats, isopropyl alcohol or ethanol;
(c) A chemical extraction process using the hydrocarbon-based solvent  carbon dioxide, provided
that the process does not involve the use of high heat or pressure; or
(d) Any other process identified by the Oregon Health Authority,  in consultation with the
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, by rule.
(4) “Cannabinoid edible” means food or potable liquid  into which a cannabinoid concentrate,
cannabinoid extract or dried leaves or flowers of marijuana have been incorporated.
(5) “Cannabinoid extract” means a substance obtained by separating  cannabinoids from
marijuana by:
(a) A chemical extraction process using a hydrocarbon-based solvent, such as butane,  hexane
or propane;
(b) A chemical extraction process using the  hydrocarbon-based solvent carbon dioxide, if the
process uses high heat or pressure; or
(c) Any other process identified by  the Oregon Health Authority, in consultation with the
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, by rule.
(6) “Debilitating medical condition” means:
(a) Cancer, glaucoma, a degenerative or pervasive neurological condition,  positive status for
human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immune deficiency  syndrome, or a side effect related to
the treatment of those medical conditions;
(b) A medical condition or treatment for a medical condition that  produces, for a specific pa-
tient, one or more of the following:
(A) Cachexia;
(B) Severe pain;
(C) Severe nausea;
(D) Seizures, including seizures caused by epilepsy; or
(E) Persistent muscle spasms, including spasms caused by multiple sclerosis;
(c) Post-traumatic stress disorder; or
(d) Any other medical condition or side effect related to the treatment of a  medical condition
adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule or  approved by the authority pursuant to a petition
filed under ORS 475C.913.
(7)(a) “Delivery” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.005.
(b) “Delivery” does not  include transfer of marijuana by a registry identification cardholder to
another registry identification cardholder if no consideration is paid for the transfer.
(8)(a) “Designated primary caregiver” means an individual:
(A) Who is 18 years of age or older;
(B) Who has significant responsibility  for managing the well-being of a person who has been
diagnosed with a debilitating medical condition; and
(C) Who is designated as the person responsible for managing the well-being of a  person who
has been diagnosed with a debilitating medical condition on that person’s application for a registry
identification card or in other written notification submitted to the authority.
(b) “Designated primary caregiver” does not include a person’s attending provider.
(9) “High heat” means a temperature exceeding 180 degrees.
(10) “Immature marijuana plant” means a marijuana plant that is not flowering.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 79
(11)(a) “Marijuana” means the plant Cannabis  family Cannabaceae, any part of the plant
Cannabis family Cannabaceae and the seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Marijuana” does not include:
(A) Industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.269; or
(B) Prescription drugs, as that term is defined in ORS 689.005, including  those containing one
or more cannabinoids,  that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and
dispensed by a pharmacy, as defined in ORS 689.005.
(12) “Marijuana grow site”  means a location registered under ORS 475C.792 where marijuana
is produced for use by a registry identification cardholder.
(13) “Marijuana processing site”  means a marijuana processing site registered under ORS
475C.815 or a  site for which an applicant has submitted an application for registration under ORS
475C.815.
(14) “Mature  marijuana plant” means a marijuana plant that is not an immature marijuana
plant.
(15)(a) “Medical cannabinoid product” means a cannabinoid edible and  any other product in-
tended for human consumption or use, including a product intended  to be applied to a person’s skin
or hair, that contains cannabinoids or dried leaves or flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Medical cannabinoid product” does not include:
(A) Usable marijuana by itself;
(B) A cannabinoid concentrate by itself;
(C) A cannabinoid extract by itself; or
(D) Industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.269.
(16) “Medical marijuana dispensary” means a medical marijuana dispensary  registered under
ORS 475C.833 or  a site for which an applicant has submitted an application for registration under
ORS 475C.833.
(17) “Medical use of marijuana”  means the production, processing, possession, delivery or ad-
ministration of marijuana, or use of paraphernalia used to administer marijuana,  to mitigate the
symptoms or effects of a debilitating medical condition.
(18) “Person designated to produce marijuana by a registry identification  cardholder” means a
person designated to produce marijuana by a registry identification  cardholder under ORS 475C.792
who produces marijuana for a registry identification cardholder at an address other than the address
where the registry identification cardholder resides or at an  address where more than 12 mature
marijuana plants are produced.
(19) “Process” means the compounding  or conversion of marijuana into medical cannabinoid
products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts.
(20) “Production” means:
(a) Planting, cultivating, growing, trimming or harvesting marijuana; or
(b) Drying marijuana leaves or flowers.
(21) “Registry identification card”  means a document issued by the Oregon Health Authority
under ORS 475C.783 that identifies a person authorized to engage in the medical use  of marijuana
and, if the person has a  designated primary caregiver under ORS 475C.789, the person’s designated
primary caregiver.
(22) “Registry identification cardholder” means a person to whom  a registry identification card
has been issued under ORS 475C.783.
(23)(a) “Usable marijuana” means the dried leaves and flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Usable marijuana” does not include:
(A) The seeds, stalks and roots of marijuana; or
(B) Waste material that is a by-product of producing marijuana.
(24) “Written documentation” means a statement signed by the  attending provider of a person
diagnosed with a debilitating medical condition or copies of the person’s relevant medical records.
SECTION 106.
 ORS 475C.891 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 80
475C.891. The Oregon  Board of Naturopathic Medicine, Oregon Medical Board and Oregon State
Board of Nursing may not impose a civil  penalty or take other disciplinary action against an at-
tending provider for:
(1) Advising a person diagnosed as  having a debilitating medical condition by the attending
provider or another physician licensed  under ORS chapter 677, [ physician assistant ] physician as-
sociate licensed under  ORS 677.505 to 677.525, nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to
678.390, clinical nurse specialist  licensed under ORS 678.370 and 678.372, certified registered nurse
anesthetist as defined in ORS 678.010  or naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685
about the risks and benefits associated with the medical use of  marijuana or that the medical use
of marijuana may mitigate the symptoms or effects of the person’s  debilitating medical condition,
provided that the advice is based on the attending provider’s  personal assessment of the person’s
medical history and current medical condition; or
(2) Providing the written documentation  necessary for issuance or renewal of a registry iden-
tification card under ORS 475C.783, provided that the written  documentation is based on the at-
tending provider’s personal  assessment of the person’s medical history and current medical condition
and the attending provider  has discussed with the person the potential risks and benefits associated
with the medical use of marijuana.
SECTION 107. ORS 496.018 is amended to read:
496.018. In order to be considered a person with  a disability under the wildlife laws, a person
shall provide to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission either:
(1) Written certification from a licensed physician, licensed  nurse practitioner or licensed [ phy-
sician assistant ] physician associate that states that the person:
(a) Is permanently unable to walk without the use of, or assistance from, a brace, cane,  crutch,
prosthetic device, wheelchair, scooter or walker;
(b) Is restricted by lung disease to the extent that the person’s forced expiratory  volume for one
second, when measured by a spirometer, is  less than 35 percent predicted, or arterial oxygen tension
is less than 55 mm/Hg on room air at rest;
(c) Has  a cardiac condition to the extent that the person’s functional limitations are classified
in severity as Class III or Class IV,  according to standards established by the American Heart As-
sociation;
(d) Has a permanent, physical impairment that prevents the person from holding or shooting a
firearm or bow or from holding a fishing rod in hand; or
(e) Has central visual acuity  that permanently does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with
corrective lenses, or the widest diameter of the visual field is no greater than 20 degrees; or
(2) Written proof that the last  official certification of record by the United States Department
of Veterans Affairs or any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States shows the person to
be at least 65 percent disabled.
SECTION 108.
 ORS 616.750 is amended to read:
616.750. If  the State Department of Agriculture for reasonable cause believes that any person
working in any food establishment is affected with any infectious or contagious disease,  the de-
partment may require the person to be examined by a competent physician, naturopathic  physician,
[physician assistant ] physician associate  or nurse practitioner  and that the physician, naturopathic
physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  or nurse practitioner furnish the  department
with a  certificate stating whether the person is affected with any infectious or contagious disease.
If within five days  after so required the person has not furnished the department with such a cer-
tificate by a competent physician, naturopathic physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate
or nurse practitioner, the person is guilty of a violation  of ORS 616.745 and the department may
apply to the circuit  court to enjoin the person from continuing to work in the food establishment
until the certificate is furnished. The circuit court hereby is authorized to issue the injunction.
SECTION 109. ORS 628.270 is amended to read:
628.270. (1) The Oregon Health Authority may, by rule, define certain  communicable diseases
which may be spread to the public through the handling of food in refrigerated locker plants.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 81
(2) A person  who has a communicable or infectious disease described in subsection (1) of this
section may not be  permitted to work in or about any refrigerated locker plant or to handle any
food in connection with the operation of such plant.
(3) In the discretion of the State Department of Agriculture, an employee  of a locker plant may
be required to furnish a certificate of health from a physician, naturopathic  physician, [ physician
assistant] physician associate or nurse practitioner duly accredited by the authority  for the pur-
pose of issuing such certificates. If such certificate  is required under municipal ordinance upon ex-
amination deemed  adequate by the authority, a certificate issued in compliance with such ordinance
is sufficient under this section.
(4) Any health certificate  required by this section shall be revoked by the authority at any time
that the holder thereof is found,  upon physical examination of such holder, to have any
communicable or infectious disease. Refusal of any person  employed in such locker plant to submit
to proper and reasonable physical examination, upon written demand by the authority or the de-
partment, is cause for revocation of the employee’s health certificate and also  is sufficient reason
for revocation of the locker plant’s license unless the employee  immediately is removed from any
work or operation in or about such locker plant involving the handling of food.
SECTION 110.
 ORS 656.005 is amended to read:
656.005. (1)  “Average weekly wage” means the Oregon average weekly wage in covered em-
ployment, as determined by the Employment Department, for the last quarter of  the calendar year
preceding the fiscal year in which the injury occurred.
(2)(a) “Beneficiary”  means an injured worker, and the spouse in a marriage, child or dependent
of a worker, who is entitled to receive payments under this chapter.
(b) “Beneficiary” does not include a person who intentionally causes the compensable  injury to
or death of an injured worker.
(3) “Board” means the Workers’ Compensation Board.
(4) “Carrier-insured employer” means an employer who provides workers’ compensation  cover-
age with the State Accident Insurance Fund  Corporation or an insurer authorized under ORS
chapter 731 to transact workers’ compensation insurance in this state.
(5) “Child” means a child of an injured worker, including:
(a) A posthumous child;
(b) A child legally adopted before the injury;
(c) A child toward whom the worker stands in loco parentis;
(d) A child born out of wedlock;
(e) A stepchild, if the stepchild  was, at the time of the injury, a member of the worker’s family
and substantially dependent upon the worker for support; and
(f) A child of any age who was incapacitated  at the time of the accident and thereafter remains
incapacitated and substantially dependent on the worker for support.
(6) “Claim” means a written request  for compensation from a subject worker or someone on the
worker’s behalf, or any compensable injury of which a subject employer has notice or knowledge.
(7)(a) A “compensable injury” is an accidental injury, or accidental injury to prosthetic  appli-
ances, arising out of and in  the course of employment requiring medical services or resulting in
disability or death. An injury is accidental if the result is  an accident, whether or not due to acci-
dental means, if it is established by  medical evidence supported by objective findings, subject to the
following  limitations:
(A) An injury or disease is not compensable as a consequence of a compensable  injury unless
the compensable injury is the major contributing cause of the consequential condition.
(B) If an otherwise compensable injury combines at any time with a preexisting  condition to
cause or prolong disability or a need for treatment,  the combined condition is compensable only if,
so long as and to the extent that the otherwise compensable injury is the major contributing cause
of the disability of the combined condition or the major  contributing cause of the need for treatment
of the combined condition.
(b) “Compensable injury” does not include:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 82
(A) Injury to any active participant in assaults or combats that  are not connected to the job
assignment and that amount to a deviation from customary duties;
(B) Injury incurred while engaging in or performing, or as the result of engaging  in or per-
forming, any recreational or social activities primarily for the worker’s personal pleasure; or
(C) Injury the major contributing cause of which is demonstrated to be  by a preponderance of
the evidence the injured worker’s consumption of alcoholic  beverages or cannabis or the unlawful
consumption  of  any controlled substance, unless the employer permitted, encouraged or had actual
knowledge of such consumption.
(c) A “disabling  compensable injury” is an injury that entitles the worker to compensation for
disability or death. An injury  is not disabling if no temporary benefits are due and payable, unless
there is a reasonable expectation that permanent disability will result from the injury.
(d) A “nondisabling compensable injury” is any injury that requires medical services only.
(8) “Compensation” includes all  benefits, including medical services, provided for a compensable
injury to  a subject worker or the worker’s beneficiaries by an insurer or self-insured employer pur-
suant to this chapter.
(9) “Department” means the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(10) “Dependent” means any  of the following individuals who, at the time of an accident, de-
pended in whole  or in part for the individual’s support on the earnings of a worker who dies as a
result of an injury:
(a) A parent of a worker or the parent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(b) A grandparent of a worker or the grandparent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(c) A grandchild of a worker or the grandchild’s spouse or domestic partner;
(d) A sibling or stepsibling of a worker or the sibling’s or stepsibling’s spouse  or domestic
partner; and
(e) Any individual related by blood or affinity whose close association with a worker  is the
equivalent of a family relationship.
(11) “Director” means the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(12)(a) “Doctor” or “physician” means a person duly licensed to practice one or more  of the
healing arts in any country or in any  state, territory or possession of the United States within the
limits of the license of the licensee.
(b) Except as otherwise  provided for workers subject to a managed care contract, “attending
physician” means a doctor, physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate  who is primarily
responsible for the treatment of a worker’s compensable injury and who is:
(A) A physician  licensed under ORS 677.100 to 677.228 by the Oregon Medical Board, or a
podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under ORS 677.805 to 677.840  by the Oregon Medical
Board, an oral and maxillofacial surgeon licensed by the Oregon Board of Dentistry or a similarly
licensed doctor in any country or in any state, territory or possession of the United States;
(B) For  a cumulative total of 60 days from the first visit on the initial claim or for a cumulative
total of 18 visits, whichever occurs first, to any of the medical service  providers listed in this sub-
paragraph, a:
(i) Doctor or physician licensed by the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners for the State of
Oregon under ORS chapter 684 or a similarly licensed  doctor or physician in any country or in any
state, territory or possession of the United States; or
(ii) Doctor of naturopathy or  naturopathic physician licensed by the Oregon Board of
Naturopathic Medicine under ORS chapter 685 or a similarly licensed  doctor or physician in any
country or in any state, territory or possession of the United States; or
(C) For  a cumulative total of 180 days from the first visit on the initial claim, a [ physician as-
sistant] physician associate licensed by the Oregon Medical Board in accordance with ORS  677.505
to 677.525 or  a similarly licensed [ physician assistant ] physician associate in any country or in any
state, territory or possession of the United States.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 83
(c) Except as  otherwise provided for workers subject to a managed care contract, “attending
physician” does not include a physician who provides care  in a hospital emergency room and refers
the injured worker to a primary care physician for follow-up care and treatment.
(d) “Consulting physician” means a doctor or physician  who examines a worker or the worker’s
medical record to advise the attending physician or nurse  practitioner authorized to provide
compensable medical services under ORS  656.245 regarding treatment of a worker’s compensable
injury.
(13)(a) “Employer” means any person, including receiver, administrator, executor  or trustee, and
the state, state agencies, counties, municipal  corporations, school districts and other public corpo-
rations or political subdivisions, that contracts to pay  a remuneration for the services of any
worker.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, for purposes of this chapter,  the client of
a temporary service provider is  not the employer of temporary workers provided by the temporary
service  provider.
(c) As used in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  “temporary service provider” has the meaning
given that term in ORS 656.850.
(d) For the purposes of this  chapter, “subject employer” means an employer that is subject to
this chapter as provided in ORS 656.023.
(14) “Insurer” means the State Accident Insurance Fund  Corporation or an insurer authorized
under ORS chapter 731 to  transact workers’ compensation insurance in this state or an assigned
claims agent selected by the director under ORS 656.054.
(15) “Consumer and Business Services Fund” means the fund created by ORS 705.145.
(16) “Incapacitated” means an individual is physically or mentally unable to earn a livelihood.
(17) “Medically stationary” means that no further material improvement would  reasonably be
expected from medical treatment or the passage of time.
(18) “Noncomplying  employer” means a subject employer that has failed to comply with ORS
656.017.
(19) “Objective findings” in support of medical evidence are verifiable indications of injury  or
disease that may include, but are not limited to, range of motion, atrophy,  muscle strength and
palpable muscle spasm. “Objective findings” does not include physical findings or subjective re-
sponses to physical examinations that are not reproducible, measurable or observable.
(20) “Palliative care” means medical service rendered to reduce or  moderate temporarily the
intensity of an otherwise  stable medical condition, but does not include those medical services ren-
dered to diagnose, heal or permanently alleviate or eliminate a medical condition.
(21) “Party” means  a claimant for compensation, the employer of the injured worker at the time
of injury and the insurer, if any, of the employer.
(22) “Payroll” means a record of wages payable to  workers for their services and includes
commissions, value of exchange labor and the  reasonable value of board, rent, housing, lodging or
similar advantage received from the employer. However, “payroll” does  not include overtime pay,
vacation pay, bonus pay, tips, amounts payable under profit-sharing agreements  or bonus payments
to reward workers for safe working practices. Bonus pay is limited to payments  that are not antic-
ipated under the contract of employment and that  are paid at the sole discretion of the employer.
The exclusion from payroll of bonus payments to reward workers for safe  working practices is only
for the purpose of calculations based on payroll to determine premium  for workers’ compensation
insurance, and does not affect any other  calculation or determination based on payroll for the pur-
poses of this chapter.
(23) “Person” includes a partnership, joint venture, association, limited liability company  and
corporation.
(24)(a) “Preexisting condition” means, for all industrial injury claims, any injury,  disease, con-
genital abnormality, personality  disorder or similar condition that contributes to disability or need
for treatment, provided that:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 84
(A) Except for claims in which a preexisting condition is arthritis or an  arthritic condition, the
worker has been diagnosed with the condition, or has  obtained medical services for the symptoms
of the condition regardless of diagnosis; and
(B)(i) In claims for  an initial injury or omitted condition, the diagnosis or treatment precedes
the initial injury;
(ii) In claims for a new medical condition, the diagnosis or treatment precedes  the onset of the
new medical condition; or
(iii) In claims for a worsening pursuant to ORS 656.273 or  656.278, the diagnosis or treatment
precedes the onset of the worsened condition.
(b) “Preexisting condition” means, for all occupational disease claims, any injury, disease, con-
genital abnormality, personality disorder or similar condition that contributes to disability  or need
for treatment and that precedes the onset of  the claimed occupational disease, or precedes a claim
for worsening in such claims pursuant to ORS 656.273 or 656.278.
(c) For the purposes  of industrial injury claims, a condition does not contribute to disability or
need for treatment if the condition merely renders the worker more susceptible to the injury.
(25) “Self-insured employer” means an employer or  group of employers certified under ORS
656.430 as meeting the qualifications set out by ORS 656.407.
(26) “State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation” and “corporation”  mean the State Accident
Insurance Fund Corporation created under ORS 656.752.
(27) “Wages” means  the money rate at which the service rendered is recompensed under the
contract of hiring in force at the time of  the accident, including reasonable value of board, rent,
housing, lodging or similar advantage received from the employer, and includes the amount of tips
required to be reported by the employer pursuant to section 6053 of the Internal Revenue Code of
1954, as amended, and the  regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, or the amount of actual tips
reported, whichever amount is greater. The  State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation may estab-
lish assumed minimum and maximum wages, in conformity with recognized insurance principles, at
which any  worker shall be carried upon the payroll of the employer for the purpose of determining
the premium of the employer.
(28)(a) “Worker” means any person, other  than an independent contractor, who engages to fur-
nish services for a remuneration, including a minor  whether lawfully or unlawfully employed and
salaried, elected and appointed officials of the state, state agencies,  counties, cities, school districts
and other public corporations, but does not include any person whose services are performed as an
adult in custody or ward of a state institution or  as part of the eligibility requirements for a general
or public assistance grant.
(b) For the purpose of determining entitlement  to temporary disability benefits or permanent
total disability  benefits under this chapter, “worker” does not include a person who has withdrawn
from the workforce during the period for which such benefits are sought.
(c) For the purposes of this chapter, “subject worker” means a worker who is  subject to this
chapter as provided in ORS 656.027.
(29) “Independent contractor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 670.600.
SECTION 111.
 ORS 656.245 is amended to read:
656.245. (1)(a) For every compensable injury, the insurer or  the self-insured employer shall cause
to be provided medical services for conditions caused in material part  by the injury for such period
as the nature of the injury or the process of the recovery requires,  subject to the limitations in ORS
656.225, including such medical services as  may be required after a determination of permanent
disability. In addition, for consequential and combined conditions described in ORS 656.005 (7), the
insurer or the self-insured employer shall cause to be provided only those  medical services directed
to medical conditions caused in major part by the injury.
(b) Compensable medical services shall include medical, surgical, hospital, nursing, ambulances
and other related services, and drugs, medicine, crutches and prosthetic  appliances, braces and
supports and where necessary, physical restorative services.  A pharmacist or dispensing physician
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 85
shall dispense generic drugs to the  worker in accordance with ORS 689.515. The duty to provide
such medical services continues for the life of the worker.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, medical  services after the worker’s
condition is medically stationary are not compensable except for the following:
(A) Services provided to a  worker who has been determined to be permanently and totally dis-
abled.
(B) Prescription medications.
(C) Services necessary to administer prescription medication  or monitor the administration of
prescription medication.
(D) Prosthetic devices, braces and supports.
(E) Services necessary to monitor the status, replacement or repair of prosthetic  devices, braces
and supports.
(F) Services provided pursuant to an accepted claim for aggravation under ORS 656.273.
(G) Services provided pursuant to an order issued under ORS 656.278.
(H) Services that are necessary to diagnose the worker’s condition.
(I) Life-preserving modalities similar to insulin therapy, dialysis and transfusions.
(J) With the approval of the insurer or self-insured employer, palliative care that  the worker’s
attending physician referred to in ORS 656.005 (12)(b)(A) prescribes and that is necessary to enable
the worker to continue current employment or a vocational training program.  If the insurer or
self-insured employer does not approve, the attending physician or the worker may request approval
from the Director of the Department of  Consumer and Business Services for such treatment. The
director may order a medical review by a physician or  panel of physicians pursuant to ORS 656.327
(3) to aid in the review of  such treatment. The decision of the director is subject to review under
ORS 656.704.
(K) With the approval of the director, curative care arising from a generally recognized, non-
experimental advance in medical science since the worker’s claim was closed  that is highly likely
to improve the worker’s condition and that is otherwise justified by  the circumstances of the claim.
The decision of the director is subject to review under ORS 656.704.
(L) Curative care provided to a worker to stabilize a temporary and acute waxing and waning
of symptoms of the worker’s condition.
(d) When the medically stationary date in a disabling claim is established by the  insurer or
self-insured employer and is not based on the findings  of the attending physician, the insurer or
self-insured employer is responsible for reimbursement to affected  medical service providers for
otherwise compensable services rendered until  the insurer or self-insured employer provides written
notice to the attending physician of the worker’s medically stationary status.
(e) Except for services provided under a managed care contract, out-of-pocket  expense re-
imbursement to receive care from the attending physician  or nurse practitioner authorized to pro-
vide compensable medical services under this section shall not exceed the  amount required to seek
care from an appropriate nurse practitioner or attending physician of  the same specialty who is in
a medical community geographically closer to the worker’s home. For the purposes of this para-
graph, all physicians and  nurse practitioners within a metropolitan area are considered to be part
of the same medical community.
(2)(a) The worker may choose an attending doctor, physician or  nurse practitioner within the
State of Oregon. The worker may choose the initial attending  physician or nurse practitioner and
may subsequently change attending physician or nurse practitioner two  times without approval from
the director. If the worker thereafter selects another attending physician or nurse  practitioner, the
insurer or self-insured employer may require the director’s approval  of the selection. The decision
of the director is subject to review under  ORS 656.704. The worker also may choose an attending
doctor or physician  in another country or in any state or territory or possession of the United
States with the prior approval of the insurer or self-insured employer.
(b) A medical service provider  who is not a member of a managed care organization is subject
to the following provisions:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 86
(A) A medical service provider who is not qualified to be an attending  physician may provide
compensable medical service to an injured worker for a period of 30 days from the date of  the first
visit on the initial claim or for 12 visits, whichever first occurs, without the authorization of an
attending physician. Thereafter, medical service provided to an  injured worker without the written
authorization of an attending physician is not compensable.
(B) A medical service provider who is not an  attending physician cannot authorize the payment
of temporary disability compensation. However, an emergency room physician who is not authorized
to serve as an attending physician under ORS 656.005  (12)(c) may authorize temporary disability
benefits for a maximum of 14 days. A medical service provider qualified  to serve as an attending
physician under ORS  656.005 (12)(b)(B) may authorize the payment of temporary disability compen-
sation for a period not to exceed 30 days from the date of the first visit on the initial claim.
(C) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, only a physician  qualified to serve as an at-
tending physician under ORS 656.005 (12)(b)(A) or (B)(i) who is serving as  the attending physician
at the time of  claim closure may make findings regarding the worker’s impairment for the purpose
of evaluating the worker’s disability.
(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B)  of this paragraph, a nurse practitioner licensed
under ORS 678.375 to 678.390 or a [ physician assistant] physician associate licensed by the Oregon
Medical  Board  in accordance with ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or a similarly licensed  [ physician
assistant] physician associate in any country or in any state, territory or possession of  the United
States:
(i) May provide compensable medical services for 180 days from the date of the first  visit on the
initial claim;
(ii) May authorize the payment of temporary disability  benefits for a period not to exceed 180
days from the date of the first visit on the initial claim; and
(iii) When an  injured worker treating with a nurse practitioner or [ physician assistant ] physi-
cian associate  authorized to provide compensable  services under this section becomes medically
stationary within the 180-day  period in which the nurse practitioner or [ physician assistant ] physi-
cian associate  is authorized to  treat the injured worker, shall refer the injured worker to a physi-
cian qualified to be an attending physician as defined in ORS 656.005 for the  purpose of making
findings regarding the worker’s impairment for the purpose  of evaluating the worker’s disability. If
a worker returns to the nurse practitioner or [ physician assistant ] physician associate after initial
claim closure for  evaluation of a possible worsening of the worker’s condition, the nurse practitioner
or [ physician assistant ] physician associate shall refer the  worker to an attending physician and
the insurer shall compensate the nurse practitioner or [ physician assistant] physician associate for
the examination performed.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of  this chapter, the director, by rule, upon the advice
of the committee created by ORS 656.794 and upon the advice of  the professional licensing boards
of practitioners affected by the rule, may exclude from  compensability any medical treatment the
director finds to be unscientific, unproven, outmoded or experimental. The decision  of the director
is subject to review under ORS 656.704.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of this section, when a self-insured employer or  the insurer
of an employer contracts with a managed care organization certified pursuant to ORS 656.260 for
medical services required by this chapter to be provided to injured workers:
(a) Those workers who are subject to the contract shall  receive medical services in the manner
prescribed in the contract. Workers  subject to the contract include those who are receiving medical
treatment for an accepted compensable injury or occupational  disease, regardless of the date of in-
jury or medically stationary status,  on or after the effective date of the contract. If the managed
care organization determines that the change in provider would be medically detrimental to the
worker, the worker shall not become subject to the contract  until the worker is found to be med-
ically stationary, the worker changes physicians or  nurse practitioners, or the managed care or-
ganization determines that the change in provider is no longer  medically detrimental, whichever
event first occurs. A worker becomes subject to the contract upon  the worker’s receipt of actual
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 87
notice of the worker’s enrollment in the managed  care organization, or upon the third day after the
notice was sent by regular mail by the insurer or self-insured employer, whichever event first  oc-
curs. A worker shall not be subject to a contract after it expires or terminates  without renewal. A
worker may continue to treat  with the attending physician or nurse practitioner authorized to pro-
vide compensable medical services under this section under an expired  or terminated managed care
organization contract if the  physician or nurse practitioner agrees to comply with the rules, terms
and conditions regarding services performed under any subsequent  managed care organization con-
tract to which the worker is subject. A worker shall not be subject to a contract if the  worker’s
primary residence is more than 100  miles outside the managed care organization’s certified ge-
ographical area. Each such contract must  comply with the certification standards provided in ORS
656.260. However, a worker may receive immediate emergency medical treatment that  is
compensable from a medical service provider who is not a member of the managed care organization.
Insurers or self-insured  employers who contract with a managed care organization for medical ser-
vices shall give notice to  the workers of eligible medical service providers and such other informa-
tion regarding the contract  and manner of receiving medical services as the director may prescribe.
Notwithstanding  any  provision of law or rule to the contrary, a worker of a noncomplying employer
is considered to be  subject to a contract between the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation
as a processing agent or the assigned claims agent and a managed care organization.
(b)(A) For initial  or aggravation claims filed after June 7, 1995, the insurer or self-insured em-
ployer  may  require an injured worker, on a case-by-case basis, immediately to receive medical ser-
vices from the managed care organization.
(B) If  the insurer or self-insured employer gives notice that the worker is required to receive
treatment from the managed care organization, the insurer or self-insured employer  must guarantee
that any reasonable  and necessary services so received, that are not otherwise covered by health
insurance, will be paid as provided in ORS 656.248, even if the claim is  denied, until the worker
receives actual notice  of the denial or until three days after the denial is mailed, whichever event
first occurs. The worker may elect to receive care from  a primary care physician, nurse practitioner
or [ physician assistant ] physician associate  authorized to provide compensable  medical services
under this section who agrees to the  conditions of ORS 656.260 (4)(g). However, guarantee of pay-
ment is not required by the insurer or self-insured employer if this election is made.
(C) If the insurer or self-insured employer does not give notice  that the worker is required to
receive treatment from the managed care organization, the insurer or self-insured employer is under
no obligation to pay for services received by the worker unless the claim is later accepted.
(D) If the claim is denied, the worker may receive medical services after the date of denial from
sources other than the managed care organization until the denial is  reversed. Reasonable and
necessary medical services received from  sources other than the managed care organization after
the date of claim denial must be paid as provided in ORS 656.248 by the insurer or self-insured em-
ployer if the claim is finally determined to be compensable.
(5)(a) A  nurse practitioner, or a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  described in ORS
656.005 (12)(b)(C), who is not a member of the  managed care organization is authorized to provide
the same level of services as a primary care physician as established by  ORS 656.260 (4) if the nurse
practitioner or [ physician assistant ] physician associate:
(A) Maintains the worker’s medical records;
(B) Has a documented history of treatment with the worker;
(C) Agrees to refer the worker to the managed care organization for any specialized treatment,
including physical therapy, to be furnished by another provider that the worker may require; and
(D) Agrees to comply with all the rules, terms and conditions regarding services performed  by
the managed care organization.
(b)(A) A nurse practitioner or [ physician assistant ] physician associate  authorized to provide
medical services to a worker enrolled in the managed care organization may:
(i) Provide medical treatment to the worker if the treatment is determined to be  medically ap-
propriate according to the service utilization review process of the managed care organization;  and
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 88
(ii) Authorize temporary disability payments as provided in subsection (2)(b)(D) of this section.
(B) The managed care  organization may also authorize the nurse practitioner or [ physician as-
sistant] physician associate  to provide medical services and authorize  temporary disability pay-
ments beyond the periods established in subsection (2)(b)(D) of this section.
(6) Subject to the provisions of ORS 656.704,  if a claim for medical services is disapproved, the
injured worker, insurer or  self-insured employer may request administrative review by the director
pursuant to ORS 656.260 or 656.327.
SECTION 112.
 ORS 656.260 is amended to read:
656.260. (1) Any health care provider or group of  medical service providers may make written
application to the  Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services to become certi-
fied to provide managed care to injured workers for injuries and diseases compensable under  this
chapter. However, nothing  in this section authorizes an organization that is formed, owned or op-
erated by an insurer or employer other than a health care provider to become certified  to provide
managed care.
(2) Each application for certification shall be accompanied by  a reasonable fee prescribed by the
director. A certificate is valid for such period as  the director may prescribe unless sooner revoked
or suspended.
(3) Application for certification shall be made in  such form and manner and shall set forth such
information regarding the proposed plan for providing services as  the director may prescribe. The
information shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) A list of the names of all individuals who will provide services under  the managed care plan,
together with appropriate evidence of compliance with any licensing or certification  requirements
for that individual to practice in this state.
(b) A description of the times, places and manner of providing services under the plan.
(c) A description  of the times, places and manner of providing other related optional services
the applicants wish to provide.
(d) Satisfactory evidence of ability to comply with  any financial requirements to insure delivery
of service in accordance with the plan which the director may prescribe.
(4) The director shall certify a  health care provider or group of medical service providers to
provide managed care under a plan if the director finds that the plan:
(a) Proposes to provide medical and health care services required by this chapter in a  manner
that:
(A) Meets quality, continuity and other treatment standards  adopted by the health care provider
or group of medical service providers in accordance with processes approved by the director; and
(B) Is timely, effective and convenient for the worker.
(b) Subject to any other provision of law, does not  discriminate against or exclude from partic-
ipation in the plan any category of  medical service providers and includes an adequate number of
each category of medical service providers to give workers adequate flexibility to choose  medical
service providers from among those  individuals who provide services under the plan. However,
nothing in the requirements of this paragraph shall affect the provisions of ORS 441.055 relating  to
the granting of medical staff privileges.
(c) Provides appropriate financial incentives to  reduce service costs and utilization without
sacrificing the quality of service.
(d) Provides adequate methods of peer review,  service utilization review, quality assurance,
contract review and dispute resolution to ensure appropriate treatment or to prevent  inappropriate
or excessive treatment, to exclude from participation in the plan those individuals  who violate these
treatment standards and to provide for the  resolution of such medical disputes as the director con-
siders appropriate. A majority of the members of each peer review,  quality assurance, service utili-
zation and contract review committee shall be physicians licensed to practice medicine by  the
Oregon Medical Board. As used in this paragraph:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 89
(A) “Peer review” means evaluation or review  of the performance of colleagues by a panel with
similar types and degrees of  expertise. Peer review requires participation of at least three physi-
cians prior to final determination.
(B) “Service utilization  review” means evaluation and determination of the reasonableness, ne-
cessity and appropriateness of a worker’s use of medical care resources  and the provision of any
needed assistance to  clinician or member, or both, to ensure appropriate use of resources. “Service
utilization review” includes prior authorization, concurrent review, retrospective review, discharge
planning and case management activities.
(C) “Quality assurance” means activities to safeguard or improve the quality  of medical care
by assessing the quality of care or service and taking action to improve it.
(D) “Dispute resolution” includes the  resolution of disputes arising under peer review, service
utilization review and  quality assurance activities between insurers, self-insured employers, workers
and medical and health care service providers, as required under the certified plan.
(E) “Contract review” means the  methods and processes whereby the managed care organization
monitors and  enforces its contracts with participating providers for matters other than matters
enumerated in subparagraphs (A), (B) and (C) of this paragraph.
(e) Provides a program involving  cooperative efforts by the workers, the employer and the
managed care organizations  to promote workplace health and safety consultative and other services
and early return to work for injured workers.
(f) Provides a timely  and accurate method of reporting to the director necessary information
regarding medical and health care service cost and utilization  to enable the director to determine
the effectiveness of the plan.
(g)(A) Authorizes workers to receive compensable medical  treatment from a primary care phy-
sician or chiropractic physician who is not a member of  the managed care organization, but who
maintains the worker’s medical  records and is a physician with whom the worker has a documented
history of treatment, if:
(i) The primary care physician or chiropractic  physician agrees to refer the worker to the
managed care organization for any specialized treatment, including  physical therapy, to be furnished
by another provider that the worker may require;
(ii) The primary care physician or chiropractic physician agrees to comply with  all the rules,
terms and conditions regarding services performed by the managed care organization; and
(iii) The treatment is determined to be medically appropriate  according to the service utilization
review process of the managed care organization.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph is intended to limit the worker’s right  to change primary care
physicians or chiropractic physicians prior to the filing of a workers’ compensation claim.
(C) A chiropractic physician authorized to provide compensable medical treatment under this
paragraph may provide services and authorize temporary disability compensation  as provided in
ORS 656.005 (12)(b)(B) and 656.245 (2)(b). However, the managed care organization  may authorize
chiropractic physicians to provide medical services and authorize temporary disability  payments
beyond the periods established in ORS 656.005 (12)(b)(B) and 656.245 (2)(b).
(D) As used in  this paragraph, “primary care physician” means a physician who is qualified to
be an attending physician referred to in ORS 656.005 (12)(b)(A) and who is a family practitioner,  a
general practitioner or an internal medicine practitioner.
(h) Provides a written explanation for denial  of participation in the managed care organization
plan to any licensed health care provider that has been denied participation in the  managed care
organization  plan.
(i) Does not  prohibit the injured worker’s attending physician from advocating for medical ser-
vices and temporary  disability benefits for the injured worker that are supported by the medical
record.
(j) Complies with any other requirement the director determines is  necessary to provide quality
medical services and health care to injured workers.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 90
(5)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 656.245 (5) and subsection (4)(g) of this section,  a managed care or-
ganization may deny or terminate  the authorization of a primary care physician or chiropractic
physician to serve as an attending physician under  subsection (4)(g) of this section or of a nurse
practitioner  or  [ physician assistant ] physician associate to provide medical services as provided in
ORS 656.245 (5) if the physician, nurse practitioner or [ physician assistant ] physician associate ,
within two years prior to the worker’s enrollment in the plan:
(A) Has been terminated from  serving as an attending physician, nurse practitioner or [ physician
assistant] physician associate for a  worker enrolled in the plan for failure to meet the requirements
of subsection (4)(g) of this section or of ORS 656.245 (5); or
(B) Has failed to satisfy the credentialing standards for participating in the managed care or-
ganization.
(b) The director shall adopt by rule  reporting standards for managed care organizations to re-
port denials  and terminations of the authorization of primary care physicians, chiropractic physi-
cians, nurse practitioners and  [ physician assistants ] physician associates  who are not members of
the managed care organization to provide compensable medical  treatment under ORS 656.245 (5) and
subsection (4)(g) of this section. The director shall annually report to  the Workers’ Compensation
Management-Labor Advisory Committee the information reported to the director  by managed care
organizations under this paragraph.
(6) The director shall refuse to certify or may revoke or suspend the  certification of any health
care provider or group of medical service providers to provide managed care if the director finds
that:
(a) The plan for providing medical or  health care services fails to meet the requirements of this
section.
(b) Service under the plan is  not being provided in accordance with the terms of a certified plan.
(7) Any issue concerning the provision of medical  services to injured workers subject to a
managed care contract and service utilization  review, quality assurance, dispute resolution, contract
review and peer review activities as well as authorization of medical services  to be provided by
other than an attending physician pursuant to ORS 656.245 (2)(b) shall be  subject to review by the
director or the director’s  designated representatives. The decision of the director is subject to re-
view under ORS 656.704. Data generated by  or received in connection with these activities, includ-
ing written reports, notes or records of any such activities, or of  any review thereof, shall be
confidential, and shall not be disclosed except as considered necessary  by the director in the ad-
ministration of this chapter. The director may report professional misconduct  to an appropriate li-
censing  board.
(8) No data generated by service  utilization review, quality assurance, dispute resolution or peer
review  activities  and no physician profiles or data used to create physician profiles pursuant to this
section or a review thereof shall be used in  any action, suit or proceeding except to the extent
considered necessary by the director in the administration of this chapter. The confidentiality
provisions of this section shall  not apply in any action, suit or proceeding arising out of or related
to a contract between a managed care  organization and a health care provider whose confidentiality
is protected by this section.
(9) A person participating in service utilization review, quality assurance, dispute  resolution or
peer review activities pursuant to this section shall not be examined as to any communication made
in the course of such activities or the findings thereof,  nor shall any person be subject to an action
for civil damages for affirmative actions taken or statements made in good faith.
(10) No person who participates in  forming consortiums, collectively negotiating fees or other-
wise solicits or  enters into contracts in a good faith effort to provide medical or health care services
according to the provisions of this section shall be examined or subject to administrative or  civil
liability regarding any  such participation except pursuant to the director’s active supervision of
such activities and the managed care organization. Before engaging in such  activities, the person
shall provide notice of intent to the director in a form prescribed by the director.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 91
(11) The provisions of this  section shall not affect the confidentiality or admission in evidence
of a claimant’s medical treatment records.
(12) In consultation with the committees referred to  in ORS 656.790 and 656.794, the director
shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(13) As  used in this section, ORS 656.245, 656.248 and 656.327, “medical service provider” means
a person duly licensed to practice one or more of  the healing arts in any country or in any state
or territory or possession of the United States.
(14) Notwithstanding ORS  656.005 (12) or subsection (4)(b) of this section, a managed care or-
ganization contract may designate any medical service provider or category of  providers as attend-
ing physicians.
(15) If  a worker, insurer, self-insured employer, the attending physician or an authorized health
care provider is  dissatisfied with an action of the managed care organization regarding the provision
of medical services  pursuant to this chapter, peer review, service utilization review or quality as-
surance activities, that person or entity must first apply to the director for  administrative review
of the matter before requesting  a hearing. Such application must be made not later than the 60th
day after the date the managed care organization has completed and issued its final decision.
(16) Upon a request for administrative review, the director shall  create a documentary record
sufficient for judicial review. The director  shall complete administrative review and issue a pro-
posed order within a reasonable time. The proposed order  of the director issued pursuant to this
section shall become final and not subject to  further review unless a written request for a hearing
is filed with the director within 30 days of the mailing of the order to all parties.
(17) At the contested case hearing,  the order may be modified only if it is not supported by
substantial evidence in the  record or reflects an error of law. No new medical evidence or issues
shall be admitted. The dispute may also be remanded to the  managed care organization for further
evidence taking, correction or other necessary action if the  Administrative Law Judge or director
determines the record  has been improperly, incompletely or otherwise insufficiently developed. De-
cisions by the director regarding medical disputes are subject to review under ORS 656.704.
(18) Any person who  is dissatisfied with an action of a managed care organization other than
regarding the provision of medical services pursuant to this chapter, peer review, service utilization
review or quality assurance activities may request review under ORS 656.704.
(19) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, original jurisdiction over contract  review dis-
putes is with  the director. The director may resolve the matter by issuing an order subject to re-
view under ORS 656.704, or the director  may determine that the matter in dispute would be best
addressed in another forum and so inform the parties.
(20) The director shall conduct  such investigations, audits and other administrative oversight in
regard to managed care as the director deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(21)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this  chapter, only a managed care organization certified
by the director may:
(A) Restrict the choice of a health care provider or medical service provider by a worker;
(B) Restrict the access of a worker to any category of medical service providers;
(C) Restrict the ability of a medical service provider to refer a worker to another provider;
(D) Require preauthorization or precertification to determine the  necessity of medical services
or treatment; or
(E) Restrict treatment provided to a worker by a medical service  provider to specific treatment
guidelines, protocols or standards.
(b) The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection do not apply to:
(A) A medical service provider who refers a worker to another medical service provider;
(B) Use of an on-site medical service facility by  the employer to assess the nature or extent of
a worker’s injury; or
(C) Treatment provided  by a medical service provider or transportation of a worker in an
emergency or trauma situation.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 92
(c) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, if the director finds that  a person has
violated a provision of paragraph (a) of  this subsection, the director may impose a sanction that may
include a civil penalty not to exceed $2,000 for each violation.
(d) If violation of paragraph (a) of this subsection is repeated or willful, the director may order
the person committing the violation to cease  and desist from making any future communications
with injured workers or medical service providers or from taking any  other actions that directly or
indirectly affect the delivery of medical services provided under this chapter.
(e)(A) Penalties imposed under this subsection are subject to ORS  656.735 (4) to (6) and 656.740.
(B) Cease and desist orders issued under this subsection are subject to ORS 656.740.
SECTION 113.
 ORS 656.799 is amended to read:
656.799. (1) The Director of the Department of Consumer  and Business Services shall develop
and make  available to medical service providers informational materials about the workers’ com-
pensation system including, but not  limited to, the management of indemnity claims, standards for
the authorization of temporary disability  benefits, return to work responsibilities and programs, and
workers’ compensation rules and procedures for medical service providers.
(2) Prior to providing compensable medical services or  authorizing temporary disability benefits
under ORS 656.245, a medical service provider  must certify, in a form acceptable to the director,
that the medical service provider has reviewed the materials developed under this section.
(3) As used in this section, “medical service provider” means a:
(a) Doctor or physician licensed by the State  Board of Chiropractic Examiners for the State of
Oregon under ORS chapter 684 or a similarly licensed  doctor or physician in any country or in any
state, territory or possession of the United States;
(b) [ Physician assistant ] Physician associate licensed by the Oregon Medical  Board in accord-
ance with ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or a similarly licensed  [ physician assistant ] physician associate
in any country or in any state, territory or possession of the United States; or
(c) Doctor of naturopathy or naturopathic physician licensed by  the Oregon Board of
Naturopathic Medicine under ORS chapter 685 or a similarly licensed  doctor or physician in any
country or in any state, territory or possession of the United States.
SECTION 114.
 ORS 659A.150 is amended to read:
659A.150. As used in ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186:
(1) “Covered employer” means an employer described in ORS 659A.153.
(2) “Eligible employee” means any  employee of a covered employer other than those employees
exempted under the provisions of ORS 659A.156.
(3) “Family leave” means a leave of absence described in  ORS 659A.159, except that “family
leave” does not include leave taken by an eligible employee who is  unable to work because of a
disabling compensable injury, as defined in ORS 656.005, under ORS chapter 656.
(4) “Family member” means:
(a) The spouse of a covered individual;
(b) A child of a covered individual or the child’s spouse or domestic partner;
(c) A parent of a covered individual or the parent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(d) A sibling or stepsibling of a covered individual or the  sibling’s or stepsibling’s spouse or
domestic partner;
(e) A grandparent of a covered individual or the grandparent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(f) A grandchild of a covered individual or the grandchild’s spouse or domestic partner;
(g) The domestic partner of a covered individual; or
(h) Any individual related by blood or affinity whose close association with a covered  individual
is the equivalent of a family relationship.
(5) “Health care provider” means:
(a) A person who is primarily  responsible for providing health care to an eligible employee or
a family member of an eligible employee, who is performing within the scope  of the person’s pro-
fessional license or certificate and who is:
(A) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 93
(B) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525;
(C) A dentist licensed under ORS 679.090;
(D) A psychologist licensed under ORS 675.030;
(E) An optometrist licensed under ORS 683.070;
(F) A naturopath licensed under ORS 685.080;
(G) A registered nurse licensed under ORS 678.050;
(H) A nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375;
(I) A direct entry midwife licensed under ORS 687.420;
(J) A licensed registered nurse licensed by the Oregon State  Board of Nursing as a nurse
practitioner specializing in nurse midwifery;
(K) A  regulated social worker authorized to practice regulated social work under ORS 675.510
to 675.600; or
(L) A chiropractic physician licensed under ORS 684.054, but only to the extent  the chiropractic
physician  provides  treatment consisting of manual manipulation of the spine to correct a subluxation
demonstrated to exist by X-rays.
(b) A person who is primarily responsible  for the treatment of an eligible employee or a family
member of an eligible employee solely through spiritual means,  including but not limited to a
Christian Science practitioner.
(6) “Public health emergency” means:
(a) A public health emergency declared under ORS 433.441.
(b) An emergency declared under ORS 401.165 if related to  a public health emergency as defined
in ORS 433.442.
(7) “Serious health condition” means:
(a) An  illness, injury, impairment or physical or mental condition that requires inpatient care
in a hospital, hospice or residential medical care facility;
(b) An illness, disease or condition  that in the medical judgment of the treating health care
provider poses an imminent  danger of death, is terminal in prognosis with a reasonable possibility
of death in the near future, or requires constant care;
(c) Any period of disability due to pregnancy, or period of absence for prenatal care; or
(d) Any period  of absence for the donation of a body part, organ or tissue, including preopera-
tive or diagnostic services, surgery, post-operative treatment and recovery.
SECTION 115.
 ORS 659A.413 is amended to read:
659A.413. (1) A place of public accommodation that has an  employee toilet facility shall allow
a customer to use that facility during normal business hours if:
(a) The customer requesting the use of  the employee toilet facility suffers from an eligible
medical condition;
(b) Three  or more employees of the place of public accommodation are working at the time the
customer requests use of the employee toilet facility;
(c) The customer presents a letter or other document from a  physician, naturopathic physician,
[physician assistant ] physician associate , nurse or nurse practitioner indicating that the customer
suffers from  an eligible medical condition, or presents an identification card that was issued by a
national organization that advocates for persons with eligible medical conditions and that  indicates
that the person suffers from an eligible medical condition;
(d) The employee toilet facility  is reasonably safe and is not located in an area where providing
access would create an obvious health or safety risk to the customer  or an obvious security risk to
the place of public accommodation; and
(e) A public restroom is not immediately available to the customer.
(2) This section does not apply to a gas station, as  defined in ORS 646.932, with a building of
800 square feet or less.
SECTION 116.
 ORS 676.340 is amended to read:
676.340. (1) Notwithstanding any other  provision of law, a health practitioner described in sub-
section (7) of this section  who has registered under ORS 676.345 and who provides health care ser-
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 94
vices without compensation is not liable for any injury,  death or other loss arising out of the
provision of those services, unless the injury, death  or other loss results from the gross negligence
of the health practitioner.
(2) A health practitioner may claim the limitation on liability provided by this section only if
the patient receiving health care services, or a person who  has authority under law to make health
care decisions for the patient, signs a statement that notifies the  patient that the health care ser-
vices are provided without compensation and that the  health practitioner may be held liable for
death, injury or other loss only to the extent provided by this  section. The statement required under
this subsection must be signed before the health care services are provided.
(3) A health practitioner may claim the limitation on liability provided by this section only if
the health practitioner obtains the patient’s informed consent for the health care services before
providing the services, or receives the  informed consent of a person who has authority under law
to make health care decisions for the patient.
(4) A health practitioner provides health care services without compensation for the purposes
of subsection (1) of this section even though the practitioner requires payment of laboratory fees,
testing services and other out-of-pocket expenses.
(5) A health practitioner provides health care services without compensation for the purposes
of subsection (1) of  this section even though the practitioner provides services at a health clinic that
receives compensation from  the patient, as long as the health practitioner does not personally re-
ceive compensation for the services.
(6) In any civil action in which a health practitioner prevails based  on the limitation on liability
provided by this section, the court shall award all reasonable attorney fees incurred by  the health
practitioner in defending the action.
(7) This section applies only to:
(a) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(b) A nurse licensed under ORS 678.040 to 678.101;
(c) A nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
(d) A clinical nurse specialist licensed under ORS 678.370 and 678.372;
(e) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525;
(f) A dental hygienist licensed under ORS 680.010 to 680.205;
(g) A dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679;
(h) A pharmacist licensed under ORS chapter 689;
(i) An optometrist licensed under ORS chapter 683;
(j) A naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685; and
(k) An acupuncturist licensed under ORS 677.757 to 677.770.
SECTION 117.
 ORS 676.345 is amended to read:
676.345. (1) A health practitioner described in ORS 676.340 (7)  may claim the liability limitation
provided by ORS 676.340 only if  the health practitioner has registered with a health professional
regulatory board in the manner provided by this section.  Registration under this section must be
made:
(a) By a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or acupuncturist, with the  Oregon
Medical  Board;
(b) By a nurse, nurse practitioner or clinical nurse  specialist, with the Oregon State Board of
Nursing;
(c) By a dentist or dental hygienist, with the Oregon Board of Dentistry;
(d) By a pharmacist, with the State Board of Pharmacy;
(e) By an optometrist, with the Oregon Board of Optometry; and
(f) By a naturopathic physician, with the Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine.
(2) The health professional regulatory boards listed in subsection (1) of this section shall  estab-
lish a registration program for the health practitioners who provide  health care services without
compensation and who wish to be subject to the  liability limitation provided by ORS 676.340. All
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 95
health practitioners registering under the program must provide the health professional  regulatory
board with:
(a) A statement that the  health practitioner will provide health care services to patients without
compensation, except for reimbursement for  laboratory fees, testing services and other out-of-pocket
expenses;
(b) A statement that the health practitioner will provide the notice  required by ORS 676.340 (2)
in the manner provided by ORS 676.340 (2) before providing the services; and
(c) A statement that the health practitioner will only  provide health care services without
compensation that are within the scope of the health practitioner’s license.
(3) Registration under this section must be made biennially. The health professional regulatory
boards listed in subsection (1) of this section may not charge a fee for registration under this sec-
tion.
SECTION 118.
 ORS 676.347 is amended to read:
676.347. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Health care practitioner” means a person authorized in another state  or United States
territory to practice as a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate, nurse, nurse practi-
tioner, clinical nurse specialist, dentist,  dental hygienist, dental therapist, pharmacist, optometrist
or naturopathic physician.
(b) “Health professional regulatory board” means the:
(A) Oregon Board of Dentistry;
(B) Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine;
(C) Oregon Board of Optometry;
(D) Oregon Medical Board;
(E) Oregon State Board of Nursing; and
(F) State Board of Pharmacy.
(2) A  health care practitioner may practice, without compensation and in connection with a
coordinating organization or other entity, the health  care profession that the health care practi-
tioner is authorized to practice for 30 days each calendar year or the number of days otherwise
provided pursuant to subsection (8)  of this section. A health care practitioner is not required to
apply for  licensure or other authorization from a health professional regulatory board in order to
practice under this section.
(3) To practice under  this section, a health care practitioner shall submit, at least 10 days prior
to commencing practice in this state, to the  health professional regulatory board substantially sim-
ilar to the health care practitioner’s licensing agency:
(a) Proof that the health care practitioner is in good  standing and is not the subject of an active
disciplinary action;
(b) An acknowledgement that the health care practitioner may provide services only  within the
scope of practice of the health care profession that the health care practitioner is  authorized to
practice and will provide services pursuant to the scope of practice of this state or the  health care
practitioner’s licensing agency, whichever is more restrictive;
(c) An attestation that the health care practitioner will  not receive compensation for practice
in this state;
(d) The name and  contact information of the coordinating organization or other entity through
which the health care practitioner will practice; and
(e) The dates on which the health care practitioner will practice in this state.
(4) Except as  otherwise provided, a health care practitioner practicing under this section is
subject to the laws and rules governing the health care  profession that the health care practitioner
is authorized to practice and to disciplinary  action by the appropriate health professional regulatory
board.
(5) A health care practitioner who is authorized to practice in  more than one other jurisdiction
shall provide to the appropriate health professional regulatory  board proof, as determined sufficient
by the health professional regulatory board, that the  health care practitioner is in good standing
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 96
and not subject to any  active disciplinary actions in any jurisdiction in which the health care
practitioner is authorized to practice.
(6)(a) The coordinating organization or other entity that uses the services of a health care
practitioner shall confirm with  the health care practitioner’s licensing agency that the health care
practitioner  is:
(A) Authorized to practice the health care profession claimed by the health care practitioner;
(B) In good standing; and
(C) Not subject to any active disciplinary actions.
(b) The coordinating organization or other entity shall maintain:
(A) Records  of the information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection related to a health
care practitioner for two years after the termination of the health care practitioner’s practice in this
state.
(B) Records of patients  to whom a health care practitioner provided services, in compliance with
all patient confidentiality requirements of this state, except as those requirements  are expressly
prohibited by the law of any other state where a patient’s medical records are maintained.
(c) A coordinating organization or other  entity may pay or reimburse a health care practitioner
for actual incurred travel costs associated with the  health care practitioner’s practice under this
section.
(7) A hospital or other health  care facility may not use the services of a health care practitioner
in order to meet staffing needs during a labor dispute at the hospital or facility.
(8)(a) A health professional regulatory board may adopt by rule a duration longer  than 30 days
each calendar year during which a  health care practitioner may practice under subsection (2) of this
section.
(b) A health professional regulatory board may adopt other rules necessary to  carry out this
section, including rules requiring a health  care practitioner to receive approval of and confirmation
from the health professional regulatory  board that the health care practitioner is authorized to
practice under this section.
(9) This section does  not create a private right of action against a health professional regulatory
board or limit the liability of a health professional regulatory board under any other provision  of
law.
SECTION 119.
 ORS 676.454 is amended to read:
676.454. (1) There  is created in the Oregon Health Authority a health care provider incentive
program for the purpose of assisting qualified health care providers who commit to  serving medical
assistance and Medicare enrollees in rural  or medically underserved areas of this state. The au-
thority shall prescribe by rule:
(a) Participant eligibility criteria, including  the types of qualified health care providers who may
participate in the program;
(b) The terms and conditions of  participation in the program, including the duration of the term
of any service agreement, which must be at least 12 months;
(c) The types of incentives that may be provided, including but not limited to:
(A) Loan repayment subsidies;
(B) Stipends;
(C) Medical malpractice insurance premium subsidies;
(D) Scholarships for students in health professional training programs at the Oregon Health  and
Science University;
(E) Scholarships for students at institutions of higher education based in this state who are en-
rolled in health professional training programs leading to a  doctor of osteopathic medicine or doctor
of dentistry or a license as a nurse  practitioner, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or certi-
fied registered nurse anesthetist, if:
(i) The scholarship funds are distributed  equitably among schools offering the training programs,
based on the percentage of Oregon students attending those schools; and
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 97
(ii) The maximum scholarship for each student  does not exceed the highest resident tuition rate
at the publicly funded health professional training programs in this state; and
(F) Paying the moving expenses of providers not located  in rural or medically underserved areas
who commit to relocate to such areas;
(d) If the funds  allocated to the program from the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund estab-
lished under ORS 676.450 are insufficient to provide assistance to all of the  applicants who are eli-
gible to participate in the program, the priority for the distribution of funds; and
(e) The financial penalties imposed on an individual who fails to comply with terms  and condi-
tions of participation.
(2) Eligibility requirements adopted for the program:
(a) Must allow providers to qualify for multiple health care provider incentives, to the extent
permitted by federal law.
(b) Must allow providers to qualify for an incentive for multiyear periods.
(c) Must give preference to applicants willing to:
(A) Commit to extended periods of service in rural or medically underserved areas; or
(B) Serve patients enrolled in Medicare and the state medical assistance program in  at least the
same proportion to the provider’s total number of patients as the  Medicare and medical assistance
patient populations represent in relation to the total number  of persons determined by the Office
of Rural Health to be in need of health care in the area served by the practice.
(3) The authority may use funds allocated to the program from the Health Care Provider  In-
centive Fund to administer or provide funding to a locum tenens program for health care  providers
practicing in rural areas of this state.
(4) The authority may enter into contracts with one or more  public or private entities to ad-
minister the health care provider incentive program or parts of the program.
(5) The authority shall decide no later than September 1  of each academic year the distribution
of funds for scholarships that will be provided in the next academic year.
(6) The authority  may receive gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether public or
private, to carry out the provisions of this  section. Moneys received under this subsection shall be
deposited in the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund established under ORS 676.450.
SECTION 120.
 ORS 676.650 is amended to read:
676.650. (1) There is established the Board of Certified Advanced Estheticians within the Health
Licensing Office, consisting of:
(a) Nine members appointed by the Governor; and
(b) The section manager of the Radiation Protection Services Section  of the Oregon Health
Authority, or the section manager’s designee.
(2) Of the nine members appointed by the Governor:
(a) Five must be certified advanced estheticians;
(b) Two must be physicians or [ physician assistants ] physician associates  licensed under ORS
chapter 677 or nurse practitioners licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390; and
(c) Two must be public members who are residents of this state.
(3) The board member described in subsection (1)(b) of this section is  a nonvoting ex officio
member of the board.
(4) The term of office of each appointed member is four years,  but a member serves at the
pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term  of a member, the Governor shall appoint
a successor whose term begins on January 1 next following. A member is  eligible for reappointment.
If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make  an appointment to become immediately
effective for the unexpired term.
(5) The voting members of the board shall select one of the voting members as  chairperson and
another voting member as vice chairperson. The  board shall establish the terms of service for the
chairperson and the vice chairperson and the duties and powers of the chairperson and the vice
chairperson.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 98
(6) A majority of  the voting members of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(7) Official action by the board requires the approval of a majority of the voting members of  the
board.
(8) The board shall meet at a place,  day and hour determined by the board. The board also may
meet at other times and places specified by the call of the chairperson  or of a majority of the voting
members of the board.
SECTION 121. ORS 676.860 is amended to read:
676.860. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Board” means:
(A) Occupational Therapy Licensing Board;
(B) Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine;
(C) Oregon Medical Board;
(D) Oregon State Board of Nursing;
(E) Oregon Board of Physical Therapy; and
(F) State Board of Chiropractic Examiners.
(b) “Licensee” means a person authorized to practice one of the following professions:
(A) Occupational therapist, as defined in ORS 675.210;
(B) Certified registered nurse anesthetist, as defined in ORS 678.010;
(C) Chiropractic physician, as defined in ORS 684.010;
(D) Clinical nurse specialist, as defined in ORS 678.010;
(E) Naturopathic physician, as defined in ORS 685.010;
(F) Nurse practitioner, as defined in ORS 678.010;
(G) Physician, as defined in ORS 677.010;
(H) [ Physician assistant ] Physician associate, as defined in ORS 677.495;
(I) Physical therapist, as defined in ORS 688.010; and
(J) Physical therapist assistant, as defined in ORS 688.010.
(2) In  collaboration with the Oregon Health Authority, a board shall adopt rules to require a
licensee regulated by the board to report to the board,  upon reauthorization to practice, the
licensee’s completion of any continuing education regarding suicide  risk assessment, treatment and
management.
(3) A licensee shall report the completion  of any continuing education described in subsection
(2) of this section to the board that regulates the licensee.
(4)(a) A board shall  document completion of any continuing education described in subsection
(2) of this section  by a licensee regulated by the board. The board shall document the following data:
(A) The number of  licensees who complete continuing education described in subsection (2) of
this section;
(B) The percentage of the total of all licensees who complete the continuing education;
(C) The counties in which licensees who complete the continuing education practice; and
(D) The contact information for licensees willing to share information about suicide risk as-
sessment, treatment and management with the authority.
(b) The board  shall remove any personally identifiable information from the data submitted to
the board under this subsection,  except for the personally identifiable information of licensees will-
ing to share such information with the authority.
(c) For purposes of documenting  completion of continuing education under this subsection, a
board may adopt rules requiring licensees to submit documentation of completion to the board.
(5) A board, on or before March 1 of each even-numbered year, shall  report to the authority on
the data  documented under subsection (4) of this section, as well as information about any initiatives
by the board to promote suicide risk assessment, treatment and management among its licensees.
(6) The authority, on or before August 1 of each even-numbered year, shall report  to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health care on the information submitted to the
authority under subsection (5) of this  section. The authority shall include in the report information
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 99
about initiatives by boards  to promote awareness about suicide risk assessment, treatment and
management and information on how boards are promoting continuing education  described in sub-
section (2) of this section to licensees.
(7) The authority may use  the information submitted to the authority under subsection (5) of this
section to develop continuing education opportunities related to suicide risk  assessment, treatment
and management for licensees and to facilitate improvements in suicide risk assessment, treatment
and management efforts in this state.
SECTION 122.
 ORS 677.085 is amended to read:
677.085. A person is practicing medicine if the person does one or more of the following:
(1) Advertise, hold out to the  public or represent in any manner that the person is authorized
to practice medicine in this state.
(2) For compensation directly or  indirectly received or to be received, offer or undertake to
prescribe, give or administer any drug or medicine for the use of any other person.
(3) Offer or undertake to perform any surgical operation upon any person.
(4) Offer or undertake  to diagnose, cure or treat in any manner, or by any means, methods, de-
vices or instrumentalities, any disease, illness, pain,  wound, fracture, infirmity, deformity, defect or
abnormal physical or mental condition of any person.
(5) Except as provided in ORS 677.060, append  the letters “M.D.,” “D.O.” or “P.A.” to the
person’s name, or use the words “Doctor,” “Physician,” “Surgeon,” [ “Physician Assistant,” ] “Physi-
cian Associate,”  or any abbreviation or combination thereof,  or any letters or words of similar
import in connection with the person’s name,  or any trade name in which the person is interested,
in the conduct of any occupation or profession pertaining to the diagnosis or  treatment of human
diseases or conditions mentioned in this section.
SECTION 123.
 ORS 677.095 is amended to read:
677.095. (1) A physician licensed to practice medicine or podiatry  by the Oregon Medical Board
has the duty to use that degree of care, skill and diligence that is used by ordinarily careful  physi-
cians in the same or similar circumstances in the community of the physician or a  similar commu-
nity.
(2) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed to practice  medicine by the board has
the duty to use  that degree of care, skill and diligence that is used by ordinarily careful [ physician
assistants] physician associates  in the same or similar circumstances in the community  of the
[physician assistant ] physician associate  or a similar community.
(3) In any  suit, action or arbitration seeking damages for professional liability from a health
care provider, an issue may not be precluded on the basis  of a default, stipulation, agreement or any
other outcome at any stage of  an investigation or an administrative proceeding, including but not
limited to a final order.
SECTION 124. ORS 677.097 is amended to read:
677.097. (1) In order to obtain the informed consent of a patient, a physician  or [ physician as-
sistant] physician associate shall explain the following:
(a) In general terms the procedure or treatment to be undertaken;
(b) That there may be alternative procedures or methods of treatment, if any; and
(c) That there are risks, if any, to the procedure or treatment.
(2) After giving the explanation specified in subsection (1) of this section,  the physician or
[physician assistant ] physician associate shall ask  the patient if the patient wants a more detailed
explanation. If the patient requests further explanation, the physician  or [ physician assistant ] phy-
sician associate  shall disclose in substantial detail the  procedure, the viable alternatives and the
material risks unless  to do so would be materially detrimental to the patient. In determining that
further explanation would be  materially detrimental the physician or [ physician assistant ] physician
associate shall  give due consideration to the standards of practice of reasonable medical or
podiatric practitioners in the same or a similar community under the  same or similar circumstances.
SECTION 125.
 ORS 677.135 is amended to read:
677.135. As used in ORS 677.135 to 677.141:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 100
(1) “The practice of medicine across state lines” means:
(a) The rendering directly to a person of a written or otherwise  documented medical opinion
concerning the diagnosis or treatment of  that person located within this state for the purpose of
patient care by a physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate located  outside this state
as a result of the transmission of individual patient data by telemedicine, as defined in ORS 677.494,
from within this state to that  physician, the physician’s agent or a [ physician assistant ] physician
associate; or
(b) The rendering of medical treatment directly to a person located within this  state by a phy-
sician or a  [ physician assistant ] physician associate located outside this state as a result of the
outward transmission of individual patient data by telemedicine from within this state to  that phy-
sician, the physician’s agent or a [ physician assistant ] physician associate.
(2) “The practice  of medicine across state lines” does not include the practice of medicine by
a person practicing in this state under ORS 676.347.
SECTION 126.
 ORS 677.137 is amended to read:
677.137. (1) A  person may not engage in the practice of medicine across state lines, claim qual-
ification to engage in the practice  of medicine across state lines or use any title, word or abbrevi-
ation to indicate or to induce another to believe that the person is licensed to engage in the practice
of medicine across state lines unless the person is licensed in accordance with ORS 677.139.
(2) ORS 677.135 to 677.141 do not apply to a  physician or [ physician assistant ] physician asso-
ciate engaging in the practice of medicine across state lines in an emergency, as defined  by rule
of the Oregon Medical Board.
(3) ORS 677.135 to 677.141 do not apply to a licensed physician or [ physician assistant ] physician
associate located outside this state who:
(a)(A) Consults with another physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed to
practice medicine in this state; and
(B) Does not undertake the primary responsibility  for diagnosing or rendering treatment to a
patient within this state;
(b) Has an established provider-patient relationship with a patient who is in Oregon temporarily
for the purpose of business, education, vacation or work and who requires the direct medical treat-
ment by that physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate; or
(c) Has, with a patient located in Oregon, an  established provider-patient relationship to provide
temporary or intermittent follow-up care.
(4) A physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate who is located  outside this state
and practices medicine as described in subsection (3) of this section is subject to  this chapter and
rules adopted pursuant to this  chapter, including but not limited to the disciplinary authority of the
board, while or as a result of practicing medicine as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The board may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 127.
 ORS 677.139 is amended to read:
677.139. (1) Upon application, the Oregon Medical Board may  issue to an out-of-state physician
or [ physician assistant ] physician associate  a license for the practice of medicine across state lines
if the physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate  holds a full, unrestricted license to
practice medicine in any other  state of the United States, has not been the recipient of a profes-
sional sanction by any other state of the United States and otherwise  meets the standards for
Oregon licensure under this chapter.
(2) In the event that an  out-of-state physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate has
been the recipient of a  professional sanction by any other state of the United States, the board may
issue a license for the practice of medicine across state lines if the board finds that the sanction
does not indicate that the physician or  [ physician assistant ] physician associate  is a potential
threat to the public interest, health, welfare and safety.
(3) A physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate shall apply on a form  provided by
the board,  accompanied by nonrefundable fees for the application and the license in amounts deter-
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 101
mined by rule of the board. The board shall adopt necessary and proper rules to govern  the renewal
of licenses issued under this section.
(4) A license for the practice of medicine across  state lines is not a limited license for purposes
of ORS 677.132.
(5) A license for the practice of  medicine across state lines does not permit a physician or
[physician assistant ] physician associate to practice medicine in this state except  when engaging
in the practice of medicine across state lines.
SECTION 128. ORS 677.141 is amended to read:
677.141. (1) A physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate issued a license under ORS
677.139:
(a) Is  subject to all the provisions of this chapter and to all the rules of the Oregon Medical
Board; and
(b) Has the same duties  and responsibilities and is subject to the same penalties and sanctions
as any other physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under this chapter.
(2) A physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate issued a  license under ORS 677.139
may not:
(a) Act as a dispensing physician as defined in ORS 677.010;
(b) Administer controlled substances for the treatment of intractable pain to a person located
within this state;
(c) Provide written documentation for purposes of ORS 475C.783;
(d) Employ a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  as defined in ORS 677.495 to  treat a
person located within this state; or
(e) Assert a lien for services under ORS 87.555.
(3) A physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS 677.139 shall
comply with all patient confidentiality requirements of this  state, except as those requirements are
expressly prohibited by the law  of any other state of the United States where a person’s medical
records are maintained.
SECTION 129.
 ORS 677.235 is amended to read:
677.235. (1) The Oregon Medical Board consists of 14 members appointed by the Governor and
subject to confirmation by the Senate  in the manner provided in ORS 171.562 and 171.565. All
members of the board must be residents of this state. Of the members of the board:
(a) Six must have the degree of Doctor of Medicine;
(b) Two must have the degree of Doctor of Osteopathic Medicine;
(c) One must have the degree of Doctor of Podiatric Medicine;
(d) Two must be [ physician assistants ] physician associates licensed under ORS 677.512; and
(e) Three must be members of the public who represent health consumers.
(2)(a)(A) Board members required  to possess the degree of Doctor of Medicine may be selected
by the Governor from a list of three to five candidates for each member described in subsection
(1)(a) of this section whose term expires in that year, submitted by  the Oregon Medical Association
not later than February 1.
(B) Board members required to possess the degree of Doctor of Osteopathic Medicine  may be
selected by the Governor from a list of three to five candidates for each  member described in sub-
section (1)(b) of this section whose term  expires in that year, submitted by the Osteopathic Physi-
cians and Surgeons of Oregon, Inc., not later than February 1.
(C) The board member required to possess  the degree of Doctor of Podiatric Medicine may be
selected by the Governor from a list of three to five candidates for the member described in sub-
section  (1)(c)  of this section whose term expires in that year, submitted by the Oregon Podiatric
Medical Association not later than February 1.
(D) The  board members required to be [ physician assistants ] physician associates  licensed un-
der ORS 677.512 may be selected by the Governor from a  list of three to five candidates for each
member described in subsection (1)(d) of this section whose term expires in that  year, submitted by
the Oregon Society of Physician Assistants not later than February 1.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 102
(b) Members who are  physicians or [ physician assistants ] physician associates  must have been
in the active practice of their profession for at least five years immediately preceding  their ap-
pointment.
(c)(A) A public member may not be otherwise eligible for appointment to the board.
(B) A public member, or the spouse,  domestic partner, child, parent or sibling of a public mem-
ber, may not be a licensed health care professional in this state.
(d)(A) In selecting the  members of the board, the Governor shall strive to balance the repre-
sentation on the board according to geographic areas of this state and ethnicity.
(B) Of the members described  in subsection (1)(a) to (d) of this section, at least one member must
be appointed from each federal congressional district.
(3)(a) The term of office of each board member is three years,  but a member serves at the
pleasure of the Governor. The terms must be staggered  so that no more than five terms end each
year. A term begins on March 1 of the  year the member is appointed and ends on the last day of
February of the third year after the member is appointed. A member  may not serve more than two
consecutive  terms.
(b) If  a vacancy occurs on the board, another qualifying member possessing the same profes-
sional degree or license or fulfilling the same public capacity as the person whose position has  been
vacated shall be appointed as provided in this section to fill the unexpired term.
(c) A board member shall be removed immediately from the board if, during the  member’s term,
the member:
(A) Is not a resident of this state;
(B) Has been absent from three consecutive board meetings, unless at least one absence  is ex-
cused; or
(C) Is not a current licensee, if the board member was appointed  to serve on the board as a
licensee.
(4) Members of the board are entitled to  compensation and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495.
The board may provide by rule for compensation to board members for the  performance of official
duties at a rate that is greater than the rate provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 130.
 ORS 677.494 is amended to read:
677.494. (1) As used in this section, “telemedicine” means the practice of medicine  and provision
of health care services to a patient by a physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate from
a distance using electronic communications, including  synchronous technologies to facilitate an ex-
change of information between a patient and physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate
in real time or asynchronous technologies  to facilitate an exchange of information between a patient
and a physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate in other than real time.
(2) A physician licensed under  ORS 677.100 to 677.228, a [ physician assistant ] physician asso-
ciate licensed under ORS 677.505 to  677.525 or a physician or [ physician assistant ] physician as-
sociate licensed under ORS  677.139 may use telemedicine to engage in the practice of medicine and
provide health care services, including the  establishment of a provider-patient relationship, the di-
agnosis or treatment of a medical  condition or the prescription of drugs, to a patient physically lo-
cated in this state. The physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate is not required  to be
physically located in this state when engaging in the practice of medicine and providing health  care
services through telemedicine.
(3) The practice of medicine using telemedicine occurs where the patient is physically located.
SECTION 131.
 ORS 677.495 is amended to read:
677.495. As used in ORS 677.495 to 677.535, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Collaboration” means, as indicated by the patient’s condition, community standards of care
and a [ physician assistant’s ] physician associate’s education, training and experience:
(a) Consultation between the [ physician assistant ] physician associate  and a physician or
podiatric physician; or
(b) Referral by the [ physician assistant ] physician associate to a physician or podiatric physi-
cian.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 103
(2) “Collaboration agreement” means  a written agreement that describes the manner in which
the [ physician assistant ] physician associate  collaborates with physicians or podiatric physicians,
that does not assign supervisory responsibility to, or represent acceptance of legal  responsibility by,
a physician or podiatric physician for the care provided by  the [ physician assistant ] physician as-
sociate and that is  signed by the [ physician assistant ] physician associate  and the physician,
podiatric physician or [ physician assistant’s ] physician associate’s employer.
(3) “Employer” means:
(a) An entity that employs a physician or podiatric physician and is organized  to deliver health
care services in this state:
(A) In accordance with ORS 58.375 or 58.376; or
(B) As defined by the Oregon Medical Board by rule;
(b) A group medical practice that is part of a health system; or
(c) A  physician or podiatric physician who employs a [ physician assistant ] physician
associate.
(4) “Physician” means a physician licensed under ORS 677.100 to 677.228.
(5) [“Physician assistant” ] “Physician associate”  means a person who is licensed in accordance
with ORS 677.505 to 677.525.
(6) “Podiatric physician” means a podiatric  physician and surgeon licensed under ORS 677.805
to 677.840.
SECTION 132.
 ORS 677.500 is amended to read:
677.500. It is the  intent of the Legislative Assembly in requiring the licensure of [ physician as-
sistants] physician associates to encourage appropriate use  of [ physician assistants ] physician as-
sociates in the delivery of  health care services to the extent of a [ physician assistant’s ] physician
associate’s education and experience.
SECTION 133. ORS 677.505 is amended to read:
677.505. (1) ORS 677.495 and  677.505 to 677.525 are not intended to alter or affect ORS chapter
678, regarding the practice of nursing; ORS chapter 679, regarding the practice of  dentistry; ORS
680.010 to 680.205,  regarding the practice of dental hygienists and auxiliaries; or ORS 683.010 to
683.340, regarding the practice of optometry.
(2) ORS 677.495 and  677.505 to 677.525 do not require an employee of a person licensed to
practice medicine under this chapter, or of a medical clinic or hospital to be licensed under ORS
677.495 and 677.505 to 677.525, unless the employee is practicing as  a [ physician assistant ] physician
associate in which case the individual [ shall] must be licensed under ORS [ 677.495 and] 677.505 to
677.525.
SECTION 134.
 ORS 677.510 is amended to read:
677.510. (1) A  [ physician assistant ] physician associate shall engage in collaboration with the
appropriate  health  care provider as indicated by the condition of the patient, the standard of care
and the [ physician assistant’s ] physician associate’s  education,  experience and competence. The
degree of collaboration must  be determined at the [ physician assistant’s ] physician associate’s  pri-
mary location of practice. The determination may include decisions made by a physician, podiatric
physician or employer  with whom the [ physician assistant ] physician associate  has entered into a
collaboration agreement, or the group or hospital service and the credentialing and privileging sys-
tems of the [ physician assistant’s ] physician associate’s primary location of practice.
(2)(a) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate may not practice  medicine unless the [ physi-
cian assistant ] physician associate has entered into a collaboration agreement signed by  a physi-
cian, podiatric physician or employer. The collaboration agreement must include:
(A) The [ physician assistant’s ] physician associate’s name, license number and primary location
of practice;
(B) A general description of the [ physician assistant’s ] physician associate’s  process for  col-
laboration with physicians or podiatric physicians; and
(C) If  the [ physician assistant ] physician associate has fewer than 2,000 hours of post-graduate
clinical experience, a plan for the minimum number of  hours per month during which the [ physician
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 104
assistant] physician associate  will collaborate, both in person and through technology, with a
specified physician or podiatric physician.
(b) The  [ physician assistant ] physician associate, or physician, podiatric physician or employer
with whom the [ physician assistant ] physician associate  has entered into the collaboration agree-
ment, is responsible for tracking the hours described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) The collaboration agreement must be kept on file  at the [ physician assistant’s ] physician
associate’s primary location of practice and made available to the Oregon Medical Board upon  re-
quest.
(4) Performance assessments  and reviews of a [ physician assistant ] physician associate may be
completed by the [ physician assistant’s ] physician associate’s  employer in accordance with a per-
formance assessment and review process established by the employer.
(5) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate shall submit to the board every 36  months doc-
umentation of completion of:
(a) A  one-hour pain management education program approved by the board and developed based
on recommendations of the Pain Management Commission; or
(b) An equivalent pain management education program, as determined by the board.
SECTION 135.
 ORS 677.511 is amended to read:
677.511. (1) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate  is authorized to write prescriptions, in-
cluding prescriptions for controlled substances listed in Schedules II through V.
(2)(a) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate may  register with the Oregon Medical Board
for authority to dispense prescription drugs.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this  subsection, and except as permitted under ORS 677.515
(5), a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  may not dispense controlled substances classified in
Schedule I or II under the  federal Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. 811 and 812, as modified
under ORS 475.035.
(3) A registration under this section  must include any information required by the board by rule.
(4) Prescription drugs dispensed by a  [ physician assistant ] physician associate  must be per-
sonally dispensed by the [ physician assistant ] physician associate, except that nonjudgmental dis-
pensing functions may be delegated to staff assistants  when the accuracy and completeness of the
prescription is verified by the [ physician assistant ] physician associate.
(5) The [ physician assistant ] physician associate shall maintain records of the receipt and dis-
tribution of prescription  drugs. The records must be readily accessible for inspection by the board
upon request of the board.
(6) The [ physician assistant ] physician associate shall  ensure that a prescription drug dispensed
by the [ physician assistant ] physician associate is labeled in compliance  with the requirements of
ORS 677.089 (3).
(7) The  board has disciplinary authority regarding a [ physician assistant ] physician associate
who has prescription drug dispensing authority.
SECTION 136. ORS 677.512 is amended to read:
677.512. (1) A person seeking  licensure as a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  shall
complete an application form provided by the Oregon Medical Board and submit the form to  the
board, accompanied by nonrefundable fees for the application and  for the license in amounts deter-
mined by rule of the board.
(2) The board may issue a license to a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  who:
(a) Submits an application as required by the board by rule;
(b) Pays the application fee established by the board by rule;
(c) Has completed an educational program accredited by a  nationally recognized accreditation
organization for [ physician assistant ] physician associate educational programs;
(d) Has passed the initial national examination required of [ physician assistants ] physician as-
sociates to become nationally certified;
(e) Is mentally and physically able to engage safely in practice  as a [ physician assistant ] phy-
sician associate ;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 105
(f) Has not been  disciplined by a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensing board in
another state, unless the board considers the discipline and determines that the person  is competent
to practice as a [ physician assistant ] physician associate; and
(g) Is of good moral character as determined by the board.
(3) The board may issue a license by reciprocity to a person who is licensed as a  [ physician
assistant] physician associate in another state and meets the requirements of subsection (2)(c) and
(d) of this section.
(4)(a) The board shall adopt necessary and proper rules to govern the renewal of licenses issued
under this section.
(b) If the board requires a licensee to complete continuing education in  order to renew a license
issued under this section, the board shall allow a licensee to meet those  requirements by providing
the board with documentation of military training or experience that is substantially  equivalent to
the continuing education required by the board.
SECTION 137.
 ORS 677.515 is amended to read:
677.515. (1) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate may practice medicine by providing any
medical service, including prescribing and administering controlled substances in  Schedules II
through V under the federal Controlled Substances Act:
(a) That is within the scope of practice of the [ physician assistant ] physician associate; and
(b) For which the [ physician assistant ] physician associate has  obtained informed consent as
provided in ORS 677.097, if informed consent is required.
(2) This chapter does not prohibit a student enrolled in a program for educating [ physician as-
sistants] physician associates approved by the Oregon Medical Board from  rendering medical ser-
vices if the services are rendered in the course of the program.
(3) The degree of autonomous judgment that a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  may
exercise shall be determined at the [ physician assistant’s ] physician associate’s primary location
of practice by the community standards of care  and the [ physician assistant’s ] physician associate’s
education, training and experience.
(4) A [ physician assistant’s ] physician associate’s  scope of practice is  based on the [ physician
assistant’s] physician associate’s education, training and experience.
(5) The board may not limit the privilege of administering, dispensing and prescribing  pre-
scription drugs to population groups federally designated as underserved, or to geographic  areas of
the state that are federally designated health professional shortage areas,  federally designated
medically underserved areas or areas  designated as medically disadvantaged and in need of primary
health care providers by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority or the Office of  Rural Health.
All prescriptions written pursuant to this subsection must bear the name, office address  and tele-
phone number of the [ physician assistant ] physician associate who writes the prescription.
(6) This  chapter does not require or prohibit a [ physician assistant ] physician associate from
practicing in a hospital licensed pursuant to ORS 441.015 to 441.119 and 441.993.
(7) Prescriptions for medications prescribed by a [ physician assistant ] physician associate  in
accordance with this section and ORS 475.005, 677.010, 677.500, 677.511  and 677.535 and dispensed
by a licensed pharmacist may be filled by the pharmacist according to the terms of the prescription,
and the filling of such  a prescription does not constitute evidence of negligence on the part of the
pharmacist if the prescription was dispensed within the reasonable and prudent practice of  phar-
macy.
SECTION 138.
 ORS 677.518 is amended to read:
677.518. A [ physician assistant ] physician associate may complete and  sign reports of death.
Reports  of  death signed by a [ physician assistant ] physician associate shall fulfill all of the laws
dealing with reports of death. A [ physician assistant ] physician associate  who prepares a  report of
death shall comply with all provisions of ORS 432.133.
SECTION 139. ORS 677.520 is amended to read:
677.520. Performance of any medical services by  a [ physician assistant ] physician associate af-
ter the revocation or suspension of the license by the Oregon Medical  Board, after expiration of a
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 106
temporary license or in the absence of renewal of a license constitutes  the unauthorized practice
of medicine and subjects the [ physician assistant ] physician associate to the penalties provided in
ORS 677.990.
SECTION 140. ORS 677.525 is amended to read:
677.525. Every [ physician assistant ] physician associate  shall pay to the Oregon Medical Board
nonrefundable fees as determined by the board pursuant to ORS 677.265.
SECTION 141. ORS 677.535 is amended to read:
677.535. The  Oregon Medical Board may grant a limited license to a [ physician assistant ] phy-
sician associate  if the applicant meets the qualifications of the board, the application  file is com-
plete and no derogatory information has been submitted but board approval is pending.
SECTION 142. ORS 680.205 is amended to read:
680.205. (1) An expanded practice dental  hygienist may render all services within the scope of
practice of dental hygiene,  as defined in ORS 679.010, without the supervision of a dentist and as
authorized by the expanded practice dental hygienist permit to:
(a) Patients or  residents of the following facilities or programs who, due to age, infirmity or
disability, are unable to receive regular dental hygiene treatment:
(A) Nursing homes as defined in ORS 678.710;
(B) Adult foster homes as defined in ORS 443.705;
(C) Residential care facilities as defined in ORS 443.400;
(D) Adult congregate living facilities as defined in ORS 441.525;
(E) Mental health residential programs administered by the Oregon Health Authority;
(F) Facilities for persons with mental illness, as those terms are defined in ORS 426.005;
(G) Facilities  for persons with developmental disabilities, as those terms are defined in ORS
427.005;
(H) Local correctional facilities and juvenile detention facilities as those terms are defined in
ORS 169.005, regional correctional facilities as defined  in ORS 169.620, youth correction facilities
as defined in ORS 420.005, youth care centers as defined in ORS 420.855, and Department of  Cor-
rections institutions as defined in ORS 421.005; or
(I) Public and nonprofit community health clinics.
(b) Adults who are homebound.
(c) Students or enrollees of nursery schools  and day care programs and their siblings under 18
years of age, Job Corps and similar employment training facilities, primary and secondary  schools,
including private schools and  public charter schools, and persons entitled to benefits under the
Women, Infants and Children Program.
(d) Patients in hospitals, medical clinics, medical offices or offices operated  or staffed by
naturopathic physicians, nurse practitioners,  [ physician assistants ] physician associates  or
midwives.
(e) Patients whose income is less than the federal poverty level.
(f) Other populations that the Oregon Board of  Dentistry determines are underserved or lack
access to dental hygiene services.
(2) Unless different criteria for referral of a  patient or resident to a dentist are included in an
agreement described in subsection (3)  of this section, at least once each calendar year, an expanded
practice dental hygienist shall refer each patient or resident to a dentist who is available to treat
the patient or resident.
(3) An expanded practice dental hygienist may render the services described  in paragraphs (a)
to (e) of this subsection to the patients described in subsection (1) of this section  if the expanded
practice  dental  hygienist has entered into an agreement in a format approved by the board with a
dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679. The agreement must  set forth the agreed-upon scope of the
dental hygienist’s practice with regard to:
(a) Administering local anesthesia;
(b) Administering temporary restorations with or without excavation;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 107
(c) Prescribing prophylactic antibiotics and  nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs specified in the
agreement;
(d) Performing interim therapeutic restoration after diagnosis by a dentist; and
(e) Referral parameters.
(4) This section does not authorize an  expanded practice dental hygienist to administer nitrous
oxide except under the indirect supervision of a dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679.
(5) An expanded practice dental hygienist  may assess the need for and appropriateness of
sealants, apply sealants  and write prescriptions for all applications of fluoride in which fluoride is
applied or supplied to patients.
(6) An expanded practice dental hygienist must also procure all other  permits or certificates
required by the board under ORS 679.250.
(7) As  used in this section and ORS 680.213, “interim therapeutic restoration” means a direct
provisional restoration placed to temporarily stabilize a tooth until a dentist  subsequently diagnoses
the need for further definitive treatment, and that:
(a) Consists of the removal of soft material from the tooth using  only hand instrumentation and
subsequent placement of an adhesive restorative material; and
(b) Does not require the administration of local anesthesia.
SECTION 143.
 ORS 680.545 is amended to read:
680.545. Denturists licensed prior to  January 1, 2004, who have not received an oral pathology
endorsement from the State Board of Denture Technology may not  treat any person without having
first received  a statement, dated within 30 days of the date of treatment and signed by a dentist,
physician, naturopathic  physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS
677.505 to 677.525 or  nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390, that the person’s oral
cavity is substantially free from disease and mechanically sufficient to receive a denture.
SECTION 144. ORS 688.132 is amended to read:
688.132. (1) As used  in this section, “provider of care” means a physician, chiropractic physician,
podiatric physician and surgeon, naturopathic  physician, dentist, [ physician assistant ] physician
associate or nurse practitioner.
(2) A licensed physical therapist shall immediately refer a person  being treated by the licensed
physical therapist to a provider of care if the person exhibits symptoms:
(a) That require treatment or diagnosis by a provider of medical care;
(b) For which physical therapy is contraindicated;
(c) That the physical therapist does not know how to treat; or
(d) For which treatment is outside the scope of practice of physical therapy.
SECTION 145.
 ORS 688.405 is amended to read:
688.405. As used in ORS 688.405 to 688.605:
(1) “Actively engaged” means:
(a) Practicing medical imaging;
(b) Supervising or providing administrative services for medical imaging licensees,  or students
or trainees learning a medical imaging modality,  at an institution that provides medical imaging
services;
(c) Teaching, providing instruction for or  administrating a medical imaging program at an in-
stitution recognized by the Board of Medical Imaging as an educational institution; or
(d) Having retired from the  practice of medical imaging, provided that the retired medical im-
aging licensee has not been retired for more than six  years and was in good standing with the board
at the time of retirement.
(2) “Approved school” means a  school accredited in one of the medical imaging modalities or
subspecialties by a national post-secondary accreditation body  and whose graduates are qualified to
sit for a credentialing examination recognized by the board in  the graduate’s medical imaging
modality or subspecialty.
(3) “Clinical instructor” means an individual assigned to supervise  students in a clinical setting
who is:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 108
(a) A licensed physician who routinely  supervises the medical imaging modality being studied
by a student; or
(b) An individual licensed by the board and  credentialed by a credentialing organization in the
medical imaging modality being studied by a student.
(4) “Credential” means  the recognition awarded to an individual who meets the requirements
of a credentialing organization.
(5) “Credentialing organization” means a  nationally recognized organization that issues creden-
tials through testing or evaluations that determine that a person meets defined standards  for train-
ing and competence in a medical imaging modality.
(6) “Diagnostic medical sonography” means the use of nonionizing  high frequency sound waves
with specialized equipment to direct the  sound waves into areas of the human body to generate
images for the assessment and diagnosis of various medical conditions.
(7) “Graduate” means an individual who has completed the  didactic and clinical education at
an approved school, including documented clinical  proficiency, but who has not met all requirements
for credentialing by a credentialing organization.
(8) “Hybrid imaging  or radiation therapy equipment” means equipment that combines more than
one medical imaging modality into a single device.
(9)(a) “Ionizing radiation” means alpha  particles, beta particles, gamma rays, X-rays, neutrons,
high-speed electrons, high-speed protons or other particles capable of producing ions.
(b) “Ionizing radiation” does not include nonionizing radiation.
(10) “License” means a license issued by the board to practice one or more of the medical im-
aging modalities.
(11) “Licensed nurse practitioner” means a nurse practitioner licensed in Oregon.
(12) “Licensed physician” means a physician or surgeon licensed in Oregon.
(13) “Licensed physician [ assistant] associate ” means a [ physician assistant ] physician associ-
ate licensed in Oregon.
(14) “Limited X-ray machine operator” means a person  who performs diagnostic X-ray proce-
dures under the supervision of a licensed  physician, licensed nurse practitioner or licensed [ physi-
cian assistant ] physician associate using equipment that  emits external ionizing radiation resulting
in diagnostic radiographic images that are limited to select human anatomical sites.
(15) “Limited X-ray machine operator course of study”  means a board-approved set of didactic
and clinical experience elements designed to prepare a person  for gaining practical experience and
for passing the limited X-ray machine operator examination.
(16) “Magnetic resonance imaging” means the process by which certain nuclei,  when placed in
a magnetic field, absorb and release energy in the  form of radio waves that are analyzed by a
computer thereby producing an image of human anatomy and physiological information.
(17)(a) “Medical imaging” means the use of specialized equipment for the production of visual
representations of human anatomy, tissues or organs.
(b) “Medical  imaging” includes but is not limited to X-ray, single photon emission, positron
emission technology, ultrasound, magnetic fields, visible light and radio waves.
(18) “Medical imaging licensee” means a person other than a limited  X-ray machine operator
who holds a valid license and operates medical imaging equipment for diagnostic or therapeutic
purposes under the supervision of a licensed physician.
(19) “Medical imaging modality” means:
(a) Diagnostic medical sonography and all its subspecialties;
(b) Magnetic resonance imaging and all its subspecialties;
(c) Nuclear medicine technology and all its subspecialties;
(d) Radiation therapy and all its subspecialties; or
(e) Radiography and all its subspecialties.
(20) “Nonionizing radiation” includes  radiation such as radiofrequency or microwaves, visible,
infrared or ultraviolet light or ultrasound.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 109
(21) “Nuclear medicine technology” means  the specialized equipment that measures radiation
emitted by radionuclides, including counters and cameras that  form medical images for interpreta-
tion by a physician, or assists in therapeutic use of radionuclides.
(22) “Radiation therapy” means the use of ionizing radiation on a human being  for therapeutic
purposes.
(23) “Radiographer”  means a person other than a licensed physician who performs a compre-
hensive set of diagnostic radiographic procedures under the supervision of  a licensed physician us-
ing external ionizing radiation to produce radiographic, fluoroscopic or digital images.
(24) “Radiography” means the use of ionizing radiation to  produce radiographic, fluoroscopic or
digital images of human anatomy for diagnostic purposes.
(25) “Radiologist” means a person licensed to practice medicine in the State of Oregon  who is
certified by or board eligible  for certification by the American Board of Radiology, the American
Osteopathic Association, the Royal College of Radiologists or the  Royal College of Physicians and
Surgeons of Canada.
(26) “Student” means an individual enrolled in:
(a) An approved school; or
(b) A limited X-ray machine operator course of study.
(27) “Supervision” means the act  of monitoring and reviewing the performance of medical im-
aging licensees or limited X-ray machine operators through regular inspections of work  produced,
regardless of whether the supervising individual is continuously physically present during the use
of medical imaging equipment or X-ray equipment.
SECTION 146.
 ORS 688.510 is amended to read:
688.510. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Fluoroscopy” means a technique for generating X-ray images and for presenting the  X-ray
images simultaneously and continuously as a visible image.
(b) [ “Physician assistant” ] “Physician associate”  means a [ physician assistant ] physician as-
sociate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525.
(c) “To practice fluoroscopy” means to initiate the generation of  X-rays and to acquire visible
images for the purpose of medical diagnosis.
(2) Except  as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a [ physician assistant ] physician asso-
ciate may not practice  fluoroscopy on a person unless the [ physician assistant ] physician
associate:
(a) Holds an active certificate issued by the Board of Medical Imaging under this section; and
(b) Operates fluoroscopic X-ray equipment in compliance with rules adopted  by the board under
this section.
(3) The board shall issue a certificate to practice fluoroscopy to a [ physician assistant ] physician
associate who:
(a) Completes a fluoroscopy education program approved by the board;
(b) Submits an examination application to the board in a form and  manner prescribed by the
board;
(c) Pays an examination fee established by the board by rule;
(d) Passes an examination on fluoroscopy approved by the board;
(e) Submits a certificate application to the board in a form and manner prescribed by the board;
(f) Pays a certificate application fee established by the board by rule; and
(g) Meets the standards of ethical and professional conduct  established by a credentialing or-
ganization or professional society related to the practice of medical imaging.
(4) The board shall renew the certificate to practice  fluoroscopy of a [ physician assistant ] phy-
sician associate who:
(a) Submits a renewal application to the board in a form and manner prescribed by the board;
(b) Pays a renewal fee established by the board by rule; and
(c) Completes continuing education requirements approved by the board.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 110
(5) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate may practice fluoroscopy  before being issued a
certificate  under  this section for the purpose of completing a fluoroscopy training program. A [ phy-
sician assistant ] physician associate must be supervised, as determined by the  board by rule, when
practicing fluoroscopy under this subsection.
(6) Subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183, the board may refuse  to issue or renew a
certificate under this section or may suspend or revoke a certificate under this section  if the ap-
plicant or certificate holder  violates a provision of this section or any rule adopted by the board
under this section.
SECTION 147. ORS 688.515 is amended to read:
688.515. (1) The Board of Medical Imaging shall issue a limited X-ray machine operator permit
to an  applicant to practice under the supervision of a licensed physician, a licensed nurse practi-
tioner or a licensed [ physician assistant ] physician associate  if the applicant meets the require-
ments as provided in this section. A limited X-ray machine operator permit shall state  the category
or categories for which the applicant has demonstrated competence  and shall be limited to one of
the categories listed below or as established by the board by rule:
(a) Skull and sinuses;
(b) Spine;
(c) Chest;
(d) Extremities;
(e) Podiatric; or
(f) Bone densitometry.
(2) Limited X-ray machine operator permits may not be issued for fluoroscopy, bony thorax
studies, abdominal studies, contrast studies  or special head studies such as tomography, radiation
therapy or any of  the other medical imaging modalities or subspecialties other than the categories
listed in subsection (1) of this section or as established by the board by rule.
(3) Each applicant for a limited X-ray machine operator permit shall:
(a) Make an application in writing;
(b) Pay an application fee in an amount set by the board;
(c) Be at least 18 years of age;
(d) Have successfully passed a  board-approved course of instruction in radiation use and safety
consisting of the number of hours of instruction required by the board by rule;
(e) Have successfully completed a course of instruction approved by the  board and taught by a
board-approved, licensed radiographer in laboratory practice specific to each category for  which the
applicant seeks a limited X-ray machine operator permit, with the instructor’s certifying to the
board that the applicant has completed the course in those categories applied for;
(f) Have successfully completed a practical experience program  approved by the board, specific
to each category for which the applicant seeks a limited X-ray  machine operator permit. Such pro-
gram shall include operation of an energized X-ray machine  under the supervision of a radiographer;
(g) Have paid  the examination fee set by board rule to reflect the actual cost of the examination;
(h) Have successfully passed an examination  approved by the board in the core module as de-
fined in rules adopted by the board, and in those  categories in which the applicant seeks a limited
X-ray machine operator permit;
(i) Have undergone a background check to  the satisfaction of the board as established in rules
adopted by the board;
(j) Not have had any type of license or  permit revoked by this state or any state, territory of
the United States or nation; and
(k) Meet the standards of ethical conduct established in the professional standards of a  creden-
tialing organization or a medical imaging modality’s professional society.
(4) Upon meeting the requirements of this section, the board shall issue a limited X-ray machine
operator permit to the applicant. The limited X-ray machine  operator permit is subject to the re-
newal procedures described in ORS 688.445.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 111
(5) Every person issued a limited X-ray machine operator permit shall notify the board in writing
of the name of each  licensed physician, licensed nurse practitioner or licensed [ physician assistant ]
physician associate supervising  the person’s performance of diagnostic radiography and may only
perform diagnostic radiography while being supervised by a  licensed physician, licensed nurse
practitioner or licensed [ physician assistant ] physician associate . In the event the person subse-
quently is supervised  by a licensed physician, licensed nurse practitioner or licensed [ physician as-
sistant] physician associate  other  than the physician, nurse practitioner or [ physician assistant ]
physician associate whose name was initially furnished to the board, the person shall  immediately
notify the board in writing.
(6) Limited X-ray machine operators must meet the standards  of ethical conduct equal to those
of a licensed radiographer.
SECTION 148. ORS 688.525 is amended to read:
688.525. (1) The Board of Medical Imaging, after notice  of and hearing as required under the
contested case procedures of ORS chapter 183, may take any of the following actions against  a
person described in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Refuse to issue a license or permit to any applicant;
(b) Refuse to renew the license of  any medical imaging licensee or the permit of a limited X-ray
machine operator;
(c) Suspend or revoke a license or permit issued by the board;
(d) Issue a letter of reprimand to a licensee or permittee of the board; or
(e) Impose probation upon a licensee or permittee of the board.
(2) The board may take any of the actions described in subsection (1) of this section  against a
person who:
(a) Has been disciplined by a credentialing organization or a licensing board in this state  or in
another state, territory of the United States or nation for acts by the  holder of a license or a permit
that are similar to acts described in  this subsection. A certified copy of the order of discipline
constitutes conclusive evidence of the discipline.
(b) Has an impairment as defined in ORS 676.303.
(c) In the  judgment of the board, is guilty of unethical or unprofessional conduct in the practice
of a medical imaging modality or as a limited X-ray machine operator.
(d) Has been convicted of any  crime that bears a demonstrable relationship to the practice of
a medical imaging modality  or as a limited X-ray machine operator, or otherwise reflects adversely
on fitness to practice.
(e) In the judgment of the board, has acted with gross negligence in  the practice of a medical
imaging modality or as a limited X-ray machine operator.
(f) Has undertaken to act as a medical imaging licensee independently of the  supervision of a
licensed physician, or has undertaken to act as a limited X-ray  machine operator independently of
the supervision of a licensed physician, licensed nurse practitioner or licensed  [ physician assistant ]
physician associate.
(g) Has obtained or attempted to obtain a license or  permit under ORS 688.405 to 688.605 by
fraud or material misrepresentation.
(h) Is in  violation of a provision of ORS 688.405 to 688.605 or rule adopted under ORS 688.405
to 688.605.
(i) Has failed to respond to inquiries by the board.
(j) Has failed to cooperate with an investigation conducted by the board.
(k) Has failed to comply with an order issued by the board.
(L) Has committed an act of moral turpitude, dishonesty, fraud or misrepresentation that is not
related to the practice of a medical imaging modality or as a limited X-ray machine  operator but
that, in the discretion of the board, bears upon the person’s fitness to practice medical imaging.
(3) Upon receipt of a complaint  under ORS 688.405 to 688.605, the board shall conduct an in-
vestigation as described under ORS 676.165.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 112
(4) Information that the board obtains as part of  an investigation into licensee, permittee or
applicant conduct or  as part of a contested case proceeding, consent order or stipulated agreement
involving licensee, permittee or applicant conduct is confidential as provided under ORS 676.175.
SECTION 149. ORS 688.805 is amended to read:
688.805. (1) Nothing in ORS  688.800 to 688.840 is intended to limit, preclude or otherwise inter-
fere with the practices of other persons  and health providers licensed by appropriate agencies of
this state.
(2) Nothing in ORS 688.800 to 688.840 prohibits:
(a) The practice of respiratory  care by a student enrolled in a respiratory care education pro-
gram approved by the American Medical Association in  collaboration with the Joint Review Com-
mittee for Respiratory Therapy Education or their successors or equivalent  organizations, as
approved by the Respiratory Therapist and Polysomnographic Technologist Licensing Board.
(b) The practice of polysomnography by a student who is:
(A) Enrolled in an educational program for polysomnography approved by the board; and
(B) In the physical presence of a supervisor approved by the board.
(c) Self-care  by a patient, or gratuitous care by a friend or family member who does not claim
to be a respiratory care practitioner.
(d) Respiratory care services rendered in the course of an emergency.
(3) Persons in the military  services or working in federal facilities are exempt from the pro-
visions of ORS 688.800 to 688.840 when functioning in the course of assigned duties.
(4) Nothing in ORS 688.800 to 688.840 is intended to permit the practice of  medicine by a person
licensed to practice respiratory care or polysomnography unless the person is also licensed to
practice medicine.
(5) The practice of respiratory care:
(a) May be performed in any  clinic, hospital, skilled nursing facility, private dwelling or other
setting approved by the board.
(b) Must be performed in accordance with the prescription or verbal order of a physician or
naturopathic physician and shall be performed under a qualified medical  director for respiratory
care.
(6) The practice of polysomnography:
(a) May be performed in a clinic, hospital, skilled nursing  facility, sleep center, sleep laboratory,
physician’s office, naturopathic physician’s office, private dwelling or other setting approved by  the
board.
(b) Must be performed in accordance with the prescription or verbal order  of a physician,
naturopathic physician or  [physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS chapter 677
or a nurse practitioner licensed under  ORS 678.375 to 678.390 and under the direction of a qualified
medical director for polysomnography.
SECTION 150.
 ORS 694.042 is amended to read:
694.042. (1) In addition to any other rights and remedies the purchaser  may have, including
rights under ORS 646A.460 to 646A.476, the purchaser of a hearing aid  shall have the right to
rescind the transaction if:
(a) The purchaser for whatever reason consults with  a physician licensed under ORS chapter
677 to practice medicine who specializes in diseases of the ear or  with a [ physician assistant ] phy-
sician associate  licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 who specializes in diseases of the ear, or
consults with an audiologist not licensed under this chapter and not affiliated  with anyone licensed
under this chapter and with a physician licensed under ORS  chapter 677 to practice medicine or
with a [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS  677.505 to 677.525, subsequent
to purchasing the hearing aid, and the physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate advises
such purchaser against purchasing or using a hearing aid and in writing specifies the medical reason
for the advice;
(b) The  seller, in dealings with the purchaser, failed to adhere to the practice standards listed
in ORS 694.142, or failed to provide the statement required by ORS 694.036;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 113
(c) The fitting of the hearing instrument failed to meet current industry standards; or
(d) The licensee fails to meet any standard of conduct prescribed in the law  or rules regulating
fitting and dispensing of hearing aids and this  failure affects in any way the transaction which the
purchaser seeks to rescind.
(2) The purchaser of a hearing aid shall have the  right to rescind the transaction, for other than
the seller’s breach, as provided in  subsection (1)(a), (b), (c) or (d) of this section only if the purchaser
returns the product and it is in good condition less  normal wear and tear and gives written notice
of the intent to rescind the transaction by either:
(a) Returning the  product with a written notice of the intent to rescind sent by certified mail,
return receipt requested, to the licensee’s regular place of business; or
(b) Returning the product with a written notice of the intent to rescind to an authorized  repre-
sentative of the company from which it was purchased.
(3) The  notice described in subsection (2) of this section shall state that the transaction is can-
celed pursuant to this section. The notice of intent to rescind must be postmarked:
(a) Within 30 days from the date of the original delivery; or
(b) Within specified time periods if the 30-day period has been extended in writing by  both par-
ties. The consumer’s rescission rights can  only be extended through a written agreement by both
parties.
(4) If the conditions of subsection (1)(a), (b), (c) or (d) of this  section and subsection (2)(a) or (b)
of this section have been met, the seller, without  further request and within 10 days after the can-
cellation, shall issue a refund to the  purchaser. However, the hearing aid specialist may retain a
portion of the purchase  price as specified by rule by the Health Licensing Office when the purchaser
rescinds the sale during the 30-day  rescission period. At the same time, the seller shall return all
goods traded in to the seller  on account of or in contemplation of the sale. The purchaser shall
incur no additional liability for the cancellation.
SECTION 151.
 ORS 735.631 is amended to read:
735.631. As used in ORS 735.631 to 735.643:
(1) “Discount medical plan” means a contract, agreement or other  business arrangement be-
tween a discount medical plan organization and a plan member in which the organization,  in ex-
change for fees, service or subscription charges, dues or other consideration,  offers or purports to
offer the plan member access to providers and the right to receive  medical and ancillary services
at a discount from providers.
(2) “Discount medical plan organization” means a person that contracts on behalf of  plan mem-
bers with a provider, a provider network or another discount medical plan organization for access
to medical and ancillary services  at a discounted rate and determines what plan members will pay
as a fee, service or subscription charge, dues or other consideration for a discount medical plan.
(3) “Licensee” means a discount medical plan organization that has obtained a license  from the
Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services in accordance with ORS 735.634.
(4) “Medical and ancillary services” means, except  when administered by or under contract with
the State of Oregon, any care, service, treatment or product  provided for any dysfunction, injury
or illness of the human body including, but not limited to, care provided by a physician, naturopathic
physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner, inpatient care, hospital
and surgical services, emergency  and ambulance services, audiology services, dental care services,
vision care services, mental health services, substance abuse counseling or treatment,  chiropractic
services,  podiatric  care services, laboratory services, home health care services, medical equipment
and supplies or prescription drugs.
(5) “Plan member” means an individual who pays  fees, service or subscription charges, dues or
other consideration in exchange for the right to participate in a discount medical plan.
(6)(a) “Provider” means a  person that has contracted or otherwise agreed with a discount med-
ical plan organization to provide medical  and ancillary services to plan members at a discount from
the person’s ordinary or customary fees or charges.
(b) “Provider” does not include:
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 114
(A) A person that,  apart from any agreement or contract with a discount medical plan organ-
ization, provides medical and ancillary services  at a discount or at fixed or scheduled prices to pa-
tients or customers the person serves regularly; or
(B) A person that does not charge fees, service or subscription charges,  dues or other consid-
eration in exchange for providing  medical and ancillary services at a discount or at fixed or
scheduled prices.
(7) “Provider network”  means a person that negotiates directly or indirectly with a discount
medical plan organization on behalf of more than one provider that provides  medical or ancillary
services to plan members.
SECTION 152. ORS 742.400 is amended to read:
742.400. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Claim” means a written demand for payment from or on behalf of a  covered practitioner for
an injury alleged to have been caused by professional negligence that is made in a  complaint filed
with a court of appropriate jurisdiction.
(b) “Covered practitioner” means a chiropractic physician, physician  or [ physician assistant ]
physician associate licensed under ORS chapter  677, nurse practitioner, optometrist, dentist, dental
hygienist or [ naturopath] naturopathic physician.
(c) “Disposition of a claim” means:
(A) A judgment or award against the covered practitioner by a court, a jury or an arbitrator;
(B) A withdrawal or dismissal of the claim; or
(C) A settlement of the claim.
(d) “Reporter” means:
(A) A primary insurer;
(B) A public body required to defend, save harmless and indemnify an officer, employee  or agent
of the public body under ORS 30.260 to 30.300;
(C) An entity that self-insures or indemnifies for claims  alleging professional negligence on the
part of a covered practitioner; or
(D) A health maintenance organization as defined in ORS 750.005.
(2) Within  30 days after receiving notice of a claim, a reporter shall report the claim to the
appropriate board, as follows:
(a) The  Oregon Medical Board if the covered practitioner is a physician or [ physician
assistant] physician associate licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(b) The Oregon State Board of Nursing if the covered practitioner is a nurse practitioner;
(c) The Oregon Board of Optometry if the covered practitioner is an optometrist;
(d) The Oregon Board of Dentistry if the covered practitioner is a dentist or dental hygienist;
(e) The Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine if  the covered practitioner is a [ naturopath]
naturopathic physician; or
(f) The State Board of Chiropractic  Examiners if the covered practitioner is a chiropractic
physician.
(3) The report required under subsection (2) of this section shall include:
(a) The name of the covered practitioner;
(b) The name of the person that filed the claim;
(c) The date on which the claim was filed; and
(d) The reason or reasons  for the claim, except that the report may not disclose any data that
is privileged under ORS 41.675.
(4) Within 30 days after the date  of an action taken in disposition of a claim, a reporter shall
notify the appropriate board identified in subsection (2) of this section of the disposition.
(5)(a) A board that receives a report of a claim  under this section shall publicly post the report
on the board’s website if the claim results in a judicial finding or admission of liability or  a money
judgment, award or settlement that  involves a payment to the claimant. The board may not publicly
post information about claims that did not result in a  judicial finding or admission of liability or a
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 115
money judgment, award or settlement that involves  a payment to the claimant but shall make the
information available to the public upon request.
(b) If a board discloses information about a claim that is the subject of a  report received under
this section, the board shall indicate in the disclosure whether the claim resulted in a  judicial
finding or an admission of liability or a  money judgment, an award or a settlement that involves a
payment to the claimant. A board may not  publicly disclose or publish any allegations or factual
assertions included in the claim unless the complaint  resulted in a judicial finding or an admission
of liability or a money judgment,  an award or a settlement that involves a payment to the claimant.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, “judicial finding” means a finding of liability by a court, a
jury or an arbitrator.
(6) A board that receives a report under this section shall provide copies  of the report to each
health care facility licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.119, 441.525 to 441.595,  441.815, 441.820,
441.990, 441.993, 442.342, 442.344 and 442.400 to 442.463 that  employs or grants staff privileges to the
covered practitioner.
(7) A person that reports in good faith concerning any  matter required to be reported under this
section is immune from civil liability by reason of making the report.
SECTION 153. ORS 742.504 is amended to read:
742.504. Every policy required to provide the coverage specified  in ORS 742.502 shall provide
uninsured motorist coverage that  in each instance is no less favorable in any respect to the insured
or the beneficiary than if the  following provisions were set forth in the policy. However, nothing
contained in this section requires the insurer to reproduce in  the policy the particular language of
any of the following provisions:
(1)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 30.260 to 30.300, the insurer will pay all sums that  the insured or
the heirs or legal representative of the  insured is legally entitled to recover as damages from the
owner or operator of an uninsured vehicle because of bodily injury  sustained by the insured caused
by accident and arising out of the ownership,  maintenance or use of the uninsured vehicle. Deter-
mination as to  whether the insured, the insured’s heirs or the insured’s legal representative is le-
gally entitled to recover such damages, and if so, the amount thereof, shall be made by agreement
between the insured and the insurer, or, in the event of disagreement, may be determined by  arbi-
tration as provided in subsection (10) of this section.
(b) No judgment against any person or  organization alleged to be legally responsible for bodily
injury, except for proceedings instituted  against the insurer as provided in this policy, shall be
conclusive, as between the insured and  the insurer, on the issues of liability of the person or or-
ganization or of the amount of damages to which the insured is legally entitled.
(2) As used in this policy:
(a) “Bodily injury” means bodily injury, sickness or disease, including  death resulting therefrom.
(b) “Hit-and-run vehicle” means a vehicle that causes bodily injury to an insured  arising out of
physical contact of the vehicle with the insured or  with a vehicle the insured is occupying at the
time of the accident, provided:
(A) The identity of either the operator or the owner of the hit-and-run vehicle cannot be  ascer-
tained;
(B) The insured or someone on behalf of the insured  reported the accident within 72 hours to
a police, peace or judicial officer, to the Department of Transportation or to the  equivalent depart-
ment in the state where the accident occurred, and filed with the insurer within 30 days thereafter
a statement under oath that the insured or the legal  representative of the insured has a cause or
causes of action  arising out of the accident for damages against a person or persons whose identities
are unascertainable, and setting forth the facts in support thereof; and
(C) At the insurer’s request, the insured or the legal representative of the insured makes  avail-
able for inspection the vehicle the insured was occupying at the time of the accident.
(c) “Insured,” when unqualified and when applied to uninsured motorist coverage, means:
(A) The named insured  as stated in the policy and any person designated as named insured in
the schedule and, while residents  of the same household, the spouse of any named insured and rel-
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 116
atives of either, provided that neither the relative  nor the spouse is the owner of a vehicle not de-
scribed in the policy and that, if the named insured as stated in  the policy is other than an
individual or spouses in a marriage who are residents of the same household, the  named insured
shall be only a person so designated in the schedule;
(B) Any  child residing in the household of the named insured if the insured has performed the
duties of a parent to the child by rearing the child as the insured’s own  although the child is not
related to the insured by blood, marriage or adoption; and
(C) Any other person  while occupying an insured vehicle, provided the actual use thereof is with
the permission of the named insured.
(d) “Insured vehicle,” except as provided in paragraph (e) of this provision, means:
(A) The vehicle described in the policy or a newly acquired or  substitute vehicle, as each of
those terms is defined in the public liability  coverage of the policy, insured under the public liability
provisions of the policy; or
(B) A nonowned vehicle operated by the named insured or spouse if a resident of the  same
household, provided that the actual  use thereof is with the permission of the owner of the vehicle
and the vehicle is not owned by nor furnished for the regular or frequent  use of the insured or any
member of the same household.
(e) “Insured vehicle” does not include a trailer of any type unless the trailer is  a described ve-
hicle in the policy.
(f) “Occupying” means in or upon or entering into or alighting from.
(g) “Phantom vehicle” means a vehicle that causes bodily injury to an  insured arising out of a
motor vehicle accident that is caused by a vehicle that has no physical  contact with the insured or
the vehicle the insured is occupying at the time of the accident, provided:
(A) The identity of either the operator or the owner of the phantom vehicle  cannot be ascer-
tained;
(B) The facts of the accident can be  corroborated by competent evidence other than the testi-
mony of the insured or any person having an uninsured motorist claim resulting  from the accident;
and
(C) The insured or someone on behalf of the insured  reported the accident within 72 hours to
a police, peace or judicial officer, to the Department of Transportation or to the  equivalent depart-
ment in the state where the accident occurred, and filed with the insurer within 30 days thereafter
a statement under oath that the insured or the legal  representative of the insured has a cause or
causes of action  arising out of the accident for damages against a person or persons whose identities
are unascertainable, and setting forth the facts in support thereof.
(h) “State” includes the District of Columbia, a territory or  possession of the United States and
a province of Canada.
(i) “Stolen vehicle” means an insured vehicle that  causes bodily injury to the insured arising
out of a motor vehicle accident if:
(A) The vehicle is operated without the consent of the insured;
(B) The operator of the vehicle does not  have collectible motor vehicle bodily injury liability
insurance;
(C) The insured or someone on behalf of  the insured reported the accident within 72 hours to
a police, peace or judicial officer or to the  equivalent department in the state where the accident
occurred;  and
(D) The insured or someone on behalf of the insured  cooperates with the appropriate law
enforcement agency in the prosecution of the theft of the vehicle.
(j) “Sums that the insured or the heirs  or legal representative of the insured is legally entitled
to recover as damages” means the amount of damages that:
(A) A claimant could have recovered in a civil action from  the owner or operator at the time
of the injury after  determination of fault or comparative fault and resolution of any applicable de-
fenses;
(B) Are calculated without regard to the tort claims limitations of ORS 30.260 to 30.300; and
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 117
(C) Are no larger than benefits payable under the terms of the policy as  provided in subsection
(7) of this section.
(k) “Uninsured vehicle,” except as provided in paragraph (L) of this provision, means:
(A) A vehicle with respect to the ownership, maintenance or use of which  there is no collectible
motor vehicle bodily injury liability  insurance, in at least the amounts or limits prescribed for bodily
injury or death under ORS 806.070 applicable at the time of the accident with respect to any person
or organization  legally responsible for the use of the vehicle, or with respect to which there is
collectible bodily injury liability insurance applicable at the time of the  accident but the insurance
company writing  the insurance denies coverage or the company writing the insurance becomes vol-
untarily or involuntarily declared bankrupt or for which a  receiver is appointed or becomes insol-
vent. It shall be a disputable presumption that a vehicle is uninsured in the event  the insured and
the insurer, after reasonable efforts, fail to discover within  90 days from the date of the accident,
the existence of a valid and collectible  motor vehicle bodily injury liability insurance applicable at
the time of the accident.
(B) A hit-and-run vehicle.
(C) A phantom vehicle.
(D) A stolen vehicle.
(E) A vehicle that is owned or operated by a self-insurer:
(i) That is not in compliance with ORS 806.130 (1)(c); or
(ii) That provides recovery to an insured in an amount  that is less than the sums that the in-
sured or the heirs or legal representative of the insured is legally entitled  to recover as damages
for bodily injury or death that is caused by  accident and that arises out of owning, maintaining or
using an uninsured vehicle.
(L) “Uninsured vehicle” does not include:
(A) An insured vehicle, unless the vehicle is a stolen vehicle;
(B) Except as  provided in paragraph (k)(E) of this subsection, a vehicle that is owned or oper-
ated by a self-insurer within the meaning of any motor vehicle financial responsibility  law, motor
carrier law or any similar law;
(C) A vehicle that is owned by the United  States of America, Canada, a state, a political sub-
division of any such government or an agency of any such government;
(D) A land motor vehicle or trailer, if operated on rails or crawler-treads  or while located for
use as a residence or premises and not as a vehicle;
(E) A farm-type tractor or equipment designed for use principally off public roads, except  while
actually upon public roads; or
(F) A vehicle owned by or furnished for the regular or frequent use of the insured  or any
member of the household of the insured.
(m) “Vehicle” means every device in, upon or by which  any person or property is or may be
transported or drawn upon a public highway, but does not include devices moved  by human power
or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.
(3) This coverage applies only to accidents that occur on and  after the effective date of the
policy, during the policy period and  within the United States of America, its territories or pos-
sessions, or Canada.
(4)(a) This coverage does not apply to bodily injury of an insured with respect  to which the in-
sured or the legal  representative of the insured shall, without the written consent of the insurer,
make any settlement with or prosecute to judgment any action against any person or organization
who may be legally liable therefor.
(b) This coverage does not  apply to bodily injury to an insured while occupying a vehicle, other
than an  insured vehicle, owned by, or furnished for the regular use of, the named insured or any
relative resident in the same household, or through being struck by the vehicle.
(c) This coverage does not apply so as to  inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of any
workers’ compensation carrier, any person or organization qualifying  as a self-insurer under any
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 118
workers’ compensation or  disability benefits law or any similar law or the State Accident Insurance
Fund Corporation.
(d) This coverage does not apply with respect to underinsured motorist benefits unless:
(A) The limits of liability under any bodily injury liability insurance applicable at the  time of
the accident regarding the injured person have been exhausted by payment of judgments or  settle-
ments to the injured person or other injured persons;
(B) The described  limits have been offered in settlement, the insurer has refused consent under
paragraph (a) of this  subsection and the insured protects the insurer’s right of subrogation to the
claim against the tortfeasor;
(C) The insured  gives credit to the insurer for the unrealized portion of the described liability
limits as if the full limits  had been received if less than the described limits have been offered in
settlement, and the insurer has consented under paragraph (a) of this subsection; or
(D) The insured gives credit to the insurer for the unrealized portion of the described liability
limits as if the full limits  had been received if less than the described limits have been offered in
settlement and, if the insurer has refused  consent under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the insured
protects the insurer’s right of subrogation to the claim against the tortfeasor.
(e) When seeking consent under paragraph (a) or (d) of  this subsection, the insured shall allow
the insurer  a reasonable time in which to collect and evaluate information related to consent to the
proposed offer of settlement.  The insured shall provide promptly to the insurer any information that
is reasonably requested by the insurer and that is within the  custody and control of the insured.
Consent will be presumed to be given if the insurer does not respond within  a reasonable time. For
purposes of this paragraph, a “reasonable time” is  no more than 30 days from the insurer’s receipt
of a written request for consent, unless the insured and the insurer agree otherwise.
(5)(a) As  soon as practicable, the insured or other person making claim shall give to the insurer
written proof of claim, under oath if required, including full particulars of the nature and extent  of
the injuries, treatment and other details entering into the determination of  the amount payable
hereunder. The insured and  every other person making claim hereunder shall submit to examina-
tions under oath by any person  named by the insurer and subscribe the same, as often as may rea-
sonably be required. Proof of claim shall be made upon forms furnished by the insurer unless  the
insurer fails to furnish the forms within 15 days after receiving notice of claim.
(b) Upon reasonable request  of and at the expense of the insurer, the injured person shall submit
to physical  examinations by physicians, naturopathic physicians, [ physician assistants ] physician
associates or nurse practitioners  selected by the insurer and shall, upon each request from the
insurer, execute  authorization to enable the insurer to obtain medical reports and copies of records.
(6) If, before the insurer makes payment  of loss hereunder, the insured or the legal represen-
tative of the insured institutes any legal  action for bodily injury against any person or organization
legally  responsible  for the use of a vehicle involved in the accident, a copy of the summons and
complaint  or  other process served in connection with the legal action shall be forwarded imme-
diately to the insurer by the insured or the legal representative of the insured.
(7)(a) The limit of liability stated in the declarations as applicable to “each person”  is the limit
of the insurer’s liability for all damages because of bodily injury sustained by one person as the
result of any  one accident and, subject to the above provision respecting each person, the limit of
liability stated in the declarations as applicable to “each accident” is  the total limit of the
company’s liability for all damages because of bodily injury sustained by two  or more persons as the
result of any one accident.
(b) Any amount payable under the terms of this coverage  because of bodily injury sustained in
an accident by a  person who is an insured under this coverage shall be reduced by the amount paid
and the present value of all amounts payable on account of the bodily injury  under any workers’
compensation law, disability benefits law or any similar law.
(c) Any amount payable under the terms of this coverage because  of bodily injury sustained in
an accident by a person who is an insured  under this coverage shall be reduced by the credit given
to the insurer pursuant to subsection (4)(d)(C) or (D) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 119
(d) The amount payable under the terms of this coverage may not be reduced by the amount of
liability proceeds offered, described in subsection (4)(d)(B) or (D) of this section, that has not been
paid to the injured person. If liability proceeds have been offered and not paid, the amount  payable
under the terms of the coverage  shall include the amount of liability limits offered but not accepted
due to the insurer’s refusal to  consent. The insured shall cooperate so as to permit the insurer to
proceed by subrogation or assignment to prosecute the claim against the uninsured motorist.
(8) No action shall lie against the insurer unless,  as a condition precedent thereto, the insured
or the legal representative of the insured has fully complied with all the terms of this policy.
(9)(a) With respect to bodily injury to an insured:
(A) While occupying a vehicle owned by a named insured under  this coverage, the insurance
under this coverage is primary.
(B) While occupying a vehicle not owned by a named insured  under this coverage, the insurance
under this coverage shall  apply only as excess insurance over any primary insurance available to
the occupant that is similar to this coverage,  and this excess insurance coverage shall then apply
only to the sums that the insured or the heirs or legal representative of the insured is legally  enti-
tled to recover as damages for bodily injury or  death that is caused by accident and that arises out
of owning, maintaining or using an uninsured vehicle.
(b) With respect to bodily injury to an insured while occupying any motor vehicle used as  a
public or livery conveyance, the  insurance under this coverage shall apply only as excess insurance
over any other insurance available to the insured that is similar to  this coverage, and this excess
insurance coverage shall then apply only to the amount by which the applicable limit of  liability of
this coverage exceeds the sum of the applicable limits of liability of all other insurance.
(10) If any person making claim hereunder and  the insurer do not agree that the person is le-
gally entitled to recover damages from the owner or operator of  an uninsured vehicle because of
bodily injury to the insured, or do not agree as to the amount  of payment that may be owing under
this coverage, then, in the event the insured and the insurer  elect by mutual agreement at the time
of the dispute to  settle the matter by arbitration, the arbitration shall take place as described in
ORS 742.505. Any judgment upon the award  rendered by the arbitrators may be entered in any court
having jurisdiction  thereof, provided, however, that the costs to the insured of the arbitration pro-
ceeding do not  exceed $100 and that all other costs of arbitration are borne by the insurer.
“Costs” as used in this provision does not  include attorney fees or expenses incurred in the pro-
duction of evidence or witnesses or the  making of transcripts of the arbitration proceedings. The
person and the insurer each agree to consider themselves bound and to be bound by any award made
by the arbitrators pursuant to this coverage in the event of such  election. At the election of the
insured, the arbitration shall be held:
(a) In the county and state of residence of the insured;
(b) In the county and state where the insured’s cause of action against the uninsured  motorist
arose; or
(c) At any other place mutually agreed upon by the insured and the insurer.
(11) In the event of payment to any person under this coverage:
(a) The insurer shall be entitled to the extent of the payment to the  proceeds of any settlement
or judgment that may result from the exercise of any rights of recovery of the person against any
uninsured motorist legally responsible for the bodily injury because of which payment is made;
(b) The person shall hold in trust  for the benefit of the insurer all rights of recovery that the
person shall have against such other uninsured person or organization because  of the damages that
are the subject of claim made under this coverage, but only to the extent that the claim is  made
or paid herein;
(c) If the insured is injured by the joint or concurrent  act or acts of two or more persons, one
or more  of whom is uninsured, the insured shall have the election to receive from the insurer any
payment to which the insured would be entitled under this coverage by reason of the act or  acts
of the uninsured  motorist, or the insured may, with the written consent of the insurer, proceed with
legal action against any or all persons claimed to be liable to the  insured for the injuries. If the
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 120
insured elects to receive payment from the insurer under this coverage, then the insured  shall hold
in trust for  the benefit of the insurer all rights of recovery the insured shall have against any other
person, firm or organization because of the damages that are the subject of claim made  under this
coverage, but only to the extent of the actual payment made by the insurer;
(d) The person shall do whatever is proper to secure and shall do nothing  after loss to prejudice
such rights;
(e) If requested in writing by the insurer, the person shall take, through  any representative not
in conflict in interest with the person, designated by the insurer, such action as  may be necessary
or appropriate to recover payment as damages from such other uninsured person  or organization,
such action to be taken  in the name of the person, but only to the extent of the payment made
hereunder. In the event of a recovery, the  insurer shall be reimbursed out of the recovery for ex-
penses, costs and attorney fees incurred by the insurer in connection therewith; and
(f) The person shall execute and deliver to the insurer any  instruments and papers as may be
appropriate to secure the rights and obligations of the person and the insurer established by  this
provision.
(12)(a) The parties  to this coverage agree that no cause of action shall accrue to the insured
under this coverage unless within two years from the date of the accident:
(A) Agreement as to the amount due under the policy has been concluded;
(B) The insured or the insurer has formally instituted arbitration proceedings;
(C) The insured has filed an action against the insurer; or
(D) Suit  for bodily injury has been filed against the uninsured motorist and, within two years
from the date of settlement or final judgment  against the uninsured motorist, the insured has
formally instituted arbitration proceedings or filed an action against the insurer.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(A) “Date of settlement” means the date on which a written settlement agreement or release  is
signed by an insured or, in the absence of these  documents, the date on which the insured or the
attorney for the insured receives payment of any  sum required by the settlement agreement. An
advance payment as  defined in ORS 31.550 shall not be deemed a payment of a settlement for pur-
poses of the time limitation in this subsection.
(B) “Final judgment” means a judgment that has become final by lapse of time for appeal  or by
entry in an appellate court of an appellate judgment.
SECTION 154.
 ORS 743A.036 is amended to read:
743A.036. (1) Whenever any policy of health insurance provides for reimbursement for  a primary
care or mental health service provided by a licensed physician, the insured under  the policy is en-
titled to reimbursement for such service if provided by a licensed [ physician assistant ] physician
associate or a licensed nurse practitioner if the service is within the lawful  scope of practice of the
[physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner.
(2)(a) The reimbursement of a  service described in subsection (1) of this section that is provided
by a licensed [ physician assistant ] physician associate or a licensed nurse practitioner who is in
an independent practice shall be in the same amount as the reimbursement paid under  the policy
to a licensed physician performing the service in the area served.
(b) As  used in this subsection, “independent practice” means the licensed [ physician assistant ]
physician associate or the licensed nurse practitioner bills insurers for  services provided by the
[physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner using the:
(A) Diagnosis and procedure codes applicable to the services;
(B) [ Physician assistant’s ] Physician associate’s  or nurse practitioner’s own name; and
(C) National provider identifier for:
(i) The [ physician assistant ] physician associate or nurse practitioner; and
(ii) If required by the insurer, the facility in which the [ physician assistant ] physician associate
or nurse practitioner provides the services.
(3) This section  does not apply to group practice health maintenance organizations that are
federally qualified pursuant to Title XIII of the Health Maintenance Organization Act  or other
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 121
insurers that employ physicians, licensed [ physician assistants ] physician  associates  or licensed
nurse practitioners to  provide primary care or mental health services and do not compensate such
practitioners on a fee-for-service basis.
(4) An insurer may  not reduce the reimbursement paid to a licensed physician in order to com-
ply with this section.
SECTION 155. ORS 743A.044 is amended to read:
743A.044. (1) An insurer may  not refuse a claim solely on the ground that the claim was sub-
mitted by a [ physician assistant ] physician associate rather than by a physician, podiatric physician
or employer with whom the [ physician assistant ] physician associate  has entered into a collab-
oration agreement, as defined in ORS 677.495.
(2) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 156.
 ORS 743B.222 is amended to read:
743B.222. (1) As  used in this section, “women’s health care provider” means an obstetrician or
gynecologist, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  specializing in  women’s health, advanced
registered nurse practitioner specialist in women’s  health, naturopathic physician specializing in
women’s health or certified nurse  midwife, practicing within the applicable lawful scope of practice.
(2) Every health  insurance policy that covers hospital, medical or surgical expenses and requires
an enrollee to designate a participating primary care provider shall permit a female enrollee to
designate a women’s health care provider as the enrollee’s primary care provider if:
(a) The women’s health care  provider meets the standards established by the insurer in collab-
oration with interested parties, including but not limited to  the Oregon section of the American
College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists; and
(b) The women’s health care provider requests that the insurer make the provider available  for
designation as a primary care provider.
(3) If a female enrollee  has designated a primary care provider who is not a women’s health care
provider, an insurance policy as described in subsection (2) of this section shall  permit the enrollee
to have direct access to a women’s health care provider, without a referral or  prior authorization,
for obstetrical or gynecological care by a participating health care professional who  specializes in
obstetrics or gynecology.
(4) The standards established by the insurer  under subsection (2) of this section shall not pro-
hibit an insurer from establishing the maximum number of  participating primary care providers and
participating women’s health care providers necessary to serve a defined population or geographic
service  area.
SECTION 157.
 ORS 743B.427, as amended by section 7, chapter 629, Oregon  Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
743B.427. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Behavioral health benefits”  means insurance coverage of mental health treatment and ser-
vices and substance use disorder treatment and services.
(b) “Carrier” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(c) “Geographic region” means the geographic area of the state  established by the Department
of Consumer and Business Services for the purpose of determining geographic average rates, as  de-
fined in ORS 743B.005.
(d) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(e) “Median maximum allowable reimbursement rate” means the median of all maximum allow-
able reimbursement rates, minus incentive  payments, paid for each billing code for each provider
type during a calendar year.
(f) “Mental health treatment and services” means the  treatment of or services provided to ad-
dress any condition or disorder that falls under any of the diagnostic categories listed in the  mental
disorders section of the current edition of the:
(A) International Classification of Disease; or
(B) Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 122
(g) “Nonquantitative treatment limitation” means a limitation that is not  expressed numerically
but otherwise limits the scope or duration of behavioral health benefits.
(h) “Substance use disorder treatment  and services” means the treatment of or services provided
to address any  condition or disorder that falls under any of the diagnostic categories listed in the
substance use section of the current edition of the:
(A) International Classification of Disease; or
(B) Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.
(2) Each carrier that offers an individual or group health benefit plan in this state  that provides
behavioral health benefits  shall conduct an annual analysis of whether the processes, strategies,
specific  evidentiary  standards or other factors the carrier used to design, determine applicability
of and apply each nonquantitative treatment limitation  to behavioral health benefits within each
classification of benefits are comparable to, and are applied no more stringently  than, the processes,
strategies, specific evidentiary standards or other factors the carrier used to design, determine  ap-
plicability of and apply each  nonquantitative treatment limitation to medical and surgical benefits
within the corresponding classification of benefits.
(3) On or before March 1 of each year, all carriers that offer individual  or group health benefit
plans in this state that  provide behavioral health benefits shall report to the Department of Con-
sumer and Business Services, in the form and  manner prescribed by the department, the following
information:
(a) The specific plan or coverage terms or other  relevant terms regarding the nonquantitative
treatment limitations and a description of all mental health or substance use disorder and medical
or surgical benefits to which each such term applies in each respective benefits classification.
(b) The factors  used to determine that the nonquantitative treatment limitations will apply to
mental health or substance use disorder benefits and medical or surgical benefits.
(c) The evidentiary standards used for the factors identified in paragraph (b) of this subsection,
when applicable, provided that every factor is defined, and any other source  or evidence relied upon
to design and apply the  nonquantitative treatment limitations to mental health or substance use
disorder benefits and medical or surgical benefits.
(d) The comparative analyses demonstrating  that the processes, strategies, evidentiary standards
and other factors used to  apply the nonquantitative treatment limitations to mental health or sub-
stance use disorder benefits, as written and in operation,  are comparable to, and are applied no
more stringently than, the  processes, strategies, evidentiary standards and other factors used to
apply the nonquantitative treatment limitations to  medical or surgical benefits in the benefits clas-
sification.
(e) The specific findings and conclusions reached  by the insurer with respect to the health in-
surance coverage, including any  results of the analyses described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this
subsection that indicate that the plan or coverage is or is not in compliance with this section.
(f) The number of denials of behavioral health benefits and medical and surgical benefits,
the percentage  of denials that were appealed, the percentage of appeals that upheld the de-
nial and the percentage of appeals that overturned the denial.
(g) The percentage  of claims for behavioral health benefits and medical and surgical
benefits that were paid to in-network providers and  the percentage of such claims that were
paid to out-of-network providers.
(h) The  median maximum allowable reimbursement rate for each time-based office visit
billing code for each behavioral treatment provider type and each medical provider type.
(i) The reimbursement rate  in each geographic region for a time-based office visit and
the percentage of the Medicare rate the reimbursement rate represents, paid to:
(A) Psychiatrists.
(B) Psychiatric mental health nurse practitioners.
(C) Psychologists.
(D) Licensed clinical social workers.
(E) Licensed professional counselors.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 123
(F) Licensed marriage and family therapists.
(j) The reimbursement rate in each geographic region for a time-based  office visit and
the percentage of the Medicare rate the reimbursement rate represents, paid to:
(A) Physicians.
(B) Physician associates.
(C) Licensed nurse practitioners.
(k) The specific findings and conclusions of the carrier under subsection (2) of this  sec-
tion demonstrating compliance with ORS 743A.168 and  the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici
Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 (P.L.  110-343) and rules adopted
thereunder.
[(f)] (L)  Other data or information the department deems necessary to assess  a carrier’s com-
pliance with mental health parity requirements.
(4) No later than September 15 of each calendar  year, the department shall report to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to mental or behavioral health, in the manner pro-
vided in ORS 192.245, the information reported  under subsection (3) of this section, including the
department’s overall comparison of carriers’ coverage of mental health treatment and services and
substance use disorder treatment and services to carriers’ coverage  of medical or surgical treat-
ments or services.
SECTION 157a.
 ORS 743B.427, as amended by section  7, chapter 629, Oregon Laws 2021, and
section 157 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
743B.427. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Behavioral health benefits”  means insurance coverage of mental health treatment and ser-
vices and substance use disorder treatment and services.
(b) “Carrier” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(c) “Geographic region” means the geographic area of the state  established by the Department
of Consumer and Business Services for the purpose of determining geographic average rates, as  de-
fined in ORS 743B.005.
(d) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(e) “Median maximum allowable reimbursement rate” means the median of all maximum allow-
able reimbursement rates, minus incentive  payments, paid for each billing code for each provider
type during a calendar year.
(f) “Mental health treatment and services” means the  treatment of or services provided to ad-
dress any condition or disorder that falls under any of the diagnostic categories listed in the  mental
disorders section of the current edition of the:
(A) International Classification of Disease; or
(B) Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.
(g) “Nonquantitative treatment limitation” means a limitation that is not  expressed numerically
but otherwise limits the scope or duration of behavioral health benefits.
(h) “Substance use disorder treatment  and services” means the treatment of or services provided
to address any condition or disorder that falls under any of the diagnostic categories listed  in the
substance use section of the current edition of the:
(A) International Classification of Disease; or
(B) Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.
(2) Each carrier that offers an individual or group health benefit plan in this state  that provides
behavioral health benefits shall conduct an annual analysis of whether the  processes, strategies,
specific evidentiary standards or other factors the carrier used to design, determine  applicability
of and apply each nonquantitative treatment limitation  to behavioral health benefits within each
classification of benefits are comparable to, and are applied no more stringently  than, the processes,
strategies,  specific  evidentiary standards or other factors the carrier used to design, determine ap-
plicability of and apply each nonquantitative treatment limitation to  medical and surgical benefits
within the corresponding classification of benefits.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 124
(3) On or before March 1 of each year, all carriers that offer individual  or group health benefit
plans in this state that provide behavioral health benefits shall report to  the Department of Con-
sumer and Business Services, in the form and  manner prescribed by the department, the following
information:
(a) The specific plan or coverage terms or other  relevant terms regarding the nonquantitative
treatment limitations and a description of all mental health or substance use disorder and medical
or surgical benefits to which each such term applies in each respective benefits classification.
(b) The factors  used to determine that the nonquantitative treatment limitations will apply to
mental health or substance use disorder benefits and medical or surgical benefits.
(c) The evidentiary standards used for the factors identified in paragraph (b) of this subsection,
when applicable, provided that every factor is defined, and any other source  or evidence relied upon
to design and apply the  nonquantitative treatment limitations to mental health or substance use
disorder benefits and medical or surgical benefits.
(d) The comparative analyses demonstrating  that the processes, strategies, evidentiary standards
and other factors used to  apply the nonquantitative treatment limitations to mental health or sub-
stance use disorder benefits, as written and in operation,  are comparable to, and are applied no
more stringently than, the  processes, strategies, evidentiary standards and other factors used to
apply the nonquantitative treatment limitations to  medical or surgical benefits in the benefits clas-
sification.
(e) The specific findings and conclusions reached  by the insurer with respect to the health in-
surance coverage, including any  results of the analyses described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this
subsection that indicate that the plan or coverage is or is not in compliance with this section.
[(f) The number of denials of behavioral health benefits and medical and surgical benefits, the
percentage of denials  that were appealed, the percentage of appeals that upheld the denial and the
percentage of appeals that overturned the denial. ]
[(g) The percentage of claims for behavioral health benefits and medical and surgical  benefits that
were paid  to in-network providers and the percentage of such claims that were paid to out-of-network
providers.]
[(h) The median maximum allowable reimbursement rate for each time-based office visit billing code
for each behavioral treatment provider type and each medical provider type. ]
[(i) The reimbursement rate in each geographic region for a time-based office visit  and the per-
centage of the Medicare rate the reimbursement rate represents, paid to: ]
[(A) Psychiatrists. ]
[(B) Psychiatric mental health nurse practitioners. ]
[(C) Psychologists. ]
[(D) Licensed clinical social workers. ]
[(E) Licensed professional counselors. ]
[(F) Licensed marriage and family therapists. ]
[(j) The reimbursement rate  in each geographic region for a time-based office visit and the per-
centage of the Medicare rate the reimbursement rate represents, paid to: ]
[(A) Physicians. ]
[(B) Physician associates. ]
[(C) Licensed nurse practitioners. ]
[(k) The specific findings and conclusions of the  carrier under subsection (2) of this section dem-
onstrating compliance with ORS  743A.168 and the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health
Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 (P.L. 110-343) and rules adopted thereunder. ]
[(L)] (f) Other data or information the department deems necessary to assess  a carrier’s com-
pliance with mental health parity requirements.
(4) No later than September 15 of each calendar  year, the department shall report to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to mental or behavioral health, in the manner pro-
vided in ORS 192.245, the information reported  under subsection (3) of this section, including the
department’s overall comparison of carriers’ coverage of mental health treatment and services and
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 125
substance use disorder treatment and services to carriers’ coverage  of medical or surgical treat-
ments or services.
SECTION 157b. Section 9, chapter 629, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  [ (1)] The amendments to [ section 2 of this 2021 Act ] ORS 743B.427  by  section [ 7 of this
2021 Act ] 157a of this 2024 Act  become operative on January 1, 2025.
[(2) The amendments to ORS 743A.168 by section 8 of this 2021 Act become operative on  January
1, 2023.]
SECTION 158. ORS 744.364 is amended to read:
744.364. (1)(a) A life settlement  provider entering into a life settlement contract shall first ob-
tain:
(A) If the owner is the insured, a written statement from  a licensed physician, a naturopathic
physician licensed under ORS  chapter 685, a [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed un-
der ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or a nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390 that the
owner is of sound mind and under no constraint or undue influence to enter into  a life settlement
contract; and
(B) A document in which the insured consents to the release of the insured’s  medical records
to a licensed life settlement provider, life settlement broker and the insurance company that issued
the life insurance policy covering the life of the insured.
(b) Within 20 days after an owner executes documents necessary to transfer any rights under
an insurance policy or, if the insured is terminally ill, within 20 days after an owner entering any
agreement, option, promise or any other form of understanding, expressed or implied, to  transfer the
policy for value, the life settlement provider shall give written notice to  the insurer that issued the
insurance  policy  that the policy has or will become a settled policy. The notice must be accompanied
by the documents required by paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(c) The life  settlement provider shall deliver a copy of the medical release required under par-
agraph (a)(B) of this subsection, a copy  of the owner’s application for the life settlement contract,
the notice required under paragraph (b) of this subsection and a request for verification of coverage
to the insurer that issued the life policy that  is the subject of the life transaction. The Director of
the Department of Consumer and  Business Services shall develop and approve a form for the request
for verification.
(d) The insurer shall respond to a request for verification of coverage submitted on an approved
form by a life  settlement provider or life settlement broker within 30 calendar days of the date the
request is received and shall indicate whether, based  on the medical evidence and documents pro-
vided, the insurer intends to pursue an investigation at this time regarding the validity of the  in-
surance contract or possible fraud. The insurer shall  accept a request for verification of coverage
made on a form  approved by the director. The insurer shall accept an original or facsimile or elec-
tronic copy of such request and any accompanying authorization signed by  the owner. Failure by
the insurer to meet its obligations under this subsection is a violation of the Insurance Code.
(e) Prior to or at the time  of execution of the life settlement contract, the life settlement pro-
vider shall obtain a witnessed document in which  the owner consents to the life settlement contract,
represents that the owner has a full and complete understanding  of the life settlement contract, that
the owner has a full and complete understanding of the benefits of  the life insurance policy, ac-
knowledges that the owner is entering into the life settlement contract freely and voluntarily and,
for persons with a terminal illness or chronic illness or  condition, acknowledges that the insured
has a terminal illness or chronic illness  and that the terminal illness or chronic illness or condition
was diagnosed after the life insurance policy was issued.
(f) If a life settlement broker performs any of the activities required of the life settlement  pro-
vider, the provider is deemed to have fulfilled the requirements of this section that were performed
by the broker.
(2) All medical information solicited or  obtained by any licensee is privileged and confidential
under ORS 705.137.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 126
(3)(a) All life settlement contracts entered into in this state must provide the owner with  an
absolute right to rescind the contract before the earlier of 60 calendar days after the date upon
which the life settlement  contract is executed by all parties or 30 calendar days after the life
settlement proceeds have been sent to the owner under subsection (5) of this section.
(b) The life settlement provider  may condition rescission upon the owner both giving notice and
repaying to the life  settlement provider within the rescission period all proceeds of the settlement
and any premiums, loans and loan interest paid by or on behalf of the life settlement  provider in
connection with or as a consequence of the life settlement.
(c) If the insured dies during the rescission period, the life settlement contract is deemed to have
been rescinded, subject to repayment within 60 calendar days of the  death of the insured to the life
settlement provider or purchaser of all life  settlement proceeds and any premiums, loans and loan
interest that have been paid by the life settlement provider or purchaser.
(d) In the event of any rescission, if the life settlement  provider has paid commissions or other
compensation to a life settlement broker in connection with the rescinded  transaction, the life
settlement broker  shall refund all such commissions and compensation to the life settlement provider
within five business days following receipt of written demand from  the life settlement provider. The
demand must be accompanied by either the owner’s notice of rescission if rescinded at  the election
of the owner, or the notice of the death of the insured if rescinded by reason of  the death of the
insured within the applicable rescission period.
(4) The life settlement purchaser shall have  the right to rescind a life settlement contract within
three days after the disclosures mandated by ORS 744.354 (7) are received by the purchaser.
(5)(a) The  life settlement provider shall instruct the owner to send the executed documents re-
quired to effect the change in ownership, assignment or  change in beneficiary directly to an inde-
pendent escrow agent selected by the provider.
(b) Within  three business days after the date the escrow agent receives the document, or from
the date the life settlement  provider receives the documents, if the owner erroneously provides the
documents directly to  the provider, the provider shall pay or transfer the proceeds of the life
settlement into an escrow or trust account maintained in a state  or federally chartered financial
institution whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.
(c) Upon payment of the settlement proceeds into the escrow account, the escrow agent  shall
deliver the original change in ownership, assignment or change in beneficiary forms to  the life
settlement provider or related provider trust  or other designated representative of the life settle-
ment provider.  Upon the escrow agent’s receipt of the acknowledgment of the properly completed
transfer of ownership, assignment  or designation of beneficiary from the insurance company, the
escrow agent shall pay the settlement proceeds to the owner.
(6) Failure to pay the  owner the full contract amount for the life settlement contract within the
time set forth under subsection (5) of this section renders  the life settlement contract voidable by
the owner until the time full payment is tendered to and accepted by the owner. Funds are deemed
sent by a life settlement provider to an owner as of the  date that the escrow agent either releases
funds for wire transfer to the owner or places a check for delivery to the owner via  the United
States Postal Service or another nationally recognized delivery service.
(7)(a) Contacts with the insured for the purpose of determining the health status of  the insured
by the life settlement provider or life settlement broker after the life settlement has  occurred may
be made only by the life settlement provider or broker licensed in this state or its authorized rep-
resentatives and are limited to once every  three months for insureds with a life expectancy of more
than one year, and to no more than once per month for insureds with  a life expectancy of one year
or less.
(b) The limitations set forth in this subsection do not apply to any  contacts with an insured for
reasons other than determining the insured’s health status.
SECTION 159.
 ORS 744.367 is amended to read:
744.367. (1) A person may not enter into a life  settlement contract at any time prior to the ap-
plication or issuance of a policy that is the subject  of a life settlement contract or within a five-year
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 127
period commencing with  the date of issuance of the insurance policy or certificate. However, this
five-year restriction does not apply if the owner  certifies to the life settlement provider that any one
or more of the following conditions has been met within the five-year period:
(a) The policy was issued upon the owner’s exercise of conversion rights arising out of a  group
or individual policy if the total of the time covered under the conversion policy plus  the time cov-
ered under the prior policy is at least 60 months. The time covered under a group policy is calcu-
lated without regard to any change in insurance carriers, provided the  coverage has been
continuous and under the same group sponsorship;
(b) The owner submits independent evidence to the life settlement provider that one or  more of
the following conditions have been met within the five-year period:
(A) The owner or insured is terminally ill or chronically ill;
(B) The owner’s spouse dies;
(C) The owner divorces the owner’s spouse;
(D) The owner retires from full-time employment;
(E) The owner becomes physically or mentally disabled and a physician, naturopathic  physician
licensed under ORS chapter 685,  [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS
677.505 to 677.525 or nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390 determines  that the
disability prevents the owner from maintaining full-time employment; or
(F) A final order,  judgment or decree is entered by a court of competent jurisdiction, on the
application  of  a creditor of the owner, adjudicating the owner bankrupt or insolvent, or approving
a petition seeking reorganization of the owner or appointing a receiver, trustee  or liquidator to all
or a substantial part of the owner’s assets; or
(c) The owner enters into a life settlement contract more than two years after the  date of is-
suance of a policy and, with respect to the policy, at all times prior to the date  that is two years
after policy issuance, the following conditions are met:
(A) Policy  premiums have been funded exclusively with unencumbered assets, including an in-
terest in the life insurance policy being financed only to the extent of its net  cash surrender value,
provided by, or full recourse liability incurred by, the insured or a person closely related to the
insured by blood or law  or a party having a lawful substantial economic interest in the continued
life, health and bodily safety of the person insured, or a trust established primarily for the  benefit
of such parties;
(B) There is no agreement or understanding with any other person to  guarantee any such li-
ability or to purchase or stand ready to purchase the policy,  including through an assumption or
forgiveness of the loan; and
(C) Neither the insured nor the policy has been evaluated for settlement.
(2) Copies  of the independent evidence described in subsection (1)(b) of this section and docu-
ments required by ORS  744.364 (1) must be submitted to the insurer when the life settlement pro-
vider or other party entering into  a life settlement contract with an owner submits a request to the
insurer for verification of coverage. The copies must be  accompanied by a letter of attestation from
the life settlement provider that the copies are  true and correct copies of the documents received
by the life settlement provider.
(3) If the life settlement provider submits to the insurer a copy of the  owner’s or insured’s cer-
tification described in and the documents  required by ORS 744.364 (1) when the provider submits a
request to the insurer to effect the transfer of the policy or certificate to the life settlement pro-
vider, the copy  conclusively establishes that the life settlement contract satisfies the requirements
of this section and the insurer shall respond in a timely manner to the request.
(4) An insurer may  not, as a condition of responding to a request for verification of coverage
or effecting the transfer of a policy pursuant to a life settlement contract, require that the  owner,
insured, life settlement provider or life settlement broker sign any  forms, disclosures, consent or
waiver form that has not been expressly approved by the Director of the Department  of Consumer
and Business Services for use in connection with life settlement contracts in this state.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 128
(5) Upon receipt of a properly completed request for a  change of ownership or beneficiary of a
policy, the insurer shall respond in writing within 30 calendar  days with written acknowledgement
confirming  that  the change has been effected or specifying the reasons why the requested change
cannot be processed. The insurer may not unreasonably delay effecting change  of ownership or
beneficiary and may not otherwise seek to interfere with any life settlement  contract lawfully en-
tered into in this state.
SECTION 160. ORS 746.230 is amended to read:
746.230. (1) An insurer  or other person may not commit or perform any of the following unfair
claim settlement practices:
(a) Misrepresenting facts or policy provisions in settling claims;
(b) Failing to acknowledge and act promptly upon communications relating to claims;
(c) Failing to adopt and implement reasonable standards for the prompt investigation of claims;
(d) Refusing  to pay claims without conducting a reasonable investigation based on all available
information;
(e) Failing to affirm or deny coverage of claims within a  reasonable time after completed proof
of loss statements have been submitted;
(f) Not attempting, in good faith, to promptly and equitably settle claims in which  liability has
become reasonably clear;
(g) Compelling claimants to initiate litigation to recover amounts due  by offering substantially
less than amounts ultimately recovered in actions brought by such claimants;
(h) Attempting to settle claims for less than the amount  to which a reasonable person would
believe a reasonable person was  entitled after referring to written or printed advertising material
accompanying or made part of an application;
(i) Attempting to settle claims on the basis of an application altered without notice to or consent
of the applicant;
(j) Failing, after payment of a claim,  to inform insureds or beneficiaries, upon request by them,
of the coverage under which payment has been made;
(k) Delaying investigation or payment of claims by requiring a claimant or the  claimant’s phy-
sician, naturopathic physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  or nurse practitioner to
submit a preliminary claim report and then requiring  subsequent submission of loss forms when both
require essentially the same information;
(L) Failing to promptly settle claims under one coverage of a policy where liability has  become
reasonably clear in order to influence settlements under other coverages of the policy;
(m) Failing to promptly provide the proper explanation  of the basis relied on in the insurance
policy in relation to the facts or applicable law for the denial of a claim; or
(n) Any of the practices described in ORS 746.233.
(2) No insurer shall refuse, without just cause, to pay or settle claims arising  under coverages
provided by its policies with such frequency as to indicate  a general business practice in this state,
which general business practice is evidenced by:
(a) A substantial  increase in the number of complaints against the insurer received by the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services;
(b) A substantial  increase in the number of lawsuits filed against the insurer or its insureds by
claimants; or
(c) Other relevant evidence.
SECTION 161.
 ORS 746.600 is amended to read:
746.600. As used in ORS 746.600 to 746.690:
(1)(a) “Adverse underwriting decision” means  any of the following actions with respect to in-
surance transactions involving insurance coverage that is individually underwritten:
(A) A declination of insurance coverage.
(B) A termination of insurance coverage.
(C) Failure of an  insurance producer to apply for insurance coverage with a specific insurer that
the insurance producer represents and that is requested by an applicant.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 129
(D) In the case of life or health  insurance coverage, an offer to insure at higher than standard
rates.
(E) In the case of insurance coverage other than life or health insurance coverage:
(i) Placement by an insurer  or insurance producer of a risk with a residual market mechanism,
an unauthorized insurer or an insurer that specializes in substandard risks.
(ii) The charging of a higher rate on the basis  of information that differs from that which the
applicant or policyholder furnished.
(iii) An increase in any charge  imposed by the insurer for any personal insurance in connection
with the underwriting of insurance. For purposes of this sub-subparagraph, the  imposition of a ser-
vice fee is not a charge.
(b) “Adverse underwriting decision” does  not mean any of the following actions, but the insurer
or insurance producer responsible for the occurrence of the  action must nevertheless provide the
applicant or policyholder with the specific reason or reasons for the occurrence:
(A) The termination of an individual policy form on a class or statewide basis.
(B) A declination of insurance coverage solely because the coverage is not available on a class
or statewide basis.
(C) The rescission of a policy.
(2) “Affiliate of” a specified person or “person  affiliated with” a specified person means a person
who directly,  or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is
under common control with, the person specified.
(3) “Applicant” means a person who seeks to contract for insurance coverage, other  than a
person seeking group insurance coverage that is not individually underwritten.
(4) “Consumer” means an  individual, or the personal representative of the individual, who seeks
to obtain, obtains or has obtained one or more  insurance products or services from a licensee that
are to be used primarily for  personal, family or household purposes, and about whom the licensee
has personal information.
(5) “Consumer report” means any  written, oral or other communication of information bearing
on a  natural person’s creditworthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputa-
tion, personal  characteristics or mode of living that is used or expected to be used in connection
with an insurance transaction.
(6) “Consumer reporting agency” means a person that, for monetary fees or dues, or on a co-
operative or nonprofit basis:
(a) Regularly engages, in whole or in part, in assembling or preparing consumer reports;
(b) Obtains information primarily from sources other than insurers; and
(c) Furnishes consumer reports to other persons.
(7) “Control” means,  and the terms “controlled by” or “under common control with” refer to,
the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause  the direction of the manage-
ment and policies of a person, whether through the  ownership of voting securities, by contract other
than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or otherwise,  unless the power
of the person is the result of a corporate  office held in, or an official position held with, the con-
trolled person.
(8) “Covered entity” means:
(a) A health insurer;
(b) A health care  provider that transmits any health information in electronic form to carry out
financial or administrative activities in connection with  a transaction covered by ORS 746.607 or
by rules adopted under ORS 746.608; or
(c) A health care clearinghouse.
(9) “Credit history” means any written or other communication of any information by  a con-
sumer reporting agency that:
(a) Bears on a consumer’s creditworthiness, credit standing or credit capacity; and
(b) Is used or expected to be used, or collected in whole or in part, as  a factor in determining
eligibility, premiums or rates for personal insurance.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 130
(10) “Customer”  means a consumer who has a continuing relationship with a licensee under
which the licensee provides one or more insurance products or services to the  consumer that are
to be used primarily for personal, family or household purposes.
(11) “Declination of  insurance coverage” or “decline coverage” means a denial, in whole or in
part, by an insurer or insurance producer of an application for requested insurance coverage.
(12) “Health care” means care, services or supplies related to the health of an individual.
(13) “Health care operations” includes but is not limited to:
(a) Quality assessment, accreditation, auditing and improvement activities;
(b) Case management and care coordination;
(c) Reviewing the competence, qualifications  or performance of health care providers or health
insurers;
(d) Underwriting activities;
(e) Arranging for legal services;
(f) Business planning;
(g) Customer services;
(h) Resolving internal grievances;
(i) Creating deidentified information; and
(j) Fundraising.
(14) “Health care provider” includes but is not limited to:
(a) A  psychologist, occupational therapist, regulated social worker, professional counselor or
marriage and family therapist licensed or otherwise authorized to practice under ORS  chapter 675
or an employee of  the psychologist, occupational therapist, regulated social worker, professional
counselor or marriage and family therapist;
(b) A  physician or [ physician assistant ] physician associate licensed under ORS chapter 677,
an acupuncturist licensed under ORS 677.759 or an employee of the physician,  [ physician assistant ]
physician associate or acupuncturist;
(c) A nurse or nursing home administrator licensed under  ORS chapter 678 or an employee of
the nurse or nursing home administrator;
(d) A dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679 or an employee of the dentist;
(e) A dental hygienist or denturist licensed under ORS chapter 680 or an employee of  the dental
hygienist or denturist;
(f) A  speech-language pathologist or audiologist licensed under ORS chapter 681 or an employee
of the speech-language pathologist or audiologist;
(g) An emergency medical services provider licensed under ORS chapter 682;
(h) An optometrist licensed under ORS chapter 683 or an employee of the optometrist;
(i) A chiropractic physician licensed under ORS chapter 684 or an employee  of the chiropractic
physician;
(j) A naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter  685 or an employee of the naturopathic
physician;
(k) A massage therapist  licensed under ORS 687.011 to 687.250 or an employee of the massage
therapist;
(L) A direct entry  midwife licensed under ORS 687.405 to 687.495 or an employee of the direct
entry midwife;
(m) A physical therapist licensed under ORS 688.010 to 688.201 or an employee of  the physical
therapist;
(n) A medical imaging licensee under ORS 688.405  to 688.605 or an employee of the medical
imaging licensee;
(o) A respiratory care  practitioner licensed under ORS 688.815 or an employee of the respiratory
care practitioner;
(p) A polysomnographic  technologist licensed under ORS 688.819 or an employee of the poly-
somnographic technologist;
(q) A pharmacist licensed under ORS chapter 689 or an employee of the pharmacist;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 131
(r) A dietitian licensed under ORS 691.405 to 691.485 or an employee of the dietitian;
(s) A funeral service practitioner  licensed under ORS chapter 692 or an employee of the funeral
service  practitioner;
(t) A health care facility as defined in ORS 442.015;
(u) A home health agency as defined in ORS 443.014;
(v) A hospice program as defined in ORS 443.850;
(w) A clinical laboratory as defined in ORS 438.010;
(x) A pharmacy as defined in ORS 689.005;
(y) A diabetes self-management program as defined in ORS 743.694; and
(z) Any other person or entity that furnishes, bills for or is paid for health care in  the normal
course of business.
(15) “Health information” means any oral or written information in any form or medium that:
(a) Is created or  received by a covered entity, a public health authority, a life insurer, a school,
a university or a health care provider that is not a covered entity; and
(b) Relates to:
(A) The past, present or future physical or mental health or condition of an individual;
(B) The provision of health care to an individual; or
(C) The past, present or future payment for the provision of health care to an individual.
(16) “Health insurer” means an insurer who offers:
(a) A health benefit plan as defined in ORS 743B.005;
(b) A short term health insurance policy, the  duration of which does not exceed three months
including renewals;
(c) A student health insurance policy;
(d) A Medicare supplemental policy; or
(e) A dental only policy.
(17) “Homeowner insurance” means insurance for residential property consisting of a combina-
tion of property insurance and casualty insurance that  provides coverage for the risks of owning
or occupying a dwelling and that is not intended to cover an owner’s interest in rental property  or
commercial  exposures.
(18) “Individual” means a natural person who:
(a) In  the case of life or health insurance, is a past, present or proposed principal insured or
certificate holder;
(b) In the case of other kinds of insurance, is a  past, present or proposed named insured or
certificate holder;
(c) Is a past, present or proposed policyowner;
(d) Is a past or present applicant;
(e) Is a past or present claimant; or
(f) Derived, derives  or is proposed to derive insurance coverage under an insurance policy or
certificate that is subject to ORS 746.600 to 746.690.
(19) “Individually identifiable health information” means any oral or written health  information
that is:
(a) Created or received by a covered  entity or a health care provider that is not a covered en-
tity; and
(b) Identifiable to an individual,  including demographic information that identifies the individual,
or for which there is a reasonable basis  to believe the information can be used to identify an indi-
vidual, and that relates to:
(A) The past, present or future physical or mental health or condition of an individual;
(B) The provision of health care to an individual; or
(C) The past, present or future payment for the provision of health care to an individual.
(20) “Institutional source” means a person or governmental entity  that provides information
about an  individual to an insurer, insurance producer or insurance-support organization, other than:
(a) An insurance producer;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 132
(b) The individual who is the subject of the information; or
(c) A  natural person acting in a personal capacity rather than in a business or professional ca-
pacity.
(21) “Insurance producer” or “producer” means a person licensed by the Director  of the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services as a resident or nonresident insurance producer.
(22) “Insurance score” means a number or rating that is derived from  an algorithm, computer
application, model or other process that is based in whole or in part on credit history.
(23)(a) “Insurance-support  organization” means a person who regularly engages, in whole or in
part, in assembling or collecting information about natural persons  for the primary purpose of pro-
viding the information to an insurer or insurance producer for insurance transactions, including:
(A) The furnishing of consumer reports to an insurer or insurance producer  for use in con-
nection with insurance transactions; and
(B) The collection of  personal information from insurers, insurance producers or other
insurance-support organizations for the purpose of detecting  or preventing fraud, material misrep-
resentation or material nondisclosure  in connection with insurance underwriting or insurance claim
activity.
(b) “Insurance-support organization” does not mean insurers, insurance producers,  governmental
institutions or health care providers.
(24) “Insurance transaction” means any transaction that  involves insurance primarily for per-
sonal, family or household needs rather than business or professional needs and that entails:
(a) The determination of an individual’s eligibility for an insurance coverage, benefit or payment;
or
(b) The servicing of an insurance application, policy or certificate.
(25) “Insurer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.106.
(26) “Investigative consumer report” means  a consumer report, or portion of a consumer report,
for which information about a natural person’s character, general reputation, personal character-
istics or mode of living is obtained through personal interviews with the person’s neighbors, friends,
associates, acquaintances or others who may have knowledge  concerning such items of information.
(27) “Licensee” means an insurer, insurance producer  or other person authorized or required to
be authorized, or licensed or required to be licensed, pursuant to the Insurance Code.
(28) “Loss history report” means a report provided  by, or a database maintained by, an
insurance-support organization or consumer reporting agency that contains  information regarding
the claims  history of the individual property that is the subject of the application for a homeowner
insurance policy or the consumer applying for a homeowner insurance policy.
(29) “Nonaffiliated third party” means any person except:
(a) An affiliate of a licensee;
(b) A person that is employed jointly by a licensee and by a person that  is not an affiliate of the
licensee; and
(c) As designated by the director by rule.
(30) “Payment” includes but is not limited to:
(a) Efforts to obtain premiums or reimbursement;
(b) Determining eligibility or coverage;
(c) Billing activities;
(d) Claims management;
(e) Reviewing health care to determine medical necessity;
(f) Utilization review; and
(g) Disclosures to consumer reporting agencies.
(31)(a) “Personal financial information” means:
(A) Information that is identifiable with an individual, gathered in connection with an  insurance
transaction from which judgments can be made about the individual’s character, habits, avocations,
finances, occupations, general reputation, credit or any other personal characteristics; or
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 133
(B) An individual’s name, address and policy number or similar form of  access code for the
individual’s policy.
(b) “Personal financial information” does not  mean information that a licensee has a reasonable
basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public from federal, state or  local gov-
ernment records, widely distributed media or disclosures to the public that are required  by federal,
state or local law.
(32) “Personal information” means:
(a) Personal financial information;
(b) Individually identifiable health information; or
(c) Protected health information.
(33) “Personal insurance” means the following types of  insurance products or services that are
to be used primarily for personal, family or household purposes:
(a) Private passenger automobile coverage;
(b) Homeowner, mobile homeowners,  manufactured homeowners, condominium owners and
renters coverage;
(c) Personal dwelling property coverage;
(d) Personal liability and theft coverage, including excess personal  liability and theft coverage;
and
(e) Personal inland marine coverage.
(34) “Personal representative” includes but is not limited to:
(a) A person appointed as a  guardian under ORS 125.305, 419B.372, 419C.481 or 419C.555 with
authority to make medical and health care decisions;
(b) A person appointed as a health care representative under ORS 127.505  to 127.660 or 127.700
to 127.737 to make health care decisions or mental health treatment decisions;
(c) A person appointed as a personal representative under ORS chapter 113; and
(d) A person described in ORS 746.611.
(35) “Policyholder” means a person who:
(a) In the case of individual policies of life or health insurance, is a current policyowner;
(b) In the case of individual policies of other kinds of insurance, is currently  a named insured;
or
(c) In the case of group policies of insurance under which coverage  is individually underwritten,
is a current certificate holder.
(36) “Pretext interview” means an interview wherein the interviewer, in an  attempt to obtain
personal information about a natural person, does one or more of the following:
(a) Pretends to be someone the interviewer is not.
(b) Pretends to represent a person the interviewer is not in fact representing.
(c) Misrepresents the true purpose of the interview.
(d) Refuses upon request to identify the interviewer.
(37) “Privileged information” means information that is identifiable with an individual  and that:
(a) Relates to a claim for insurance benefits or a civil or criminal  proceeding involving the in-
dividual; and
(b) Is collected in connection with  or in reasonable anticipation of a claim for insurance benefits
or a civil or criminal proceeding involving the individual.
(38)(a) “Protected health information” means individually identifiable health  information that is
transmitted or maintained in any form of electronic or other medium by a covered entity.
(b) “Protected health information”  does not mean individually identifiable health information in:
(A) Education records covered by the federal Family Educational Rights  and Privacy Act (20
U.S.C. 1232g);
(B) Records described at 20 U.S.C. 1232g(a)(4)(B)(iv); or
(C) Employment records held by a covered entity in its role as employer.
(39) “Residual market mechanism” means an association,  organization or other entity involved
in the insuring of risks under ORS 735.005 to 735.145, 737.312 or other provisions  of the Insurance
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 134
Code relating  to insurance applicants who are unable to procure insurance through normal insur-
ance markets.
(40) “Termination of insurance coverage” or  “termination of an insurance policy” means either
a cancellation or  a nonrenewal of an insurance policy, in whole or in part, for any reason other than
the failure of a premium to be paid as required by the policy.
(41) “Treatment” includes but is not limited to:
(a) The provision, coordination or management of health care; and
(b) Consultations and referrals between health care providers.
SECTION 162.
 ORS 750.055 is amended to read:
750.055. (1) The following provisions apply  to health care service contractors to the extent not
inconsistent with the express provisions of ORS 750.005 to 750.095:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.362,  731.382, 731.385, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398
to 731.430, 731.428, 731.450, 731.454, 731.485, as provided in subsection (2)  of this section, ORS
731.488, 731.504, 731.508, 731.509, 731.510, 731.511, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640 to  731.652,
731.730, 731.731, 731.735, 731.737, 731.750, 731.752, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to 731.992.
(c) ORS 732.215, 732.220, 732.230,  732.245, 732.250, 732.320, 732.325 and 732.517 to 732.596, not
including ORS 732.582, and ORS 732.650 to 732.689.
(d) ORS 733.010 to 733.050, 733.080, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and  733.695
to 733.780.
(e) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(f) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061, 742.065, 742.150 to 742.162 and 742.518 to
742.542.
(g) ORS 743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.022, 743.023, 743.025,
743.028, 743.029, 743.038, 743.040, 743.044, 743.050, 743.100  to 743.109, 743.402, 743.405, 743.406,
743.417, 743.472, 743.492, 743.495, 743.498, 743.522, 743.523, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535, 743.550, 743.650
to 743.656, 743.680 to 743.689, 743.788, 743.790 and 743B.221.
(h) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014, 743A.020,  743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040, 743A.044,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064, 743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100,  743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160, 743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175, 743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252, 743A.260,  743A.310
and 743A.315 and section 2, chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013.
(i) ORS 743B.001,  743B.003 to 743B.127, 743B.128, 743B.130, 743B.195, 743B.197, 743B.200,
743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.222, 743B.225, 743B.227,  743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253, 743B.254,
743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.280 to 743B.285, 743B.287, 743B.300, 743B.310, 743B.320,
743B.323, 743B.330, 743B.340, 743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343 to 743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403, 743B.407,
743B.420, 743B.423, 743B.450, 743B.451, 743B.452,  743B.453, 743B.470, 743B.475, 743B.505, 743B.550,
743B.555, 743B.601, 743B.602 and 743B.800.
(j) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to 744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation  of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(k) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160, 746.220 to 746.370, 746.600, 746.605, 746.607, 746.608,  746.610,
746.615, 746.625, 746.635, 746.650, 746.655, 746.660, 746.668, 746.670, 746.675, 746.680 and 746.690.
(2) The following provisions of the  Insurance Code apply to health care service contractors ex-
cept in the case of group practice health maintenance  organizations that are federally qualified
pursuant to Title XIII of the Public Health Service Act:
(a) ORS 731.485, if the group practice health maintenance organization  wholly owns and oper-
ates an in-house drug outlet.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 135
(b) ORS 743A.024, unless the patient is referred by a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician
associate or nurse practitioner associated with a group practice health maintenance organization.
(3) For the purposes of this section, health care service contractors are insurers.
(4) Any for-profit health care service contractor organized under the laws of any other state that
is not governed by the insurance laws  of the other state is subject to all requirements of ORS
chapter 732.
(5)(a) A health  care service contractor is a domestic insurance company for the purpose of de-
termining whether the health care service contractor is a debtor, as defined in 11 U.S.C. 109.
(b) A health care service contractor’s  classification as a domestic insurance company under
paragraph (a) of this subsection does not subject the health care service contractor to ORS  734.510
to 734.710.
(6) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services  may, after notice and
hearing, adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section and ORS  750.003, 750.005, 750.025
and 750.045 that are necessary for the proper administration of these provisions.
SECTION 163.
 ORS 750.055, as amended by section 21,  chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013, section
7, chapter 25, Oregon  Laws 2014, section 82, chapter 45, Oregon Laws 2014, section 9, chapter 59,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 7, chapter 100, Oregon  Laws 2015, section 7, chapter 224, Oregon Laws
2015, section 11, chapter 362, Oregon Laws 2015, section 10, chapter 470, Oregon Laws  2015, section
30, chapter 515, Oregon Laws 2015, section 10, chapter 206,  Oregon Laws 2017, section 6, chapter
417, Oregon Laws  2017, section 22, chapter 479, Oregon Laws 2017, section 10, chapter 7, Oregon
Laws 2018, section 69, chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2019, section 38, chapter  151, Oregon Laws 2019,
section 5, chapter 441, Oregon Laws 2019, section 85, chapter 97, Oregon Laws 2021,  section 12,
chapter 37, Oregon Laws 2022, section 5, chapter  111, Oregon Laws 2023, and section 2, chapter 152,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
750.055. (1) The following provisions apply to health care service  contractors to the extent not
inconsistent with the express provisions of ORS 750.005 to 750.095:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.362,  731.382, 731.385, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398
to 731.430, 731.428, 731.450, 731.454,  731.485, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, ORS
731.488, 731.504,  731.508, 731.509, 731.510, 731.511, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640 to 731.652,
731.730, 731.731, 731.735, 731.737, 731.750, 731.752, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to 731.992.
(c) ORS 732.215, 732.220, 732.230, 732.245, 732.250, 732.320, 732.325 and  732.517 to 732.596, not
including ORS 732.582, and ORS 732.650 to 732.689.
(d) ORS  733.010 to 733.050, 733.080, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and 733.695
to 733.780.
(e) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(f) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061, 742.065, 742.150 to 742.162 and 742.518 to
742.542.
(g) ORS 743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.022, 743.023, 743.025,
743.028, 743.029, 743.038, 743.040, 743.044, 743.050,  743.100 to 743.109, 743.402, 743.405, 743.406,
743.417, 743.472, 743.492, 743.495, 743.498, 743.522, 743.523, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535, 743.550, 743.650
to 743.656, 743.680 to 743.689, 743.788, 743.790 and 743B.221.
(h) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014,  743A.020, 743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040, 743A.044,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064,  743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100, 743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160,  743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175,  743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252, 743A.260, 743A.310
and 743A.315.
(i) ORS 743B.001, 743B.003 to 743B.127, 743B.128, 743B.130, 743B.195,  743B.197, 743B.200,
743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.222, 743B.225,  743B.227, 743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253, 743B.254,
743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.280 to 743B.285, 743B.287, 743B.300, 743B.310, 743B.320,
743B.323, 743B.330, 743B.340, 743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343 to 743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403, 743B.407,
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 136
743B.420, 743B.423, 743B.450, 743B.451, 743B.452, 743B.453,  743B.470, 743B.475, 743B.505, 743B.550,
743B.555, 743B.601, 743B.602 and 743B.800.
(j) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to  744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(k) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160, 746.220 to 746.370, 746.600, 746.605, 746.607, 746.608,  746.610,
746.615, 746.625, 746.635, 746.650, 746.655, 746.660, 746.668, 746.670, 746.675, 746.680 and 746.690.
(2) The following provisions of the Insurance Code apply to  health care service contractors ex-
cept in the case of group  practice health maintenance organizations that are federally qualified
pursuant to Title XIII of the Public Health Service Act:
(a) ORS 731.485, if the  group practice health maintenance organization wholly owns and oper-
ates an in-house drug outlet.
(b) ORS 743A.024, unless the patient is referred by a physician, [ physician assistant ] physician
associate or nurse practitioner associated with a group practice health maintenance organization.
(3) For the purposes of this section, health care service contractors are insurers.
(4) Any for-profit health care service contractor organized under the laws of any other state that
is not governed by the insurance laws of the other state is  subject to all requirements of ORS
chapter 732.
(5)(a) A health care service contractor is a domestic insurance company for the purpose  of de-
termining whether the health care service contractor is a debtor, as defined in 11 U.S.C. 109.
(b) A health care service contractor’s classification as  a domestic insurance company under
paragraph (a) of this subsection does not subject the health care service contractor to ORS  734.510
to 734.710.
(6) The Director of the  Department of Consumer and Business Services may, after notice and
hearing, adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section and ORS  750.003, 750.005, 750.025
and 750.045 that are necessary for the proper administration of these provisions.
SECTION 164.
 ORS 759.693 is amended to read:
759.693. As used in ORS 759.693 to 759.698, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Adaptive equipment” means equipment that permits a  person with a disability, other than
a person who is hard of hearing or speech impaired, to communicate effectively on the telephone.
(2) “Applicant” means a person who applies for  an assistive telecommunication device, adaptive
equipment or a signal device.
(3) “Assistive telecommunication device” means a device that utilizes a keyboard, acoustic cou-
pler, display screen, Braille  display, speakerphone or amplifier to enable people who are deaf, deaf-
blind, hard of hearing or speech impaired to communicate effectively on the telephone.
(4) “Audiologist” means  a person who has a master’s or doctoral degree in audiology and a
Certificate of Clinical Competence in audiology from the  American Speech-Language-Hearing Asso-
ciation.
(5) “Communication  facilitator” means a person who provides professional, in-person assistive
services  that  are necessary to help a person communicate effectively via a telecommunication de-
vice, with or without the use of an assistive  telecommunication device or a telecommunications re-
lay service, if the person receiving the services is:
(a) Deaf-blind;
(b) Deaf and has a physical disability that limits the person’s expressive communication; or
(c) Hard of hearing and has a physical disability that limits the person’s expressive communi-
cation.
(6) “Deaf” means a profound hearing loss, as determined by  an audiologist, licensed physician,
[physician assistant ] physician associate , nurse practitioner, hearing aid specialist or  vocational
rehabilitation counselor of the Department of Human Services, that  requires use of an assistive
telecommunication device to communicate effectively on the telephone.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 137
(7) “Deaf-blind” means a hearing loss  and a visual impairment that require use of an assistive
telecommunication device to communicate effectively  on the telephone. For purposes of this sub-
section:
(a) A hearing loss must be determined by an audiologist, licensed physician, [physician
assistant] physician associate, nurse practitioner, hearing  aid specialist or vocational rehabilitation
counselor of the Department of Human Services.
(b) A visual impairment must be determined by a licensed  physician, [ physician assistant ] phy-
sician associate , nurse practitioner, vocational rehabilitation counselor of the Department of  Hu-
man Services or rehabilitation instructor for persons who are blind.
(8) “Disability” means a physical condition, as determined by a licensed physician, [ physician
assistant] physician associate, nurse practitioner or vocational rehabilitation counselor of  the De-
partment of  Human Services, other than hearing or speech impairment that requires use of adaptive
equipment to utilize the telephone.
(9) “Hard of hearing”  means a hearing loss, as determined by an audiologist, licensed physician,
[physician assistant ] physician associate , nurse practitioner, hearing aid specialist or vocational
rehabilitation counselor of the Department of  Human Services, that requires use of an assistive
telecommunication device to communicate effectively on the telephone.
(10) “Hearing aid specialist” means a person licensed to deal in hearing  aids under ORS chapter
694.
(11) “Nurse practitioner” has the meaning given that term in ORS 678.010.
(12) “Physician” means an applicant’s primary care physician or  a medical specialist who is able
to determine an applicant’s  disability and to whom the applicant was referred by the primary care
physician.
(13) [ “Physician assistant” ] “Physician associate”  has the meaning given that  term in ORS
677.495.
(14) “Recipient” means a person who receives adaptive equipment, an assistive telecommuni-
cation device or a signal device.
(15) “Rehabilitation instructor for persons who are blind” means  an employee of the Commission
for the Blind who:
(a) Meets the minimum qualifications set  by the commission to assess adult clients referred for
services;
(b) Develops individualized training programs; and
(c) Instructs and counsels clients of the commission on adapting to sight loss.
(16) “Signal device” means a mechanical device that alerts a person who  is deaf, deaf-blind or
hard of hearing of an incoming telephone call.
(17) “Speech impaired” means a speech disability,  as determined by a licensed physician, [ phy-
sician assistant ] physician associate , nurse practitioner, speech-language pathologist or vocational
rehabilitation counselor of the Department of  Human Services, that requires use of an assistive
telecommunication device to communicate effectively on the telephone.
(18) “Speech-language pathologist” means a  person who has a master’s degree or equivalency in
speech-language pathology and a Certificate of Clinical Competence issued by the  American
Speech-Language-Hearing Association.
(19) “Telecommunications relay center” means  a facility authorized by the Public Utility Com-
mission to provide telecommunications relay service.
(20) “Telecommunications relay  service” means a telephone transmission service that provides
the ability for an individual who is deaf, deaf-blind, hard of  hearing or speech impaired to engage
in communication  by wire or radio with a hearing individual in a manner that is functionally
equivalent to the ability of an individual who does not have a  hearing or speech disability to com-
municate using voice communication services by wire or radio. “Telecommunications  relay
service” includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Services  that enable two-way communication between an individual using a text telephone
or other nonvoice terminal device and an individual not using such a device;
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 138
(b) Speech-to-speech services; and
(c) Non-English relay services.
SECTION 165.
 ORS 759.698 is amended to read:
759.698. (1)(a) In order to be eligible to receive assistive telecommunication  devices, adaptive
equipment or communication facilitator services, individuals  must be certified as deaf, deaf-blind,
hard of hearing or speech impaired by a licensed  physician, [ physician assistant ] physician associ-
ate, nurse practitioner, audiologist, hearing aid specialist, speech-language pathologist,  rehabili-
tation instructor for persons who are blind or vocational rehabilitation counselor of the  Department
of Human Services. Certification implies that  the individual cannot use the telephone for expressive
or receptive communication.
(b) No more than one assistive telecommunication device  or adaptive equipment device may be
provided to a household. However, two assistive  telecommunication devices or adaptive equipment
devices may be provided to a household if more  than one eligible person permanently resides in the
household. Households without  any assistive telecommunication devices or adaptive equipment shall
be given priority over households with one assistive telecommunication device or  adaptive equip-
ment device when such devices are distributed.
(c) ORS 759.693 to  759.698 do not require a telecommunications utility to provide an assistive
telecommunication device to any person in violation of ORS 646.730.
(2)(a) In order to be eligible to receive adaptive equipment, individuals must be certified  to have
the required disability by a person  or agency designated by the Public Utility Commission to make
such certifications. Certification implies that the individual is unable to use the telephone.
(b) ORS 759.693 to 759.698 do  not require a telecommunications utility to provide adaptive
equipment to any person in violation of ORS 646.730.
SECTION 166. ORS 807.090 is amended to read:
807.090. (1) If the Department of Transportation determines that  a person may be ineligible for
a license because the person has a mental or  physical condition or impairment that affects the
person’s ability to safely operate a motor vehicle, the person may establish eligibility for a license:
(a) By personally demonstrating to  the satisfaction of the department that, notwithstanding the
mental or physical  condition or impairment, the person is qualified to safely operate a motor vehicle;
or
(b) If the department reasonably believes that, notwithstanding the demonstration  under para-
graph (a) of this subsection, the person’s mental or physical condition or  impairment affects the
person’s ability to safely operate a motor vehicle, by receiving a  determination of eligibility from
the medical determination officer of the department under this section.
(2) The  medical determination officer shall determine that a person is eligible for a license under
this section if an applicant establishes to the  satisfaction of the officer that the person’s mental or
physical condition or impairment does not affect the person’s ability  to safely operate a motor ve-
hicle. The medical determination officer shall use the following to determine the person’s  eligibility
under this subsection:
(a) A report from the  person’s physician, nurse practitioner or [ physician assistant ] physician
associate of the person’s condition or impairment.
(b) If the  person’s condition or impairment apparently involves only visual deficiencies, the de-
partment may require a person to submit a report from a licensed optometrist or a licensed physi-
cian who specializes in diagnosis and treatment of diseases of the eye.
(c) The medical determination officer may require  an examination and a written report of
findings and recommendations from  a qualified physician, nurse practitioner or [ physician assistant ]
physician associate identified by the officer in addition to other reports submitted.
(3) If a person establishes eligibility for a license under this section by receiving a determination
of eligibility, the department may require the person to  reestablish eligibility at reasonable inter-
vals. The frequency of reestablishing eligibility under this  subsection shall be established by the
medical determination officer after reviewing any  recommendations from the physician, nurse prac-
titioner  or  [physician assistant ] physician associate of the person required to reestablish eligibility.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 139
(4) The department may employ any qualified physician, nurse practitioner or  [ physician assist-
ant] physician associate who holds an unrestricted license in the  State of Oregon to perform the
duties assigned to the medical determination officer by this section.
(5) As used in this section, “physician” means a person who holds  a degree of Doctor of Medi-
cine or Doctor of Osteopathic Medicine and is licensed under ORS 677.100  to 677.228 and a person
who holds a degree of Doctor of Naturopathic Medicine and is licensed under ORS chapter 685.
SECTION 167. ORS 811.220 is amended to read:
811.220. The Director of Transportation shall  issue a certificate of exemption required under
ORS 811.215 for any person on whose behalf a statement signed by a physician, nurse practitioner
or [ physician assistant ] physician associate is presented to the Department  of Transportation. For
a physician’s, nurse practitioner’s or [ physician assistant’s ] physician associate’s  statement to
qualify under this section, the physician, nurse  practitioner or [ physician assistant ] physician as-
sociate giving the statement must set forth reasons in the statement why use of a child  safety sys-
tem, safety belt or safety  harness by the person would be impractical or harmful to the person by
reason of physical condition, medical problem or body size.
SECTION 168.
 ORS 811.604 is amended to read:
811.604. Application for issuance or renewal of a disabled person parking permit  in the form of
an individual placard or decal issued under ORS 811.602 shall include:
(1) A certificate, signed and dated within six months preceding the  date of application, by a li-
censed physician, a licensed nurse practitioner or a licensed [ physician assistant ] physician asso-
ciate to  the Department of Transportation that the applicant is a person with a disability or a
certificate, signed and dated  within six months preceding the date of application, by a licensed
optometrist that the applicant is a person with a disability because of loss of vision or  substantial
loss of visual acuity or visual field beyond correction;
(2) The state-issued  licensing number of the licensed physician, certified nurse practitioner, li-
censed [ physician assistant ] physician associate or licensed optometrist who signed the  certificate
described in subsection (1) of this section; and
(3) The number of a driver license, driver permit, identification card  or parking identification
card issued to the applicant by the department.
SECTION 169. ORS 811.611 is amended to read:
811.611. (1) The Department of Transportation  may issue a disabled person parking permit in the
form of a placard to a person who  is visiting from a foreign country if the person presents to the
department either a valid driver license  or other grant of driving privileges from the foreign country
or a passport or visa showing that the person is a visitor to the  United States and presents one of
the following:
(a) A valid disabled person parking permit issued by the country that issued  the visitor’s pass-
port or visa;
(b) A certificate from an official of  the agency that issues disabled person parking permits in the
country that issued  the visitor’s passport or visa certifying that the person holds a valid disabled
person parking permit; or
(c) A  certificate from a licensed physician, a licensed nurse practitioner or a licensed [ physician
assistant] physician associate addressed to the Department of Transportation certifying that the
applicant is a  person with a disability, or a certificate from a licensed optometrist certifying that
the applicant is a person with a disability because  of loss of vision or substantial loss of visual
acuity or visual field beyond correction.
(2) A disabled person parking permit issued under this section is valid for 30 days.
SECTION 170.
 Section 9, chapter 550, Oregon Laws 2011, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  Notwithstanding the amendments to ORS 677.097, 677.495, 677.500,  677.510, 677.512,
677.515, 677.535 and 677.545 by sections 1 to 8 , [ of this 2011 Act ] chapter 550, Oregon Laws 2011 :
(1) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate practicing under a practice description approved
by the  Oregon Medical Board under ORS 677.510 as in effect immediately before [ the operative date
of the amendments to ORS 677.510 by section 3 of this 2011 Act ] January 1, 2012,  may continue  to
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 140
practice in accordance with the practice description and is not required to enter into  a practice
agreement under ORS 677.510.
(2) A [ physician assistant ] physician associate  licensed under ORS 677.512 as in effect imme-
diately before [ the operative date of the  amendments to ORS 677.512 by section 4 of this 2011 Act ]
January 1, 2012,  may renew the [ physician assistant’s ] physician associate’s  license without
meeting the requirements of ORS 677.512 (2)(c) and (d).
SECTION 171. Section 2, chapter 575, Oregon Laws 2015, as  amended by section 1, chapter 384,
Oregon Laws 2017, and section 13, chapter 489, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Carrier” means an insurer that offers a health benefit plan, as defined in ORS 743B.005.
(b) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “Primary care” means family medicine,  general internal medicine, naturopathic medicine,
obstetrics and gynecology, pediatrics or general psychiatry.
(d) “Primary care provider” includes:
(A) A physician, naturopath, nurse practitioner, [ physician assistant ] physician associate  or
other health professional licensed or certified in this state, whose  clinical practice is in the area
of primary care.
(B) A health care team or clinic that has been certified  by the Oregon Health Authority as a
patient centered primary care home.
(2)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall convene a primary care payment reform collaborative
to advise and assist in the implementation of a Primary Care Transformation Initiative to:
(A) Use value-based payment methods that are not paid on a per claim basis to:
(i) Increase the investment in primary care;
(ii) Align primary care reimbursement by all purchasers of care; and
(iii) Continue to improve reimbursement methods,  including by investing in the social determi-
nants of health;
(B) Increase investment in primary care without  increasing costs to consumers or increasing the
total cost of health care;
(C) Provide technical assistance to clinics and payers in implementing the initiative;
(D) Aggregate the data from and align the metrics  used in the initiative with the work of the
Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee established in ORS 413.017;
(E) Facilitate the integration of primary care behavioral and physical health care; and
(F) Ensure that the goals of the initiative are met by December 31, 2027.
(b) The collaborative is a governing body, as defined in ORS 192.610.
(3) The authority shall invite representatives from all of the following to  participate in the pri-
mary care payment reform collaborative:
(a) Primary care providers;
(b) Health care consumers;
(c) Experts in primary care contracting and reimbursement;
(d) Independent practice associations;
(e) Behavioral health treatment providers;
(f) Third party administrators;
(g) Employers that offer self-insured health benefit plans;
(h) The Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(i) Carriers;
(j) A statewide organization for mental health professionals who provide primary care;
(k) A statewide organization representing federally qualified health centers;
(L) A statewide organization representing hospitals and health systems;
(m) A statewide professional association for family physicians;
(n) A statewide professional association for physicians;
(o) A statewide professional association for nurses; and
(p) The Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 141
(4) The primary care payment reform collaborative shall annually report to the  Oregon Health
Policy Board and to the Legislative Assembly on the achievement of the primary care  spending
targets in ORS [ 414.625] 414.572 and 743.010 and the implementation of the Primary Care Transfor-
mation Initiative.
(5) A coordinated care organization shall report to the authority, no later than October 1  of
each year, the proportion of the organization’s  total medical costs that are allocated to primary
care.
(6) The authority,  in collaboration with the Department of Consumer and Business Services,
shall adopt rules prescribing the primary  care services for which costs must be reported under
subsection (5) of this section.
SECTION 172. Section 20, chapter 349, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 20.  A [ physician assistant ] physician associate  practicing under a practice agreement or
practice description that was entered  into before [ the operative date specified in section 21 of this
2021 Act ] July 15, 2022, may continue to  practice under the practice agreement until the [ physician
assistant] physician associate enters into a collaboration agreement,  as defined in ORS 677.495. A
[physician assistant ] physician associate described in this section:
(1) May enter into a collaboration agreement on or after July 15, 2022.
(2) Shall enter into a collaboration agreement not later  than the date on which the [ physician
assistant’s] physician associate’s license is due for  renewal or December 31, 2023, whichever is
later.
SECTION 172a.
(1) The amendments to ORS 3.450, 30.302, 30.800,  30.802, 31.260, 31.740,
58.376, 87.555, 87.560, 87.565, 87.575, 87.581, 109.640, 109.650,  109.675, 109.680, 109.685, 124.050,
127.663, 127.700, 135.139, 136.220, 137.076, 137.473, 137.476, 146.181,  146.750, 147.403, 169.076,
169.077, 169.750, 192.547, 192.556,  315.616, 336.479, 336.490, 339.870, 343.146, 348.303, 353.450,
408.310, 408.315,  408.340, 410.530, 413.273, 413.574, 413.590, 414.550, 418.747, 418.782, 419B.005,
419B.020, 419B.023, 419B.035, 419B.352, 421.467, 421.590, 430.401, 430.735, 431.180, 431A.570,
432.005, 433.010, 433.017, 433.110, 433.260, 433.443, 433.800, 433.815,  435.205, 435.305, 436.225,
436.235, 436.295, 438.010, 441.064,  441.098, 442.490, 443.065, 443.075, 443.850, 453.307, 463.015,
475.005, 475.528, 475.744, 475.950, 475.975, 475.976, 475.978, 475C.777, 475C.891, 496.018, 616.750,
628.270, 656.005, 656.245, 656.260,  656.799, 659A.150, 659A.413, 676.340, 676.345, 676.347, 676.454,
676.650, 676.860, 677.085, 677.095, 677.097, 677.135, 677.137, 677.139,  677.141, 677.235, 677.494,
677.495, 677.500, 677.505, 677.510,  677.511, 677.512, 677.515, 677.518, 677.520, 677.525, 677.535,
680.205, 680.545, 688.132, 688.405, 688.510, 688.515, 688.525, 688.805,  694.042, 735.631, 742.400,
742.504, 743A.036, 743A.044, 743B.222, 743B.427, 744.364,  744.367, 746.230, 746.600, 750.055,
759.693, 759.698, 807.090, 811.220, 811.604 and 811.611 and section 9, chapter 550, Oregon Laws
2011, section 2, chapter 575, Oregon Laws 2015, section 20,  chapter 349, Oregon Laws 2021,
and section 9, chapter 629, Oregon Laws 2021, by sections 15 to  172 of this 2024 Act are in-
tended to change the term “physician assistant” to the term “physician associate.”
(2) For the purpose of harmonizing and clarifying  statutory law, the Legislative Counsel
may substitute for words designating  the term “physician assistant,” wherever they occur
in statutory law, other words designating the term “physician associate.”
CAPTIONS
SECTION 173.
The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are  provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 174. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 142
Passed by House February 22, 2024
Repassed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4010 (HB 4010-B) Page 143